Cornell University Library 

HX 36.K21 

Terrorism and communism :a contribution 



3 1924 002 196 727 




Cornell University 
Library 



The original of tliis bool< is in 
tine Cornell University Library. 

There are no known copyright restrictions in 
the United States on the use of the text. 



http://www.archive.org/details/cu31924002196727 



TERRORISM AND COMMUNISM. 



TERRORISM AND 
COMMUNISM 



A CONTRIBUTION to the NATURAL 
HISTORY OF REVOLUTION 



KARL KAUTSKY 

III 



Translated by W. H. KERRIDGE 

/ 



THE NATIONAL LABOUR PRESS LTD. 

London : 8&9, Johnson's Court, E.C.4. 
Manchester: 30, Blackfriars Street. 

9X4- 

PROPeRTY OF LIBRARY 

W'l 1^"^ STATE SCHOOL 

iOy>l ■ -L AiQ LAEOR RELATIONS 

r. i.MivERSITY 



First published in 1920. 



All rights reserved) 



PREFACE. 



Tqb following work was begun about a year ago, but 
waa dropped as the result of the Eevolution of 
November 9; for the Eevolution brought me other 
obligations than merely theoretical and historical 
research. It was only after several months that I could 
return to the work in order, with occasional initer- 
ruptions, to bring this book to a close. 

The course of recent events did not minister tb the 
uniformity of this work. It was rendered more difiBcult 
by the fact that, as time went on, the examination of 
this subject shifted itself to some extent. My starting 
point represented the central problem of modern 
Socialism, t he attitude of Social Democracy to 
Bo lshevik m ethods. But since Bolshevism had, of its" 
own accord, referred to the Paris Commune of 1871 as 
being to some extent its precursor and its prototype, 
and as having received the sanction of Marx himself, 
and since the Commune is little known and imderstood 
by the present generation, I undertook to draw a parallel 
between the Commune and the Soviet Eepublic. 

In order to make the Commune comprehensible I 
had to refer to the Paris Commime, and afterwards to 
the French Eevolution and its Eeign of Terror. This 
gave me fresh means for another parallel to the Soviet 
Eepublic; hence an examination of the Commime led 
to an examination of Terrorism, its origin and its 
consequences. 

PROPERTY OF LIB??ARY 

NEW YORK STATE SCHOOL 
INOilSTHiAL A[:D LABOR RELATiONS 125:23 

ITY 



Thus there are two lines of thought which become 
merged in this book, the one occasionally leading away 
from the other. At first I felt this to be rather disturb- 
ing, and even considered whether it would not be better 
to divide the work into two separate sections, the one 
representing the exposition of the Commune, the other 
a discussion of Terrorism. However, in regard to my 
starting point, the Soviet Eepublic is in such very close 
connection with these two events in history, that it 
seemed to me impossible to treat them separately. I 
hope therefore that, in spite of the difficulties inherent 
in the dual nature of this book, I shall have succeeded 
in preserving uniformity in the structure of the thoughts 
contained therein. 

However academic the reader may think many of my 
illustrations and expositions, they are all of the highest 
practical importance, especially at such a wildly 
fermented time as the present. This does not mean 
to say that I have adapted, as it were, the truth to the 
needs of the moment. Instead I have always sought, 
even in those sections where I was referring to a period 
long past, to treat only of that side of the subject 
which seemed calculated to throw light upon the chaos 
that surrounds us. 

If we regard only this chaos as it exists in Kussia^^gd 
German y at the present moment, our prospects at the 
moment and our futtire must be very far from cheering. 
We see a world sinking under economic ruin and 
fratricidal murder. In both countries we find Socialists 
under the Government s actmg against~oi£er~5ociiiJJsts H 
with Bimilai (jrutjlt^~to that practised more than half a, 
century ago by the Versailles butchers of the Commune 
—cruelty which has earned the most laudable indigna- 
tion of the whole International Proletariat ever since. 



Nevertheless, the outlook becomes brighter so soon 
as we consider the International. The workers of West 
Europe have arisen. It rests with them to accomphsh 
actual results, only witTi more worthy methods than 
those practised up to the present in the East. 

Hence it is necessary that they should learn from 
us, and that they should learn to recognise the different 
methods of struggle, as well as of construction, by their 
results. It is not so much a bUnd adulation of the 
methods of the Eevolution hitherto prevailing, but the 
strictest criticism which is necessary, and especially 
necessary just at present, when the Eevolution and 
the Socialist Parties are passing through a most difficult 
crisis, in which di&rent methods are struggling to gain 
the ascendancy. 

The success of the Eevolution will depend not a 
. little~oii wh ethet' 61* Hot it disdOVara the right methods " 
of carrymg the revolutionary message to the Proletariat, 
^fo examine methods Is at tn6 p fauent moment - e uc 
highest duty. To help with this examination and thus 
to further the Eevolution is the object of this present 
work. 

Karl Kautsky. 
Charlottenburg, Jime, 1919. 



CONTENTS. 



CH4PTEE. 



I. Eevolution and Terror 

II. Paris 

III. The Great Eevolution 



IV 



Page. 



13 



The First Paris Commune : 

The Pabis Prolbtabiat and Its Fighiing 

Methods 20 

The Failure of Terrorism 31 

V. The Traditions of the Eeign op Terror 43 

VI. The Second Paris Commune : 

The Origin or the Commune 53 

Workmen's Councils and the Central 

Committee 67 

The Jacobins in the Commune 74 

The International and the Commune 78 

The Socialism of the Commune 90 

Centralisation and Federalism 100 

Terrorist Ideas op the Commune Ill 

VII. The Effect of Civilisation on Human 
Customs : 

Brutality and Humanity 121 

Two Tendencies 127 

Slaughter and Terrorism , ... 133 

The Humanising of Conduct in the 

Nineteenth Century 140 

The Effects of the War 149 

VIII. The Communists at Work : 

Expropriation and Organisation 158 

The Growth op the Proletariat 172 

The Dictatorship 182 

Corruption 187 

The Change in Bolshevism 198 

The Terror 208 

The Outlook for the Soviet Eepublic ... 214 

The Outlook for the World Revolution . 221 



Terrorism and Communism. 



CHAPTER I. 

Revolution and Terror. 

Up to the outbreak of war, tiie idea was current in the 
widest circles of social democracy that the time for 
revolutions, not only for West Europe, but also for 
Germany and Austria, was long since past. Whoever 
thought differently was scoffed at as a revolutionary 
romancer. 

Now we have the Revolution with us, and it is taking 
on forms of barbarity, which even the most fantastic of 
revolutionary romancers could scarce have expected. 

The abolition of the death penalty was for every 
social democrat a perfectly obvious claim. The 
Revolution, however, has brought with it the most 
bloody terrorism practised by Socialist Governments. 
The Bolsheviks in Russia started this, and were in 
consequence condemned in the most bitter terms by 
all who did not accept the Bolshevik standpoint. 
Among them are the German Majority Socialists. 
But these latter hardly felt their own power threatened 
before they resorted to the same means practised by 
the Regiment of Terror, which have characterised the 
Revolution in the East. Noske has boldly followed in 
Trotsky's footsteps ; certainly with this difference, that 
he himself does not regard his dictatorship as the 
dictatorship of the proletariat. But both justify their 
slaughter on the grounds of the rights of the 
Revolution. 



2 TEEROEISM AND COMMUNISM 

It is, in fact, a widely spread idea that Terrorism 
belongs to the very essence of revolution, and that 
whoever wants a revolution must somehow come to 
some sort of terms with Terrorism. As proof of this 
assertion, over and over again the great French 
Revolution has been cited. It is regarded as the 
IJevolution par excellence. 

An examination of Terrorism, of its conditions and 
consequences, can best proceed from a description of 
the Eegiment of Terror instituted by the Sans- 
culotists. "With this we will begin. TViis will taJie us 
back some considerable distance from contemporary 
events, but these we shall better understand after 
an examination of the past. It is strilcing to find how 
many resemblances there are between the great French 
Eevolution and the revolutions of the present time, 
especially the Eassian. 

Yet the revolutions of our times differ in many 
essential points from the revolution of the 18bh 
century. This is shown at once by a comparison of 
our proletariat, our industry and commerce, with the 
corresponding phenomena of that period. 



CHAPTEE II. 

Paris. 

The present German Eevolution has no centre, whereas 
the French Eevolution was controlled from Paris. 
That Eevolution, as well as the Eegiment of Terror 
that operated within it, are quite incapable of compre- 
hension, without a consideration of the economic and 
political importance which Paris had acquired for 
France as a whole. No town in the 18th, or indeed 
the 19th century has exercised such power as did Paris 
at that period. This was due to the importance which 
the royal residence as being the central Government 
possesses in a modem bureaucratic centralised State, 
so long as economic decentralisation, which modem 
industrial capitalism and the development of means of 
transport bring in its train, has not set in. 

In a feudal State the powers of its central body, 
ef its monarch, are in reality very few. Its functions 
do not extend very far, nor is the corresponding 
government apparatus at all large. This apparatus 
can be very easily transferred from one city or estate 
to another. The monarch is all the more often 
compelled to resort to this measure, so long as the 
system of transport remains in an undeveloped state, 
and so long as the separate localities do not suffice to 
maintain him and his retainers. Hence he has more 
urgent cause to visit personally the different regions 
of bis domain, since this is the only means whereby 
he may count on preserving their fealty and obedience. 
In those early times, therefore, it was the chief busi- 
ness of the monarch to wander from place to place like 
a nomad, seeking out one rich pasturage after the 
other, forsaking it as soon as he bad exhausted its 
possibilities. 



4 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

In prcxjess of time, however, the government 
apparatus imdergoes development, especially as a 
result of the increase in production, which the money 
system makes possible, and which exacts tribute inpay- 
ment of easily transportable coin, instead of cumbrous 
natural products. In proportion to the increase of 
tribute, the power of the monarch increases also, like- 
wise the government apparatus in the form of a 
bureaucracy and a standing army. Wandering from 
place to place thus becomes impossible. Monarch and 
government must be established in some fixed place. 
In former days single large towns were the central 
points of commerce, being situate in the centre of the 
kingdom and wealthier than the smaller provincial 
towns. Thus they eventually became capitals, which 
the monarch chose as his place of residence, and 
henceforward one special city was chosen for the 
permanent abode of both government and monarch. 
Here there were soon collected together all who had 
to do with the government, and it was to this quarter 
that the taxes of the whole kingdom came, only a part 
of which ever foimd its way back. It was here that 
tradesmen in the service of court and government 
settled down, as well as financiers, who came as 
bankers to do business with the State. 

At the same time, the power of the monarch exceeded 
that of the nobility, whose independence was soon 
broken. The monarch would not tolerate the actions 
of- the great nobleman .who would settle down on his 
own estates, far from the king's residence. He was 
to remain at the court, under his personal supervision, 
in exclusive service on the monarch, which was service 
in very truth, vain and profitless. His independent 
fimctions in the administration of the public services 
were taken from him, and given to bureaucrats and 
officials whom the monarch appointed and paid. The 
courtiers were gradually reduced to being mere 
drones, whose one duty in life it was to sit at the royal 



PAEIS 5 

court and dissipate the revenue obtained from their 
own estates. What they, therefore, in early days 
consumed in their own castles and fortresses, together 
with their retainers, soon flowed into the court town 
and increased its wealth. There they built new palaces 
alongside of the king's; they squandered their riches 
in riotous living, since they were deprived of all serious 
office. And the capitahst "parvenus," who came to 
the fore with them, tried to imitate them. 

Thus the royal residences, as distinct from the 
country places and the " provincial towns," became 
not merely the centre of the wealth of the whole 
country, but the centre also of a life of pleasure. This 
exercised a strong hold over those in the country and, 
indeed, many outside, who had the means to live a 
life of enjoyment, or who had the inclination and the 
capacity for acting as ministrants of joy to the 
pleasure-seekers, whom they succeeded in fleecing. 

But more serious-minded people were attracted to 
the residence towns. Whereas the nobles who lived on 
their solitary estates had nothing for pastime except 
tc eat and drink, hunt and make merry with the girls 
of the neighbourhood, the town introduced finer 
manners and pleasures. The nobility began to evince 
an interest in the arts, and the patronising of science 
soon became the "fashion." Thus artists and 
intellectual men soon gathered to the royal residence, 
where they hoped more speedily to gain advance- 
ment. Hie more the bourgeoisie increased in number 
in the residential towns, the more the artists and 
writers flocked to the place, hoping there, alongside 
of the nobility, to find some foothold and a market 
for their wares. Thus it is clear that numbers of 
industrial people and dealers were drawn to the place, 
in order to meet the requirements and needs of all 
these elements. Nowhere was there such prospect of 
making one's fortune as in the royal residence towns 



6 TEBBORISM AND COMMUNISM 

Thither flocked all who had intelligence, self- 
«3onfidenee, and energy. 

Yet it was not everyone who accomplished his 
ohJ€6t. There were numerous eases of failures, who 
formed another characteristic of the capital. They 
were the crowds of the riff-raff proletariat, who sought 
to better themselves in the capital, because it was 
there that they could best hide themselves and await 
the turns of fortune, which they could soon put to 
advantage. They were men such as Eiccaut de la 
Martinifere. Not only art and science, but also 
unbridled pleasure-seeking, along with bitterest poverty 
and frequent crime, became another feature of the 
royal capital. 

Corresponding to the peculiar social position was a 
peculiarity of mental attitude which animated the 
population. But it was not the same in every royal 
residence. Quantity often gave place to quality. 

In a small state, or in a community that was 
economically in a backward condition, the residential 
town was small, so that many of the characteristics 
mentioned above were lacking. In such a town the 
most prominent feature was the dependence of the 
inhabitants on the court, and this dependence was not 
only economical and political, but spiritual as well. 
The mentality .of the courtier became coarser, rougher, 
and more naive, and was reflected in the provincial 
population, who derived their light from the capital. 

This was the origin of the strongly monarchic and 
servile mentality of the German people and its 
attendant "provincialism." It was a mentality which, 
at the time of the rise of the bourgeois democracy, 
brought its pioneers to the forefront. It caused the 
desperate Borne to declare : ' ' Other peoples are 
servants. The Germans are those who are served " — 
a thought more cynically expressed by Heine : 
" Germany, the pious children's nursery, is not a 
Eoman den of murderers." 



PAEIS 7 

But mental and spiritual conditions were different 
in a large royal town. The larger the town, the smaller 
the number and influence of the people attracted to 
the court, as against the rest of the population, who 
sought to establish their fortunes there. The greater 
the number of the disillusioned and dissatisfied, the 
greater became their solidarity and their strength. 
This fitate of affairs did not encourage those people 
alone; it strengthened the opposition of those who, 
without having personal grounds for grievance, never- 
theless clearly recognised the harm from which State 
and society were suffering. Such opposition was 
everywhere rife. In the smaller towns it lay dormant, 
in the larger towns it dared to express itself. 

Among the royal residences of the continent in the 
17th and 18th centuries the largest was Paris, capital 
of the most important State at that time in Europe. 
It numbered, at the end of the 18th century, about 
600,000 inhabitants. Weimar, the royal residence and 
the spiritual centre of Germany, numbered about 
10,000. 

The inhabitants of Paris early showed their rebel-^ 
lious spirit. Thus arose the agitation of the Frondes 
in 1648, which had as its origin the conflict between 
the government and the Paris Parliament, which was 
the supreme tribunal. Barricades were erected, until 
finally the King had to flee Paris. This was in 1649, 
the same year in which Charles First was beheaded 
in England. The struggle lasted until 165^, in which 
year the monarchy had to come to some agreement, 
which, however, soon led to the re-establishment of 
absolutism. The capital had united with the high 
nobility in the fight, and that formed an unequal 
combination. And the high nobility could carry 
nothing to success against the monarchy. Paris had 
not the same power of opposition to act against Louis 
that London had against Charles. 



8 TEEBOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

The struggle of the Frondes took place when Louis 
XIV. was still adolescent. The rising of the Parisians 
and his flight made a deep impression upon him. In 
order not again to experience similar humiliation, he 
established his residence outside Paris. Of course, he 
was obliged to leave the Government machinery 
behind ; but as the settled place for his coutrt he chose 
a spot that was near enough to Paris to ensure a 
permanent and quick means of communication with 
the royal residence, yet far enough distant to be 
protected from any street disturbances. In the year 
1672 the building of his new palace, which was to cost 
him, or rather, his people, a million of francs, was 
begun in Versailles, 12 miles distant from Paris. In 
the coming, centuries it often gave proof that it had 
been built in defiance of the rebels in Paris. 

Although Paris often rose in determined opposition 
to the central power of the State, its attitude towards 
that power did not always give token of unified action. 
On the one hand, it strove for independence and 
detachment from the State power, and yet its wealth 
and power depended on the size of the empire, and on 
the strength of the State power in the empire. It 
strove for the autonomy of the community, and yet 
drew the greater advantage from State centralisation 
which, itself, by its very existence, it enoauraged. 

It was the prominent position of Paris over all other 
parts of the Empire which, in the course of that 18th 
century, welded together the different conquered 
provinces of France in such sotmd national unity. 
Whait otherwise could have united the Alsatians with 
the Bretons, or the Flemings with the Gasooigners? 
But they all had relations with Paris. Their finest sons 
were to be found there, where they merged into one 
single and unified nation. The contradiction occasioned 
by the fact that Paris farmed, at one and at the same 
time, the strongest support of the centralising State 
power, as well as its most vigorous opposition, was 



PAEIS 9 

reflected in the attitude of Paris towards the provinces. 
In Paris the evils and abuses from which the Empire 
was suffering were quickest brought to light. Paris 
had, more than any other place, the courage to expose 
and brand them. It soonest acquired the strength to 
attack them. Hence it became the protagonist of the 
whole of suffering France. The people in the provinces, 
through being scattered about, were backward in 
intelligence, and were dispirited and powerless. They 
saw in Paris their pioneer, their saviour, and they 
often followed the lead given by Paris with the utmost 
enthusiasm. 

Yet not always. For this very Paris became large 
and powerful, not only because of the labours of its 
inhabitants, but also through the exploitation of the 
provinces, which resulted in the lion's share of the 
commodities created in the provinces flowing into 
Paris, where it was partly squandered and partly 
tiurned to account for the accumulation of capital, for 
the enrichment and strengthening of the exploiters and 
profiteers in the country. Hence, along with the 
confidence reposed in progressive Paris, there was 
engendered a genuine hatred of Paris as an exploiting 
capital; thus arose opposition between the royal 
residence and the provinces. According to the 
historical situation, sometimes the one, sometimes the 
other gained the upper hand. 

The economical opposition was rendered more 
striking because of the different points of view, which 
arose from the differences in the social milieu. In the 
open country and in the provinces economic stagnation 
was apparent. Hence the conservatism and adherence 
to traditional moral views. Moreover, whosoever would 
not acknowledge these views had to conceal the fact; 
for in the narrow circles of village and small town 
everyone was under the control of the whole com- 
munity. 



10 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

Such control was entirely lacking in & very large 
town. There one could afford to be bold and laugh to 
scorn obsolete traditions. And these traditions were 
attacked from above as well as from below : that is to 
say, as much/by the arrogant pleasure-seeking nobility 
and the cap-italists as by the masses of the lower 
orders, who in their misery and their continuous 
uncertainty would not be deterred by considerations 
for private property, having lost their respect for 
family life. Between these two sections there stood 
large groups of intellectuals and parasites, who were 
often in as deep misery as the beggar proletariat, 
although they had access to some of the pleasurable 
life enjoyed by the resident nobility and the lafge 
financiers. 

It was no wonder, therefore, that the modest 
bourgeois and the peasants were as much horrified 
by the crass immorality of this Babel of the Seine, as 
the witty Parisians were inclined to deride the barren 
Philistinism and the narrow prejudices of the 
provincials. 

In religious matters the same opposition arose as in 
the case of morals. For the peasants, in their seclusion 
from the world, the cleric was the only educated 
person who troubled about them, who established some 
means of communication between them and the outer 
world, and who supplied them with some knowledge 
beyond the range of the church steeple. The fact that 
this knowledge had long been surpassed by the rapid 
development of science could make no impression on 
the mind of the illiterate peasants in the open country. 
They clung to Church and religion, showing respect, 
however, only for the spiritual treasures of these 
institutions. They showed no inclination to acquire 
for themselves the material possessions of the Church. 

For the Parisians, on the other hand, the Chiurch 
property was of less importance than the influence of 
the Church and her conceptions of religion. 



PAEIS 11 

If in the Middle Ages the Church was a means for 
acquiring and guarding knowledge; the oiyil and 
secular knowledge, ever since the Eenaissance, had 
long surpassed that supplied by the Church. To the 
people of the towns tixe Church appeared to be no 
more a means for extending knowledge, but rather for 
hindering it. The opposition was rendered more bitter 
through the attempt by the clericals to come off equal 
with the secularists (of whose superiority they were 
becoming increasingly aware), by the introduction of 
State measures of repression and compulsion, made in 
their defence. The secularists retaliated with their 
sharpest intellectual weapons and with crushing 
contempt, as well as with the most thorough methods 
of scientific research. They conducted the campaign 
against the Church with all the more zeal and interest, 
because by these methods, and under the conditions 
then prevailing, they bid fair to win over the dominant 
aristocrats and the bureaucrats, or at least to ensure 
their neutral position, provided they, in their zeal, 
should proceed with due caution. For the aristocrats, 
as well as the bureaucrats, not only despised the 
teachings of traditional religion; they found tl.e 
Catholic Church a frequent handicap to them, because 
it would not unconditionally ally itself with rating 
State apparatus. Thus the struggle against the Church 
was less dangerous than the fight with absolutism; 
and hence the rising opposition in the State devoted 
its energy first to settling matters with the Church. 

But even in this we find a certain divergence. The 
reigning bodies set themselves in opposition to the 
Church wherever it showed aspirations to become an 
independent organisation, but the Church nevertheless 
appeared to them to be indispensable as a means for 
keeping the lower orders in subjection. This divergence 
was noticeable even in the circles of the extreme 
intellectuals. Voltaire coined the phrase, " Ecrasen 
I'infame " — "Down with the infamous (Church) " — 



12 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

but he discovered that religion must be preserved for 
the people. 

A simUar cleavage made its appearance in the lower 
ranks of the Paris populace and their leaders. 
Certainly they were all in opposition to the Church, 
and wished to have nothing to do with it. But accord- 
ing to the class position of the proletariat, which is 
always inclined to draw hard conclusions and adopt 
radical solutions, some of their number preached and 
propagated the most thorough-going atheism . and 
materialism. Others there were who were repelled by 
this line of thinking, because it was the creed adopted 
by the aristocrats and capitalist exploiters, especially 
of the revolutionary period. The opposition between 
the believing and the atheistical Socialists was main- 
tained in France up to well in the 19th century. Even 
Louis Blanc in his " History of the French Eevolu- 
tion " placed himself on the side of Eousseau and 
Eobespierre, who, in opposition to the atheists, Diderot 
and Anarchasis Cloots, clung to their belief in God: 
"They realised that atheism sanctifies confusion 
among men because it presupposes anarchy in 
heaven." Louis Blanc overlooked the fact that, for 
the atheist, heaven exists just as little as the Lord 
God himself. As in the case with direct class opposi- 
tion, all these differences and contradictions were 
bound to lead, through a gigantic upheaval like the 
Eevolution, to the bitterest conflicts. 



CHAPTEE III. 

The Great Eevolution. 

Louis XIV., the same who, out of fear, had fled from 
Paris to Versailles, which he chose as his residence, 
succeeded in breaking down the last attempts of the 
nobility to acquire their independence. He was also 
strong enough in the struggles with his neighbours to 
extend his kingdom, and make it one of the greatest 
and most powerful States in Europe. But he attained 
tJiis only after a series of bitter struggles, which left 
France thoroughly exhausted and brought her to the 
very brink of ruin. 

His last war, the Spanish "War of Succession, which 
lasted from 1701 till 1714, and ended unsuccessfully 
for France, would itself have been sufficient to cause 
a revolution, if a strong revolutionary class had already 
been in existence. The bitter feeling against the 
monarch was enormous. That is shown by his death 
in 1715. 

" His burial was carried out in the simplest manner 
possible, in order " to save time and money. ' The 
people of Paris, who now believed itself freed from an 
intolerable yoke, followed the hearse of the great king 
during its passage through the streets, not only shout- 
ing out angry curses and maledictions, but actually 
hurling mud and stones. Bound about the provinces 
there arose a shout of joy, mingled, with curses on the 
deceased. Everywhere thanksgivings were held. The 
good fortune to be delivered from such a despot 
betrayed itself openly and without shame. Peace, 
liberty of action, lowered taxes were the benefits that 
the people hoped to derive from the Eegent." 
(M. Phillippson, " The Period of Louis XIV.," p. 518.) 

13 



14 TEEROEISM AND COMMUNISM 

The people of France were doomed to bitter experi- 
ences with the followers of the " King's Son " before 
they were able, through the great Eevolution, to take 
their own fortunes in their own hands. 

Scarcely had the country begun to recover, to some 
extent, when it was plunged into new wars. From 
1733 to 1735 it was at war with Austria, for the sake of 
Poland and Lorraine ; 1740 to 1748 it took part in the 
Austrian War of Succession on the side of Prussia 
against Maria Theresa and England; 1778 to 1783 
they were able, through the great Revolution, to take 
their own fortunes into their own hands. 

' ' These wars not only ruined the country ; they were 
so miserably conducted, that they brought the Frpnch 
no military glory whatever." (Eossbach). 

Absolntism, with the help of the rising bourgeoisie, 
had overthrown the feudal nobility — not, however, in 
order to abolish it, but rather to exercise unlimited 
power over it. The monarch felt that the nobility 
were indispensable to him. He chose as leaders of the 
State policy, and of the army, members of the nobility 
who still showed devotion to him ; but at the same time 
he deprived this same nobility of all independence. 
He degraded them until they led a parasitic life of 
pleasure, thus allowing them to become morally and 
spiritually decadent, and leading them on to economic 
ruin. 

The more apparent the moral, intellectual and 
economic bankruptcy of the nobility became, the 
greater were the claims of that nobility on the 
peasantry, the more excessive their oppression and 
subjection, and the more did their agricultural pursuits 
lose in economic certainty. At the same time, the 
claims of the nobles on the unhappy peasants, whom 
they regarded as the chief contributors to the taxes, 
increased enormously. For the nobility, not content 
with having ruined the State through their diplomacy 
and military ventures, sought to compensate them- 



THE GEEAT EBVOLUTION 15 

sf'lves for their economic decline by resorting to 
plunder. In this they had tha Church as well as the 
monarchy to aid them, for they represented the great 
landed proprietors of the State. 

Over against these desperate conditions in Paris was 
to be found a strong and rapidly rising bourgeoisie, 
with a numerous body of intellectuals, who quickly 
realised the evils affecting the State and social order, 
and who branded them more unsparingly and denounced 
them more destructively than any intellectuals in other 
large cities in Europe could have done. And below 
them was a small bourgeoisie, the most powerful and 
with the greatest amount of self-assurance in Europe, 
as well as a proletariat than which none was more 
numerous, more concentrated, more desperate and 
determined. 

A fearful conflict was inevitable as soon as these 
opposing forces should become arraigned against one 
another. It broke out when finally the monarchy 
could do no more, and at a time when financial ruin 
was threatening, since no financier would advance 
more credit. 

The feudal councils, which had not met since 1614, 
and which embodied a permanent representation of 
the nobility, the clericals, the ordinary citizens, were 
called upon to help, to sanction new taxes and loans, 
and so help to raise the credit of bankrupt absolutism, 
and infuse it with fresh life. The elections for the 
individual councils were proclaimed in 1789, and the 
elected were summoned to the King's palace at 
Versailles. 

However, with the exception of the eourtiers, all 
classes were too embittered against the reigning 
system. These councils, after their convention on 
May 5, 1789, set about reforming the taxes and loans, 
instead of creating new ones. But on this matter the 
nobles and the clericals had somewhat different views 
from the bourgeoisie. These were victorious through 



IH TEEBOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

their hostile attitude towards these councils. The 
general councils were formed into a constituent 
National Assembly, which gave France an entirely new 
constitution. 

The power of the National Assembly was at first 
only a moral power. It reposed in the consciousness 
that by far the great majority of the nation was behind 
it. But that by no means sheltered it against a coup 
d'etat of a physical order. The monarchy still had at 
its command such power — the army, for instance — and 
it was quite prepared to make use of it if necessary. 

But they had to bear in mind the physical strength 
which still lay at the disposal of Paris. It was only 
when Paris had been overcome that they dared to hope 
to dismember the National Assembly, and to bend it 
to its will. Hence numerous troops were marshalled 
together in Paris ; and when it was thought that all 
was safe the coup d'etat followed, and the dismissal 
of the Minister, Neoker, whom the National Assembly 
had endeavoured to force the King to accept (July 12, 
1789). 

Whether Paris had taken this event quite calmly or 
whether it had come into conflict with the troops, the 
fate of the Eevolution would' have been sealed. But 
Paris rose up; the King's troops failed; the proletariat 
and the small bourgeois masses broke into the 
^Invalides,' captured some 30,000 pieces of arms, and 
stormed the fortress that lay before the revolutionary 
suburb, viz., the Bastille (July 14, 1789). 

But now the King and his courtiers combined, and 
the peasants rose in revolt throughout the length and 
breadth of the land. Already before there had been 
instances of single peasant risings, which had been 
easily quelled. But now no power could withstand the 
storm that arose. Paris at that time saved the 
Eevolution and made it" general. 

Gradually it seemed as if the storm was abating. 
Th» King and his feudal courtiers regained courage; 



THE GEBAT EBVOLUTION 17 

he began to oppose certain decisions of the National 
Assembly and to muster new troops. So the Parisians 
came to the conclusion that they could never be safe 
as long as the heads of the State, the King and the 
National Assembly, remained in Versailles. They 
wished to bring these under their supervision and 
direct influence. On October 5, 1789, large bands of 
people tramped to Versailles and fetched the King back 
to Paris. The people now hoped to have peace, and 
to be able to devote their energies to the building up 
of the constitution and to practical work, from which 
they expected, as a consequence of improved conditions., 
to derive advantage and benefit. On July 14, 1790, 
Louis XVI. swore fidelity to the constitution, although 
much against his will. He felt himself a prisoner in 
the Tuileries, and all the acts of his Government were 
repugnant to him. 

Not a year had passed, since his taking of the oath 
to the constitution, when he secretly fled (June 21, 
1791), and was misguided enough, before he had 
reached safety, to explain himself to the masses of the 
people. He left behind a document in which he 
declared that all his orderings and decrees since 
October, 1789, had been wrung from him against his 
will, and that he pronounced them null and void. This 
was a very premature move on his part; for while in 
flight he was recognised, taken prisoner, and brought 
back to Paris. 

Even at that time a large section of the embittered 
masses demanded the dethronement of the King; but 
the monarchical instincts of the masses of the people 
were too deep-seated to make such a step successful. 
But it saved Louis, for at that moment it was only 
dethronement with which he was threatened. 

He had worse fate when France, under his 
monarchy, became involved in war with the allied 
monarchies of Europe (April, 1792). This was not a 
war, like the preceding, for more or less land. It was 



18 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

a war of the feudal nobility and of European 
AbEolutism against a people that had gained its 
freedom, and which was now in danger of coming 
under the yoke onoe more. It was a real crivil war, 
with all the atteadant cruelties that characterise civil 
wars. The country's enemy threatened the revolu- 
tionary people with total destruction, and their own 
King was an ally of the country's enemy. 

In this situation the monarchical idea lost all its 
power; nevertheless the National Assembly could not 
yet decide to discard it. It was the Parisians who 
again insisted that Louis should be taken captive and 
a new National Assembly convened, called the Con- 
vention, which should give Prance a new republican 
constitution (August 10, 1792). In the first sitting 
this- new Convention unanimously decided on the 
abolition of the monarchy (September 21, 1792). But 
the Parisians believed that the safety of the Eepublic 
would not be ensured so long as Louis XVI. still lived. 
They demanded that he should be put on trial for 
treason. The majority of the Convention recoiled 
before this measure. But the rage of the Parisians 
was irresistible when they heard that a secret cup- 
board in the Tuileries had been discovered containing 
a series of documents. These documents proved that 
the King had bought over a number of Parlia- 
mentarians, among them Mirabeau ; and that a number 
of his guards, who had fought in the ranks of the 
Austrians against France, had even during that war 
drawn payment from him. 

In spite of all, a section of the Convention 
endeavoured to save the King. They wanted to appeal 
to the people of France. Through a general election 
Louis's fate was to be determined. 

This attempt to play off the Provinces against Paris 
met with most determined apposition on the part of 
the Parisians. Fear of them over-ruled the Conven- 
tion. The appeal to the people was rejected by 423 



THE GREAT REVOLUTION 19 

votes against 276. Thus was Louis' fate settled, aad 
he mounted the scaSold on January 21, 1793. 

The Republican Party that pleaded mosifc for the 
King at the time were the so-called Girondists, who 
had derived their name from the fact that the candi- 
dates who first formed the nucleus of the party had 
been elected in the Province of the Gironde. They 
were the most furious haters of Paris, whose power 
they wished to break. They wanted France to become 
a Federal State. 

" Four days after the opening of the Convention, the 
Girondist, Lasource, amid the applause of his eon- 
federates, reiterated the words : — " And I will not have 
Paris led by a band of intriguers, uot let her become for 
France what Rome at one time was for the Roman 
Empire. The influence of Paris must be reduced to the 
83rd part, to that share which every other province has 
equally." (Kumow " The Parties in the Great French 
Revolution," page 349). 

The opposition between the Girondists and Paris 
assumed the wildest forms. In the revolts of May 31 
to June 2, 1793, the Parisians Succeeded in carrying 
out their demand for the expulsion and arrest of thirty- 
four Girondists. The answer to this was the murder of 
Marat by the Girondiste, Charlotte Corday, of Nor- 
mandy (July 13) and soon after the attempt by the 
Girondists to instigate Normandy, Brittany and the 
South of France against the Convention — all this 
during the war. Whereupon the Parisians retaliated,, 
and they carried out (on October 31) the execution of 
all the Girondists who could be found in Paris. 



CHAPTEK IV. 

The First Paris Commune. 

The Paris Proletariat and its Fighting Methods. 

Hitherto we have always spoken of the "Parisians." 
Naturally not the whole population of Paris is to be 
included under this head, for there were many classes 
in sharp contrast to one another. By the " Parisians " 
the great mass of the population in the capital was to 
be understood, viz., the small bourgeoisie and the 
proletariat. 

Under the latter we must not think of the modem 
proletarian, who is the outcome of gross industry. 
Certainly there were some manufacturens in Paris; 
but the largest section of their workmen was either 
engaged in service of the most varied kind as 
labourers and porters, or it formed a body of artisans' 
apprentices, who hoped one day themselves to become 
independent artisans. Besides these, there were 
countless small labourers as home workers, as well as 
middle-men of all kinds, who lived in bitterest poverty 
and the moat wretched insecurity. 

This poverty and insecurity made the social position 
proletarian; whereas by their class position, i.e., 
according to the sources of their income, they wereismaill 
bourgeois, whose ideal was a comfortable bourgeois 
existence. Nothing is more misleading than the con- 
fusion between position according to income and posi- 
tion according to class. This confusion was made by 
Lassalle, and is being made to-day by those of our. 
Eussian comrades, who believe that the poor peasant 
has other class interests than the rich peasant, and 
has the same class interest as the wage-earning prole- 

ao 



THE FIEST PAEIS COMMUNE 21 

tariat of the towns. This is just as false as the 
conclusion of those who believe that the small 
capitalists have other class interests than the large 
capitalists, and that their opposition to the capital 
of finance goes together with the class opposition of 
the proletariat to capital. The small capitalists wish 
to become big capitalists, the small peasantry also 
wish to increase their property — this, and not a 
Socialist society is their object. The former just 
as much as the latter wish to increase their income 
at the expense of the workmen, the small peasants 
through low wages and long working hours, the small . 
capitalists through high prices for food. 

The poor elements in Baris, therefore, at the time 
of the great revolution were, according to their class 
position, small bourgeois, in spite of the proletarian 
conditions of their existence. 

These conditions gave them no objects which were 
different from those of the better-placed small 
bourgeois, although they gave them means for the 
growing struggle which were less sympathetic to the 
more prosperous small bourgeois. 

The starving man cannot wait. He is in despair, 
and, therefore, does not stop to consider his choice of 
means. For him little attaches to life ; he has nothing 
to lose save his bonds, and he, therefore, risks every- 
thing during the time of an upheaval, which shall 
prepare for new conditions of things, and in which 
he hopes to gain the world. 

Thus it was the proletariat, the great mass of the 
population of Paris, which formed the great driving 
power in the Eevolution. Their desperate incon- 
siderateness made them masters of Paris, made Paris 
the ruler of France, and let France triumph over 
Europe. 

Their fighting means lay in armed insurrection. Their 

risings were not unprepared, nor did they spring them- 

. selves from out of the prevailing conditions. They 



22 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

were much more organised, /Still, they did nevei*the- 
less arise from the spontaneousT pressure of the masses, 
not oftheirleaderslTtod it was only through the masses 
th at E!fe5e -« s ntga were often irresistible in their force. 
An upheaval, which has to be fomented by the leaders, 
instead of these latter being forced from beLow, is a 

gi|Drn t.hat. f];^f. nPf>Af;fj.f^rY driving force is wa,n<ii^7fr, a.Wfl 

th at the whole movement is d oomed to failur e. 
During tne w4oie uime of th6 growtn of tlie itevolu- 
tion, it was the masses who were the driving force, the 
leaders the driven. While this lasted things moved 
forward. When the contrary happened, and the 
leaders found it necessary to incite the masses to fight, 
the Eevolution was already in decline. 

But if an upheaval can reckon on success only when 
it is spontaneous, and not initiated by the leaders, this 
is not to say that it has the best chance of winning 
when it is not organised. The Paris insurrections of 
the Great Eevolution had their foundations in the 
organisation of the masses. 

Even in the first signs of disturbance, in the 
storming of the Bastille, there were already nuclei for 
organisation. Later they received closer and more 
permanent foundation. 

In the Eevolution ea<3h community claimed for itself 
the greater independence. The Constitutional 
Assembly by the law of December 22, 1789, estab- 
lished the conditions which, in consequence of the 
sudden loss of power on the part of the State, had 
everywhere come into being. The commimities 
acquired a high level of self-administration, viz., the 
control of the whole of the local poMoe and the com- 
mand of the citizen guard, as well as of the National 
Guard, which was being formed in the towns. 

But at the same time the bourgeoisie strove to keep 
the lower classes from sharing in their measure of 
power. The National Assembly made the fine 
distinction between active and passive citizens. Active 



THE FIEST PAKIS COMMUNE '23 

were those who paid a direct tax on at least three 
days' wages. They alone had the vote for the local 
council and for the National Assembly. From them 
alone the National Guard was recruited. These bodies 
afterwards developed into representative associations 
of the moneyed classes. 

But in Paris the " passive " citizens organised also, 
as well as their friends from the ranks of the active 
citizens, along with the official local representative 
council. They armed themselves in their own way. 

For the purposes of Voting Paris was divided into 
60 districts, which had to select the candidates. After 
these had been named, the districts disappeared. But 
they nevertheless remained, and became organised on 
their own initiative as permanent institutions of the 
municipal administration. They would not suffer 
repression, and at the time when before July 14 (the 
storming of the Bastille) all Paris was in a state of 
upheaval, they began to arm the people, and to act 
as independent authorities. After the conquest of 
the Bastille the districts had already become acknow- 
ledged institutions of the niunicipal administration. 
In order to come to some understanding, a central 
bureau was opened, where special delegates could come 
together, and have mutual exchange of thought. In 
this way there arose the first attempt at a Commune — 
the result of a movement upwards by means of a 
uniting of the district organisations, which in revolu- 
tionary fashion had come about through the initiative 
given by the people. While the National Assembly 
was gradually undermining the power of the King, the 
districts and then the sections gradually enlarged their 
sphere of activity among the people. They estab- 
lished the connection between Paris and the provinces, 
and prepared the ground for the revolutionary Com- 
mune of August 10. 

(Kropotkin, "The French Eevolution," 1, pages 
174-179. In accordance with his anarchistic 



24 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

standpoint, Kropotkin has given special importance to 
the history of the Commune in the Eevolution. Apart 
from special works, his books afford the best study of 
this history. As a consequence, he treats the 
Parliamentary activity at the time far less satisfac- 
torily.) 

The National Assembly tried to put an end to the 
District Councils. Through the law of May 27, 1790, 
the division of the constituencies in Paris was altered. 
But the " passive " citizens ignored the veto. The 
sections were now the central point of revolutionary 
activity. Soon there was no communal or State 
question which was not taken over by these sections, 
and in the settling of which they were not actively 
concerned. The result of this was that the general 
assembly of these sections became a permanent 
institution. It was only through the permanency of 
their nature that intensive activity could be 
developed. 

On August 10, 1792, the sections entirely superseded 
communal representation, which had already become 
totally eJBEete, and they formed something new, the 
revolutionary Commune, to which each section sent 
three commissioners. Thenceforward, it was this 
Paris Commune which, supported by these sections, 
determined the course of the revolution. 

The subsequent works on history have failed to give 
the sections their due. Their work was performed 
by the nameless many. The great names of the 
Eevolution shone more in the Club of the Jacobins 
than in the sections. But what the Club achieved 
owed its success to the secticns, and often it was the 
Club which was the part that hesitated and hung back. 
Only the proletariat, which had nothing to lose, was 
able to rush without hesitation boldly into the 
unknown. 



THE PIEST PAEIS COMMUNE 25 

The Origins of the Eegiment op Terror. 

Through the Commune the proletariat of Paris 
arrived at a dominating position in revolutionary 
Prance. But this position was a divided one, like the 
position of Paris in the country, and like that of the 
proletariat of that time in general society. 

Small bourgeois according to their class-conscious- 
ness, they adopted the point of view of private property 
as against the means of production. They could not 
get rid of private property, they needed it in order to 
go on producing and live. Yet their attitude as poor 
wretches was one of hostility to the property of the 
rich, whose prosperity angered them, and whose wealth 
arose from their misery. It was this very recklessness 
towards the great feudal and capitalist property which 
gave them that energy in fighting the counter-revolu- 
tion, and which, thanks to the pre-eminent position 
of Paris, made them pioneers of the Eevolution, in 
which the great bulk of the nation took such active 
interest. In their powerful struggles against feudalism 
and the monarchy in France, and against the whole 
monarchical system of Europe, the revolutionary 
proletariat of Paris had behind it the whole strength 
of the nation, the most powerful nation in the world. 
As a result they were able to defy the men in power 
all the world over; indeed, the power of these men 
came into their hands. It was during that time that 
the powerful revolutionary self-consciousness of the 
Paris workman came into being. Through it he 
became the much admired type of the whole fighting 
international proletariat up to the days of the second 
Paris Commune, and even up to the closing decades 
of the last century 

Yet this very class represented the worst consumers 
of Paris, for they imperatively demanded cheap food- 
stuffs, and never more than in the days of the great 
revolution, which, in the literal sense of the word, could 



26 TEEEORISM AND COMMUNISM 

be called a famine revolt. In consequence, the poor 
of Paris were drawn into increasing conflict with the 
peasants, the middlemen, the moneyed people, with 
those elements in fact which, by reason of their private 
property, came off best in regard to the means of pro- 
duction, since the abolition of privpate property wag 
impossible owing to the system of retail dealing then 
prevalent, nor was any such abolition attempted or 
even proposed. When in regard to this antithesis the 
proletarians tried to show their power in Paris, and 
the pov.'er of Paris over the provinces, they were made 
to realise that they could not for long as a minority 
maintain themselves against the majority. So they 
went to pieces in spite of their former triumphs. 

The proletarians went into the Eevolution expecting 
to banish all misery by getting rid of the misery of 
feudalism, in the same way as the bourgeoisie had 
promised and meant. They now seized political free- 
dom and power, and still it was only the bourgeois and 
the peasant who arrived at any measure of prosperity. 
Poverty in the large towns was not diminished; on 
the contrary, the real pinch of poverty first began 
to make itself really felt. 

Starvation and a rise in prices are the outstanding 
features of the whole time of revolution. They are 
generally explained as being due to the fact that a 
number of bad harvests followed in succession. . To me, 
however, it seems that the starvation during the 
Eevolution was not due to this alone, but was a direct 
consequence of the Revolution itself. 

Production among the peasants was at that time, to 
a high degree, self-suflBcing. The peasant had scarcely 
any need of the industrial products of the town, except 
for articles of luxury. He produced not only his own 
food-stuffs, but also the raw materials for textile 
industry which he himself manufactured. He also 
eonstructed his own simple furniture and many of his 
household tools, whatever else he needed in the 



THE FIEST PAEIS COMMUNE 27 

industrial line was furnished him by village workmen. 
The fact that, in spite of ttiis, he did Sell his produce 
in the town was due not to his own industrial needs, 
but to the taxes with which the State had burdened 
him. He could not pay these if he did not bring to 
market his com, cattle, wine, or whatever else he pro- 
duced at home. 

Besides all this, he had to pay his feudal lord in 
kind, as well as to perform a certain amount of forced 
labour on his lord's estate. Of the land products, 
which these feudal lords thus amassed, only a small 
portion was used for home consumption ; the greater 
part they sold, in order to get money for a life of 
pleasure in the town. 

Taxes and feudal obligations therefore provided the 
monies, on the one hand, which flowed into Paris and 
there reached circulation; they also provided, on the 
other hand, the produce which was sold for bare cash 
to provision Paris. 

The Revolution temporarily put an end to feudal 
obligation, as well as to taxes, as the State had no- 
power to collect these. The peasants were therefore no 
longer in such necessity to sell as they were before. In 
the first place, they made use of their newly-gained 
freedom to eat to their fill, and to put an end to the 
starvation conditions, to which State and Feudalism 
had condemned them. What remained over of their 
produce they decided to sell, only at very high prices. 
Nothing henceforward forced them to sell cheaply. 
For that reason alone a rise in prices and a contrast 
between Paris and the Provinces was boimd to arise, 
and this contrast assumed an exaggerated form. In 
1793 the Convention had actually formed a revolu- 
tionary army of 10,000 men, whose duty it was to scour 
the villages and requisition food for Paris, in a similar 
way to that recently tried in Russia, and with equal 
failure. This is one of the features that makes the 
Russian Revolution of to-day assume great resem- 



28 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

blance, even in external mattem, to the great bourgeois 
Eevolution of the 18th century. 

The contrast was made even more drastic by the war, 
which led to France's being " encircled," and which 
hindered the lack of provision from being mitigated by 
any import from without. It made the Parisians suffer 
still more from hunger, and loaded the country people 
with heavy war bin-dens, in the shape of universal 
conscription. 

The Parisians had the strongest motives for desiring 
victory. They, as a revolutionary centre, would have 
been the first to feel defeat. Moreover in Paris 
national feeling was strongest developed. On the 
greatness and the strength of the Empire directly 
depended the greatness and strength of Paris. The men 
of the " Mountain," of the extreme left of the Conven- 
tion coined the phrase — "the one indivisible Eepublic," 
and the word " Patriot " soon had the significance of 
radical revolutionary. 

Utterly different w.as the attitude of the peasants 
towards the war. Those on the frontier certainly 
wanted to be rid of a foreign invasion, and they of all 
others were most threatened with the return of feudal 
bondage through a fbreign victory. They, therefore, 
felt as patriotic as the Parisians. That was especially 
true of the Alsatians. It was different for those who 
were far removed from the frontier, and thus were not 
threatened by foreign invasion. These peasants did 
not grasp the political import of the war. They only 
felt the burdens of war which, according to them, were 
imposed on them by the regioidal and godless Parisians. 
Such provinces as La Vendee, Normandy and 
Brittany, under certain circumstances, could go so far 
in their opposition to Paris as to proceed to an open 
revolt, whenever they could get the necessary leader- 
ship. This was provided from time to time by the 
anti-revolutionary aristocrats. But the revolutionary 
bourgeois also embodied in the Girondistes, Mice 



THE PIEST PAEIS COMMUNE 29 

attempted a similar revolt of the provinces against 
Paris, as we have already seen. 

The financiers likewise came along with the peasants 
into conflict with the proletarians and the small bour- 
geois. Indeed, the opposition was even more 
pronounced, and had even more direct consequences. 
It was not an opposition between workmen and indus- 
trial capitalists, who at the time did not play a very 
large part. Even after the Bevolution St. Simon 
reckoned these latter among the working classes. It 
was the opposition to moneyed and trade capital, to 
usurers, speculators, dealers and sellers. These men 
did not themselves cause the lack of provisions, but 
they exploited the calamity and increased the stress. 
We need not dwell on this. We ourselves have had 
terrible experience of this for the last five years. 

During this time of misery, profiteering caused by 
high prices became grossly provocative. Along with 
this was to be classed the profiteering of the war eon- 
tractors — since 1792 — as well as of those who 
speculated in laud. The National Assembly had con- 
fiscated church possessions — perhaps a third of the 
French landed property. 

In addition to this, the aristocratic emigrants, who 
had fled from Prance in order to fight the revolution 
from without, were Ukewise deprived of their property. 
Their land was also confiscated. Yet all this enormous 
property did not remain in the possession of the State, 
nor was it divided among the poor peasants, but sold 
up. This, in the first instance, was the result of the 
low state of finance, which gave the final blow that 
caused the Revolution. But the Bevolution did not raise 
the state of finance; on the other hand, it was depre- 
ciated, because the peasants could no longer pay their 
taxes. Often those who made a profit out of the 
selling of confiscated land-property would buy new 
tracts of land at a low price, solely with the intention 
of parcelling them up and selling them in small sections 



30 TEEEOBISM AND COMMUNISM 

at a high price. The financial difficulties of the State 
were little helped by this means, but the speculators in 
property flourished exceedingly. 

In her necessity there was no other means open to 
the State than the issue of revolutionary paper money. 
This soon began to grow to an enormous extent. 
Hence a new cause of high prices arose, as well as a 
cause for extraordinary fluctuation of exchange and 
prices, which state of affairs was again turned to their 
own advantage by the speculators and moneylenders. 

Thus there grew up from among the ruins of the old 
feudal system of property a new capitalistic System^ 
which grew, along with the general distress, in propor- 
tion as the proletariat rose to power. This strftnge 
situation showed clearly enough how little the ftiere 
possession of political power is able to affect the work- 
ing of economic laws, so long as the necessary social 
conditions are lacking. Nevertheless the proletariat of 
Paris was hungry. 

They did not examine what, under the given 
economical conditions, was possible and what was 
inevitable. They were in power, and determined to 
make the most of it, in order to arrive at that Utopian 
state of equality and brotherhood and of general 
prosperity, which the intellectuals among the 
bourgeoisie had promised them. As they could not 
alter the process of production, they tried by the help 
of coercive means to change the results of this process 
— means of which our own days have given us more 
than enough, viz!., high prices, compulsory loans, which 
correisponded taughly to our war-credit and feSmilar 
measures. All of these, however, were less capable of 
diminishing the distress than they are to-dfly, on 
accoimt of the scattered production, the lack of 
statistics, and the paralysing of the central power in its 
relation to the districts, which existed at that time. 

As time went on, the contradiction between the 
political strength of the proletariat and its economical 



THE FIRST PAEIS COMMUNE Si 

situation became greater. And along with this 
the oppression caused by the war became worse. 
Hence the rulers among the proletariat in their despair 
turned more and more to outward methods, to bloody 
intimidation and terrorism. 



Thk Failoee of Terrorism. 

Through the Commune the revolutionary bourgeoi.? 
and proletariat of Paris ruled the whole of Prance. 
But they took care not to exercise their power directly, 
and to give as their watchword : — ' ' All power to the 
Commune." They knew that the Empire was to be 
held together and ruled only by an Assembly that repre- 
sented the whole Empire. They therefore avoided 
touching on the convention in the National Assembly. 
They maintained their power not without the Conven- 
tion nor even against it, but through it. 

Lenin must have formed a similar plan, otherwise 
it would be difficult to discover why he convoked the 
constitution, instead of allowing votes for it to be 
taken. Yet the Commune was more fortunate than 
he ; for it understood how to make use of tliis important 
instrument, which Lenin on the very first day un- 
willingly cast aside. 

Certainly the " mountain " in the Convention, which 
went hand in hand with the Commune, was in the 
minority; nevertheless, the majority was not made up 
of politicians of strong character and firm conviction. 
Many of them proved to be uncertain and hesitating. 
They allowed themselves to be influenced by the Paris 
milieu ; and where that was not strong enough to cau&e 
them to vote with the " mountain " it was sufficient 
to place energetic pressure on them, to make them 
vote as was desired. 



32 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

By means of these moUusee, of this " bog," the 
" Mountain" was able to occupy a majority in the 
Convention. 

Yet in the stress of timer which often demanded 
swift measures, the legislating activity of the Conven- 
tion was not always satisfactory. And even the laws 
proved to be ineffectual to cope with social need and 
necessity. Every oppressive law, be it never so strict, 
puts limitations on its sphere of activity, if only for the 
reason that it enjoins certain rules which give the 
oppressed occasion and opportunity, with a little skill, 
to turn them to their own advantage. This policy of 
oppression, which is directed against phenomena that 
are closely bound up with existing relations and are 
therefore ineradicable, is obliged sooner or later to 
liberate itself from the shackles of laws which itself 
has formed, and to have recourse to lawless oppression 
and finally to Dictatorship. 

This, and this alone, is the real meaning of the word 
Dictatorship : it is a form of government, not merely 
a state of affairs. It represents arbitrary force, which 
by its very nature can be put into practice by one person 
alone, or only by a very small circle of persons, know- 
ing how to operate without any formal conditions, or 
willing to be led by one man alone. To ensure col- 
laboration, every large circle requires definite rules, 
an administration, etc. — in other words, it is already 
bound by laws. 

Tlie type of dictatorship as a form of government 
lies in personal dictatorship. Class dictatorship is 
pure nonsense. Class-rule without laws and regula- 
tions is unthinkable. 

Since the repressive measures against profiteers^ 
speculators and counter-revolutionaries hopelessly 
failed, the proletarian element had recourse to a 
dictatorship. 

As early as March 25th, 1793, the Convention had 
to form a " Committee of Public Safety and General 



THE FIEST PAEIS COMMUNE 33 

Defence," which gradually acquired the powers of an 
absolute autocracy, whose members were very small 
in number. At first this Committee consisted of 25, 
which number was afterwards reduced to 9. All con- 
sultations were seoi-et. It controlled ministers and 
generals, appointed and dismissed officials and officers. 
It dispatched commissioners with unlimited powers 
and could take whatever measures it regarded as 
necessary. These measures had to be carried out by 
the ministers without question. It was indeed 
responsible to the National Assembly, but this was 
a mere formality, as that body literally trembled 
before the Committee. Restrictions were laid on the 
powers of this Committee to some extent at least; 
for it was ordained that the Committee should be re- 
elected each month, and that it should have no control 
over the State treasury. Soon this " Committee of 
Public Safety " became the exclusive organ of the 
"Mountain." But the more the dictatorial orderings 
of this body increased the greater became the dic- 
tatorial power of a single personality in their midet, 
viz., Eobespierre. 

As further instruments of the dictatorship two 
other institutions were created: (a) a Police Com- 
mittee, called the Committee of General Security, 
and (b) the Extraordinary Eevolutionary Tribunal, 
which had to adjudge in all cases of counter-revolu- 
tionary activity, and of attacks on the liberty, equality 
and inviolability of the Fatherland. 

To be suspected and denounced by a " Patriot" 
was sufficient for a man to be condemned to death, 
and indeed without any chance of appeal. 

Louis Blanc, in his " History of the French Revolu- 
tion," has given the following account of the organisa- 
tion of the Reign of Terror. 

" We find a tireless Club, that of the Jacobins, which 
animated Paris with its life. 

" Paris, which has been divided up into groups of 



34 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

inhabitants called ' Sections,' gives expression to the 
ideas and thoughts prevailing in the Club. 

"The Commune, the centre of the 'Sections,' 
formulates these ideas and thoughts into laws. 

" The ' Committee of Public Safety ' infuses life into 
these laws in all the various departments of State 
activity — in the State administration, in the choice 
of officials, in the^army, through the commissioners; 
in the provinces, -$iid in every part of the Eepublic, 
through the revolutionary committees. 

' ' The ' Committeie of Public Security ' has the task 
of exposing all objectionable and disagreeable elements. 

" The extraordinary Eevolutionary Tribunal hastens 
to punish them. " 

" Such was the revolutionary machine." 

(" Histoire de la Eevolution Fran^aise, Bruxelles, 
1856, II. p. 519.")^. 

In the most unspaHng manner this fearful apparatus 
was set to work. X 

It was hoped, by this means, to get the better of the 
smugglers, the extortioners, and speculators, especially 
if smugglers, extortioners and speculators were sum- 
marily beheaded. 

But the economical situation was less calculated 
than ever before to encourage the belief, that in manual 
labour of any kind lay a gold-mine. And more than 
ever before each individual became a victim of the 
worst misery, in the larger towns at least, if he had 
money, and a good deal of money, at his disposal. 
The Eegiment of Terror did not shrink from striving 
for gold, only, it strove to get what it coveted by 
underhand methods. Hence a new source of self- 
enrichment, and corruption arose in the form of 
bribery. 

The more dangerous it became to be caught, the 
more inclined were the people " wanted " to buy off 
and silence the exposer of their misdeeds by appro- 
priate offers of part of their spoils. And the greater 



THE FIEST PAEIS COMMUNE 35 

the misery, the greater was the temptation on the 
part of individual bodies of the revolutionary adminis- 
tration to make a source of profit out of shutting their 
eyes. 

In this way, despite the furious activity of the 
guiUotine, new property was being accumulated, and 
other capitalists grew up in the place of those who had 
been beheaded; nor did hunger and famine diminish. 

These new capitalists sprang up direct from the small 
bovirgeoisie, the proletariat, and the ranks of the revo- 
lutionaries, with whom they proved themselves to be 
among the most desperate and the most cunning, by 
no means, hotvever, among those of strongest 
character. But the best elements among the revo- 
lutionaries, the disinterested,, and the most- self- 
sacrificing were, at the same time, involved in continual 
struggles at the frontier, as well as in civil wax®. Thus 
the ranks of the revolutionary proletariat were depleted 
from two sides through the death of the best elements, 
and the gradual appearance of the most vicious aoad 
hardened among them in the class of adventurers. It 
lost on both sides its most energetic members. The 
remainder became more and more apathetic and dis- 
couraged. The revolution had been going on for four 
years; it had brought the peasants and the financiers 
privileges, even wealth; but for the proletariat, who 
had fought with most energy and self-sacrifice, and 
who ultimately succeeded in uniting in their hands the 
power of France, the revolution had nothing to offer. 
It did not even satisfy their hunger; on the contrary, 
it increased it. Even the bloody regiment of terror 
fared no better. What had it indeed to expect from 
politics? Doubt, distrust and exhaustion began to 
make their presence felt amongst them. 

It soon came to pass that the ruling powers in the 
Paris Commune had vast demands to settle. We have 
seen already that the power of the various " sections " 
consisted in th6 fact that all citizens took permanent 



36 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

active interest in their doings. Moreover, these sec- 
tions were meeting uninterruptedly, and themselves 
had to settle all matters connected with administration 
and political action. But as time went on that 
became impossible; the proletarians and the small 
bourgeoisie had to be productive in their labours. How 
otherwise were they to Uve? With occasional work, 
which might at any moment be broken o£E, they could 
not proceed very far. So long as the revolutionary 
fire glowed within them, and so long as they hoped 
to derive economic benefit from a revolutionary policy, 
they endeavoiured to make the best of their conditions. 
The more they began to doubt, the more they sought 
salvation in productive labour, instaad of in politics. 
They became more and more willing to allow one 
department after another to pass into the hands of the 
various sections. They allowed these sections to 
appoint State-paid officials, whereby the bureaucratic 
centralisiation of the Empire, which was to come later, 
was gradually introduced. At the same time, the 
prosperous people and their followers in the section*, 
to whom they made payments in some form or other, 
soon outnumbered the others; for the simple reason 
that they were men of leisure and could find time to 
meet, whereas the proletarians and the small bour- 
geois, who were bound to work for a living, appeared 
less and less .at the meetings. Hence, there was a 
danger that the former should gain the majority over 
the latter. 

A sign of the decline of revolutionary activity in the 
sections is furnished by the decision of the Convention, 
given on September 9, 1793, which limited the num- 
ber of sittings to two in the week, and granted to esich 
member, who had to work for his living, the sum of 
two francs for each sitting. But this did not check 
the growing slackness in attendance. 

Along with this there was also a marked change in 
the relations between the masses and their leaders. 



fHE FIEST PARIS COMMUNE 37 

During the period when the revolution was on the 
increase, it was the masses who urged on the 
leaders, inspiring them with energy apd confidence in 
victory. Such is the proper relation between the 
masses and the leaders, whenever and wherever any 
popular movement is to meet with success. The leaders 
will always display more hesitancy than the masses, 
whenever a revolution is in progress ; because they, more 
than the masses, can take better account of possible 
eventualities, and see better than they the difficulties 
that are bound to arise. 

But this time the leaders were in a position in which 
they needed renewed energy on the part of the masses 
if they were to maintain themselves and not be com- 
pletely submerged. For the masses were becoming 
exhausted, and began more and more to doubt and 
despair. So it fell to the leaders to spur on the people, 
to rouse and inspire them. Such a condition of things 
always betokens in any popular movement that the 
inward strength is lacking, that it has not yet acquired 
that strength, or has lost it already. 

In order to encourage the people, the regime in 
power had to give the appearance of possessing strength ; 
it was obliged to intoxicate them and thus make them 
oblivious of the want of social and economic success. 
This effect was best obtained by inciting the lust for 
blood. So this was a further reason for continuing the 
system of Terrorism, indeed, for increasing it and mak- 
ing it more effective. Finally, the growing nervousness 
of the men in power, occasioned by the feeling they 
had that the ground was slipping away from under 
their feet, helped materially to the same result. With 
the desperation that followed, the bitterness increased, 
not only against those who were enjoying class privi- 
lege, but also against members of their own faction, 
who held the same general principles as they, though 
differing in minor details. Thus those in power felt 



38 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

with increasing misapprehension that every mistake 
and every false step would eventually lead to ruin. 

It is significaint of the rise of a revolution that it pro- 
ceeds on its way unhindered by any piece of folly that 
may have been enacted. In a state of decline, on the 
contrary, a revolution may feel the dire effects of the 
slightest error. 

The more precarious the position of the leaders of the 
Eevolution became, the more bitterly did the different 
groups quarrel among themselves; hence the more im- 
perative did it seem to each one of them to suppress 
the other, in order to save the Eevolution. 

Among the men of the " Mountain " there had been 
at the very outset marked differences between the 
"believers" (if not actually practising "church- 
believers ") and atheists; between the Philistine Puri- 
tans and the cynical epicureans, between the, incon- 
siderate and the considerate. But this did not prevent 
their harmoniously working together. When thede 
different groups began to attack one another, with such 
rage as to employ the " Eegiment of Terror" as a 
means of suppression one against the other, that was 
already a sign of the decline of the Eevolution. The 
fate of the Eevolution was already sealed when Eobes- 
pierre's faction dragged before the revolutionary 
tribunals the Hebertistes, as being " Ultra-revolu- 
tionary " and the Dantonists for being " corrupt " and 
"too moderate," and succeeded in making them share 
the same fate on the guillotine (March, 1794) which 
they had prepared for the Girondists some months 
before. 

These terrorist measures were already a sign of the 
downfall of the Eevolution; they further aided it by 
causing the masses in the Paris Commune to split, 
thus turning the disciples of the guillotined into enemies 
of the revolutionary government. At the same time, 
and as a result of the growing apathy of the masses, 
the government was obliged to withdraw the various 



THE FIEST PARIS COMMUNE 39 

functions, hitherto assumed by the sections, from 
those bodies, and to transfer them to the State 
officials. 

The police, and in particular the political police, fell 
into the hands of the two central bodies, who really 
had the State power in their own hands, and they were 
the Committee of Public Safety and the Committee of 
Security of the Convention. The police became an all- 
powerful instrument of an almighty government, and 
at the same time it changed from being, one of the in- 
stitutions of the various sections, which functioned in 
full pubHcity, into one wholly secret in character. The 
secret police thus became an invisible power, which 
was supreme over everything else in the State. 

But all the efforts of the leaders to save themselves 
by terrorist means were frustrated. The ground on 
which they stood began to shrink from under their feet. 
They could only; as a last resort, increase the system of 
terrorism and the police power. But the sole result 
was that, as they all felt their position to be more and 
more threatened, they banded themselves together in 
a desperate attempt to withstand opposition; since in 
the decisive moments these rulers had nobody to sup- 
port them. 

Kropotkin, an enthusiastic admirer of the Paris 
Commune in the Eevolution, and therefore one who 
would be anything but an opponent of that institution, 
has well described the fatal path that terrorism was 
bound to take. In the 67th chapter of his book on the 
French Revolution, entitled "Terrorism," he makes 
the following remarks : ' ' The darkest feature (apart 
from the war without) was the attitude of the provinces, 
especially in the South. The wholesale massacres, 
practised without any distinction, against the counter- 
revolutionary leaders, as well as against those whom 
.they led and organised by the local Jacobins and dele- 
gates of the Convention, had engendered such profound 
hatred that it now became a question of war to the 



40 TEBEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

knife. And the position became increasingly difficult, 
since nobody, whether in the locality or in Paris, could 
proffer any more salutary advice than a resort to the 
extremest means of revenge." 

He quotes incidents in proof of his statement, and 
then shows how Eobespierre felt himself compelled to 
push terrorism to the extreme. Louis Blanc believes 
that Eobespierre himself wished to detach himself from 
the system of teirorism, the pernicious results of which 
he foresaw and keenly felt. But he could find no other 
way of getting the better of the men within his own 
ranks, who were sworn to terrorism, than by fighting 
them by terrorist means in their most aggravated forms. 
Louis Blanc says: "Eobespierre wanted to make 
those men tremble who themselves had made the 
whole world tremble before them. He conceived the 
bold plan of felling them with their own battleaxes, 
and of crushing terrorism by means of terrorism itself. ' ' 
(History of the French Eevolution, 11., page 748). 

It is a disputable point, whether such were Eobes- 
pierre's motives or not. Certain it is, however, that 
he himself forced through the decree of the 22 Prairial 
(June 10th, 1794), which removed altogether the last 
vestiges of legal security accorded to political suspects. 
In the Eevolutional [Mbunal the defenders of such 
suspects were removed, and the legal procedtire was 
carried out according to the dictates of " sane human 
reason " alone. The verdict depended on the " judge's 
eonscience " and on his " mediatory powers," what- 
ever they might be. 

As early as February 24th, 1794, Eobespierre had 
declared: " They are trying to govern the revolution 
by means of chop-logic. Trials of conspiracy against 
the Eepublic are conducted as if they were trials 
between private persons. Tyranny kills and liberty 
pleads in its defence. And the penal code, which the 
conspirators themselves have ^awn up, is the very 



THE FIRST PAEIS COMMUNE 41 

system according to which they themgelves are 
condemned." 

The only punishment that was to be recognised was 
the death penalty. It was to be meted out even to 
those " who had disseminated false news, with intent 
to cause dissension or confusion among the people, 
who aimed at undermining the moral status or 
attempted to poison the public conscience." By such 
measures every government can instantly silence 
opposition. Kropotkin, referring to this, says: "To 
promulgate this decree meant nothing less than 
declaring the bankruptcy of the revolutionary govern- 
ment. Thus the effect of this decree of the 22 Prairial 
was to bring the counter-revolution to full maturity 
within the space of six weeks." 

Instantly, on the strength of this decree, some 
54 people were executed. " Thus the new decree, 
everywhere known as Eobespierre's decree, began 
immediately to take effect. It caused the Eegiment 
of Terror to become at once the object of intense 
hatred." 

Immediately there were wholesale trials of 150 
suspects, who were summarily executed in fliree 
batches. 

'It is unnecessary to dilate any longer on these 
executions. It is sufficient to say that from April 
17th, 1793, the day of the establishment of the revo- 
lutionary tribunals, up to the 22 Prairial of the year 
4 (June 10, 1794), that is to say during the course 
of fourteen months, the Tribunal in Paris has already 
issued orders for the execution of 2,607 persons. But 
since the promulgation of the new decree the same 
tribunal, in the course of only 46 days, from the 
22 Prairial to the 9th Thermidof (July 27th, 1794), 
condemned to death 1,351 persons. The people of 
Paris began to shudder with horror at the sight of 
all these executioners' carts, in which the condemned 
were conveyed to the guillotine, and which the five 



42 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

executioners with difficulty succeeded in emptying 
day by day. Soon there was difficulty in finding 
cemeteries enough to bury the dead; for on every 
occasion, when a new cemetery was opened in the 
working-class quarters of the city, lively protests were 
made." 

The sympathies of the working-clafis populajtion of 
Paris now turned towards the victims; the more so, 
because the rich had fled, or were in hiding some- 
where in France, thus leaving the poor to the mercy 
of the guillotine. As a matter of fact, among 2,750 of 
the guillotined, whose status Louis Blanc was able to 
verify, only 660 belonged to the wealthier classes. It 
was even whispered that on the " Committee of 
Safety '■ was sitting a EoyaUst, an agent of Batz, who 
instigated the executions, in order to make the Eepublic 
hated. Certain it is that every fresh wholesale 
massacre of this kind hastened the downfall of the 
Jiacobin regirnent. 

The whole world felt itself threatened by Eobeepierre 
and his followers. The whole world accordingly united 
together against them, "Extreme Eadicals," 
"Moderates," Girondistes and Montagnards (known 
as the " Mountain "), terrorists and himianists, 
proletarians and bourgeois. 

Eobespierre's power oame to an end at the first 
attempt made by those whom he threatened to show 
their teeth. His appeal to the populace on the 
9th Thermidor met with indifferent reception. He 
succumbed. At the same time the Commune of Paris 
lost the last apparent claim to power that it had 
exercised so long. The revolution thereupon reverted 
to the basis favoured by the economic conditions then 
prevailing, namely, to the supremacy of the bourgeoisie. 



CHAPTEE V. 
The Traditions of the Ebign of Terror. 

The downfall of Robespierre signified the worst pos- 
sible collapse. It was a moral collapse brought about 
by the fact that the proletarians and the small bour- 
geois of Paris forsook the party that represented them 
and refused any longer to fight -for them. Indeed, 
they breathed freely as if they had been relieved of 
some heavy burden, when finally an end was put to 
the fearful massacres. 

But this deplorable end was soon forgotten. What 
remained deeply rooted in the memories of the revo- 
lutionary proletarians and small bourgeois — not only 
in Paris — was the remembrance of the great and 
splendid time, when they, through their insurrections, 
dominated the Convention, and through the Conven- 
tion, France itself, the mightiest State of that period, 
which was in a position to defy the whole of Europe, 
and even siubjugate it, temporarily at least. 

The more wretched the times for the proletariat, the 
small bourgeoisie, and the revolutionaries generally 
under the sabre-government of Napoleon, especially 
after his overthrow under the regiment of the 
"Junkers" and the financial magnates, the more did 
the revolutionaries cherish those gi-eat traditions. 

There are very few men who study history for any 
scientific purpose and in a scientific spirit, that is to 
say, with the intention of trying to discover the causal 
nexus in the development of humanity, in order to 
bring it into line irrefutably with the whole body of 
recognised interconnections in this development; or in 
other words, in order to make their conceptions of the 

43 



44 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

world and things more profound, and to arriye at clearer 
knowledge and stronger foundations. 

The starting point of every Science has always some 
very practical aim, and is not the result of an impulse 
towards philosophical knowledge. Proof of this is to 
be found in so abstract a science as geometry through 
its very name alone, which imphes nothing other than 
the art of measuring the earth. 

In like manner the starting point of history was a 
purely practical one. namely, the laudation of one's 
forefathers, in order to stimulate the rising generation 
to emulate them. Since it was not primari]b^ a ques- 
tion of knowledge, but rather of political and ethical 
consequences, it was not regarded as necessary to stick 
absolutely to the truth. Exaggeration was readUy 
indulged in, so that the efEect might be enhanced ; nor 
did they shrink from deliberate invention. Historical 
falsiiication is as old las the writing of history itself. 

As is generally known, this method of writing and 
explaining history has continued up to the present 
day. It is regarded as being the manifestation of 
greait patriotic feeling — much more than any praise- 
worthy accomplishment. 

The writing of history has a further practical object. 
It was a means of estabUshing the claims of separate 
states, or of separate localities, clans or families, within 
a State, through the customs, agreements or treaties of 
bygone days. This brand of historical exposition gave 
the falsifier rich material. Thus a great part of the 
wealth and power of the Catholic Church, as wel! as of 
the Pope and individual bishops, orders and monas- 
teries, was estabhshed on falsified documents. 

The fabrication of false documents has gone out of 
fashion, since reading and writing have ceased to be 
confined to a few chosen circles. That, however, 
" Historical Science " always understands very well 
how to produce, at pleasure, established proofs in sup- 
port of every historical claim to any legal right, has 



TKADITIONS OP EEIGN OF TEEEOB 15 

been abundantly shown to us by the skill with which 
every belligerent land in the last few years has pro- 
duced "scientific" proofs of its historical rights, 
corresponding to its appetites and desires. 

Nevertheless the most important advam,tage to be 
derived from history lies neither in the inspiration and 
enthusiasm to be derived from contemplating the 
exploits and brave deeds of one's forefathers, nor in the 
establishing of claims to certain rights; but rather in 
the increasing of the power that belongs to him who 
wishes to derive benefit from experiences made in the 
past. 

This increase of power may take a double farm. 
On the one hand the individual can augment his intel- 
lectual power, by learning something from history. 
That is to say, that he examines the successes and 
failures of his predecessors, and attempts to discover 
what he himself might have done, or left undone, in 
given circumstances. Especially in military matters 
the knowledge derived from history ha® had enormous 
practical results. There has hardly ever been an army 
leader who has not wandered through the history of 
war, and learnt from his predecessors. 

More difficult is the knowledge of political matters 
to be derived from a study of history. Far greater 
masses come under consideration in the question of 
politics than in the case of war, especially in the wars 
of earlier times And these masses are not will-less 
instruments in the hand of an all-powerful leader, but 
very individual and to be tackled with difiSiculty. And 
finally, the relations with which a politician has to deal 
are much more varied and changeable than in the case 
of military matters. Even in military matters, which 
embrace relations of simpler order, more easy to 
survey than politics, it would be fatal if learning 
frMn history should lead to an unintelligent imitation 
of the past, rather than to a purposeful application of 
the general rules aJid principles, derived from the study 



46 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

of history, to the particiilar oase. In politics the 
differences in the social conditions and situations of 
the individual countries and times are much greater, 
— and therefore much less easy to recognise. Hence an 
imitation, according to pattern, of the events of the 
past, applied directly to situations which merely bear 
superficial resemblance to events of the past, can often 
do more harm than good and cloud the vision, rather 
than brightening it, in its quest for the knowledge of 
the true state of affains arid of the particular needs of 
the moment. 

What happens, then, in politics is that men have little 
understood how really to learn. But most politicians, 
even when they do busy themselves with 'historical 
knowledge, are far less concerned about "learning" 
than about soimething quite different. And so we come 
to the consideration of the second meaxis of increasing 
one's power and strength by a study of history. 

Every one of the present-day classes and parties finds 
its analogy in the past ; for in bygone days, as in our 
own, there were struggles between exploiters and the 
exploited, between those with possessions and those 
without, between aristocrats and democrats, between 
monarch and republicans. These classes and parties 
of the past were certainly governed by conditions 
very different from those prevailing at the present day : 
ihey often signified something quite different from the 
corresponding phenomena of a later period. But in 
politics the events of to-day are measured and com- 
pared with similar events of the past, with their suc- 
cesses and failures. For the salce of propaganda in a 
particular direction, it always added to one's power if 
one could refer to some event in the past, which had 
met with success. And it was no less addition to the 
strength of one's propaganda, if one could show the 
other side, and point out where a contrary action has 
led to the shipwreck of one's predecessor. 



TEADITIONS OF EEIGN OF TEEEOE 47 

This occasioned a very keen interest in the study of 
history, but by no means & real interest in historical 
truth. Here also we find instances of the falsification 
of history: The writers of each party naturally seek to 
put their protagonists in a bright light, and their 
opponents in as dark a light as possible. Amid the 
practical needs which give rise to the falsification of 
history, those only are free from tendency to falsifica- 
tion who are animated by a desire really to learn. 
This desire leads to the attempt at discovering the fail- 
ures, as well as the successes, of one's predecessors, and 
subjecting them and their actions to rigorous criticism. 
At this point we find the transition to the purely scien- 
tific impulse towards exact truth, towards the 
examination of history out of the pure desire to satisfy 
the demands of causality. 

All other practical needs that lead to the writing of 
history develop the tendency to degrade the scientific, 
until it merely becomes a fabrication of legends. For- 
tunately, nowadays, the critic of the other side can 
always expose such trickery. This sort of business can 
no longer proceed in such a simple way as at the time 
when the gospels were collated, except under the 
regime of a state of siege, or under the censor. But 
even at the highest grade of popular education and 
unrestricted liberty of the Press, there is no lack of 
one-sided expositions of history. 

Naturally it must not be supposed that there is 
always a conscious attempt to lead the reader astray. 
In most eases it is the historical writer who is led astray 
through his own party fanaticism and party narrow- 
ness, which generally pfevent him from seeing things 
as they really are. 

This is aU the more possible, since the sources which 
we draw upon to supply historical information are often 
themselves the result of party struggle, and since social 
relations are always so extraordinarily complex that 
the most detached enquirer often experiences difiSeulty 



48 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

in finding his way about, and muat often ask himself 
the question, "What is truth?" 

Lissagaray rightly says, in the preface to his 
" History of the Commune " : " The man who gives 
the people false stories of the revolution and deceives 
them, whether intentionally or not, by ' historical 
fantasies,' lays himself open to punishment, as much 
as a geographer who should sketch false charts for 
seafarers." 

And yet I know comrades in my party, thoroughly 
honest and honourable conu-ades, who regard it as a 
sacred duty towards the revolution to mislead the 
people, by giving them false "historical fantasies" 
about Bolshevism. 

On th© other hand, how difiSoult it is even for the 
most conscientious historian, while the storm is at its 
height, to indicate on a map all the dangerous rocks 
which have been passed on the voyage! Eevolutions, 
which let loose men's passions, and in which men 
fight for life or death, naturally suffer more than all 
other historical events from party exposition and ideas. 
And so true is this, that in the great French Eevolu- 
tion it was the Paris Commune, with its reign of 
terror, representing the most powerful driving-force 
and the most passionate manifestation of that Eevolu- 
tion, which was most violently combated. It was 
to this institution that the counter-revolutionaries 
pointed whenever they wanted to characterise and 
denounce the Eevolution. But to defend it was re- 
garded by the revolutionaries as a duty. They were 
not content with regarding the regiment of terror as 
a particular form assumed 1^ the revolution at that 
time, a form which belonged to the past, not to be 
revived m the future. They were not content with 
explaining the special conditions that were respon- 
sible for the formation of that regiment. On the con- 
trary, they felt themselves constrained to glorify 
instead of condemning that institution, regarding the 



TEADITIONS OF EEIGN OF TEREOE 49 

" Terror" as a horrible but necessary means for the 
liberation of the enslaved classes. 

Even Marx himself in 1848 stiU reckoned on the 
victorious power of revolutionary Terrorism, in spite 
of the fact that he had at that time already criticised 
the traditions of 1793. 

In the Neue Rheinische Zeitung he repeatedly spoke 
in favour of terrorism. In one number (January 13th, 
1849) he wrote as follows concerning the rising oi the 
Hungarians, whose revolutionary importance he over- 
estimated : 

" For the first time in the revolutionary movement 
of 1848, for the first time since 1793, a nation 
surroimded by coimter-revolutionary powers, has dared 
to oppose revolutionary passion to cowardly anti- 
revolutionary rage, and to meet white terror with red 
terror. For the first time for many years we find a 
truly revolutionary character, a man who dares to 
take up the gauntlet in the shape of a desperate 
struggle in the name of his own people, and who for 
that nation is Danton and Ganiot in one. That man 
is Ludwig KossToith." 

Before that, in a number of the same journal, 
November 7th, 1848, Marx wrote in connection, with 
the affair in Vienna : 

" In Paris the destructive counter -stroke of the 
June Eevolution will be overcome. With the victory 
of the ' Eed Eepubhc ' in Paris, the armies from the 
initerior will spread up to 'and beyond the frontiers, and 
the actual power of the contesting parties will become 
evident. Then we shall think of June and of October 
(the overthrow of Vienna by Windischgratz), and we 
too shall shout : ' Vae victis. '* The futile massacres 
since the days of Jime and October, the exhaustive 
sacrifices since February and March, the cannibalism 
of the counter-revolution, will convince the people that 
there exists only one means of shortening, simplifying 

* In the original edition this was printed in large thick letters. 

profg:f=?ty of library 
KEW YDRK STATE SCHGOL 
IKDOSTniAL ANO LABOR RELATIONS 12523 



50 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

and centralising the death agony of the old order of 
society and the bloody birth-throes of the new — only 
one means, and that is Revolutionary Terrorism." 

This was not put to a practical test. But we find 
among the revolutionaries themselves a growing contra- 
diction within. If a study of the past drives them to 
uphold terrorism, their attitude is in contradiction to 
their growing humanitarian instinct, arising, as we 
shall see later, from present-day conditions, and to their 
repugnance to commit acts of human torture, and 
even to take human life. And this humanitarianism 
in practice carries more weight than the obsolete 
terrorist creed of the history books. 

Concerning the revolutionaries of July, 1830, Borne 
wrote in the sixth of his Paris letters : " Quickly they 
conquered, still quicker have they forgiven. How 
gentle has been the retaliation of the people who have 
suffered so much injury; how soon they have forgotten 
all! Only in open fight on the battlefield have they 
ever woimded the opponent. Defenceless prisoners 
were never murdered, fu^tives never chased, those in 
hiding never searched for, the suspects never molested. 
Such is the behaviour, of a people!" 

In February, 1848, the Paris revolutionaries 
behaved as magnanimously as they had done in 1830. 
Even in the terrible June battle of the same year, the 
fighting workers exhibited the most noble heroism, and 
the toughest powers of endurance, but no signs of 
thirst for blood. This was left for their victors to 
develop in the most shocking manner. Not only the 
soldiers, whose rage was fired by invented accoimts 
of atrocities committed by the insurgents; even the 
intellectuals took part in this campaign of revenge. 
Doctors refused to bind the wounds of wounded 
revolutionaries. 

Marx said in this connection, in his famous article on 
the June battle in the Neue Rheinische Zeitung : 



TEADITIONS OF EEIGN OF TBEEOE 61 

" Science no longer exists for the plebeian, who waa 
guilty of shameless and nameless crimes when fight- 
ing for his existence in the trenches, instead of for 
Louis Philippe or Marrast. " 

It was indignation over such barbarities that iarged 
Marx to write the above-cited confessions to terrorism. 

The extreme bitterness, engendered by the June 
battle of 1848, had further consequences among the 
workers of Paris, when they in 1871 overcame the poli- 
tical power in the Second Commune. Not a few of 
them had themselves taken part in the struggle of June, 
1848. It might have been expected that the days of 
vengeance would now come, the day of terror, prophe- 
sied by Marx. 

But he himself declares in his work on the Commune 
(" The Civil War in France," 1871) : 

" From March 18th until the entry of the Versailles- 
troops into Paris, the proletarian revolution remained 
innocent of all acts of violence, in which revolutionaries 
and especially counter-revolutionaries of the ' higher 
classes ' are wont to revel." (Third edition, page SETT 

Here we find a definite repudiation of terrorism, 
which is regarded as a feature of the revolution of the 
" higher classes," as compared with the proletarian 
revolution. 

Not long ago my attitude towards Bolshevism was 
described as infidelity towards Marx, whose revolu- 
tionary fire would certainly have led him to Bol- 
shevism. As proof of this, one of Marx's declarations 
on the terrorism of 1848 was quoted. 

We now see that the infidelity towards Marx, of 
which I was guilty, had been accomplished by himself 
as early as 1871. Between his first and second declara- 
tion, two decades of the most strenuous and profound 
mental activity had intervened, the result of which was 
"Capital." 

Whoever takes refuge in Marx on the question of 
terrorism has no right to adhere to his views of 1848 



52 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

and ignore those of 1871. Like Marx, Engels also 
showed little enthusiasm in 1870 for terrorism. On 
September 4th, 1870, he wrote to Marx : 

" We understand by the ' reign of terror ' the reign of 
those who breathe and inspire frightf ulness ; on the 
contrary, it is the reign of people who themselves are 
frightened. La terreur — this embodies for the most 
part futile atrocities committed by people who them- 
selves have fear, and have need of reassurance. I am 
convinced that the blame for the reign of terror of 1793 
is almost entirely to be laid at the doors of the over- 
anxious small boua^eois, who masqueraded as patriots, 
and of the mob, who made of terrorism a regular busi- 
ness." Correspondence between Marx and Engels, 
IV., 379. 380.) 

Marx was perfectly right when he, with obvious satis- 
faction, pointed out that the Second Paris Commune 
remained free from all acts of violence, which were so 
strong a feature of the First. What did happen of a 
violent nature during the time of its existence in Paris 
was not to be laid to its account. Even bo, it must not 
be supposed that the idea of terrorism played no part at 
all in the Second Commune, or that it was repudiated 
by all the members of that institution. That was by no 
means the case. 

Let us now discuss this more closely, and at the same 
time draw a parallel between the Paris Commune of 
1871 and the Soviet Eepublic. For this latter often 
points to the Commune of 1871 as its prototype, and 
as embodying its justification. And Freiderich Engels, 
in his preface to the third edition of Marx's "Civil 
War in France," has declared that the Paris Com- 
mune represented the dictatorship of the proletariat. 
Therefore it will repay us to examine this dictatorship 
more closely and see what it looked hke. 



CHAPTEE VI. 

The Second Paeis Commune. 

The Origin of the Commune. 

The Soviet Eepublic of 1917, like the Paris Com- 
mune of 1871, was the result of war and military 
defeat, and had to be borne by the revolutionary prole- 
tariat. Apart from that, a comparison with these two 
is at an end. The Bolsheviks succeeded in gaining 
political power because they, of all the political parties 
of Kussia, were the one party which most energetically 
demandei-peaee, a peace at any price, even a separate 
peace. [They did not worry about the general situation 
that migbt thereby arise, or whether the victory and 
the world supremacy of the German military monarchy 
might thereby be assisted or nOfTj For a considerable 
time tlh© Bolsheviks constituted themselves hirelings 
of the German militarists as much as the Indian or the 
Irish rebels and the Italian anarchists. Quite different 
was the attitude of French radicalism ia the war of 
1870, after the downfall of Napoleon and the proclama- 
tion of the Bepublic, and after the Germans began to 
make their claims of annexation of Alsace-Lorraine. 
In this struggle of the Third Eepublic against the united 
monarchs of Germany it seemed that the situation of 
1793, with its struggle of the First Eepublic against 
the allied monarchies of Europe, would again come to 
life. The traditions of that earlier time again came into 
force, and again the proletariat of Paris formed the 
most warlike elements, which pin-sued the war in the 
most energetic and determined manner, for the salva- 
tion of the one and indivisible Eepublic. 

53 



64 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

Meanwhile the peasants of 1870 were no longer the 
same as those of 1793. Those of 1870 hated Paris and 
her supremacy. Nevertheless, they were convinced of 
the necessity of repelling the common enemy, since 
the victory of the latter would bring them again feudal 
exploitation, aiid would threaten to take from them the 
ecclesiastical and other property that they had 
acquired for themselves. The peasants of 1870, on the 
other hand, had nothing of a similar kind to fear from 
the victory of the Prussians. For them the ecclesiasti- 
cal question was paramount, so that the loss of Alsace- 
Lorraine seemed to be the lesser evil, compared with 
the devastation and burden of war. Apart from the 
people of Alsace-Lorraine, who in desperation fought 
to the last moment against separation, the thought of 
peace gained rapid ground among the peasants and the 
people of the provinces as war continued. This 
clamour for peace arose in opposition to the radical and 
war-like elements of Paris, w:hich represented the war- 
cry of the reactionaries and the monarchists. As in 
1917 in Eussia, the peace party of 1871, the party which 
was wearied of war, gained the upper-hand over those 
who wanted to continue the war. But the peace ideas 
in 1871 did not assist the most radical of the radicals, 
but on the other hand, the most reactionary among the 
reactionaries. 

On February 8, 1871, a National Assembly was 
elected to conclude peace. It numbered only two 
hundred Eepublicans, and, on the other hand over four 
hundred monarchists. V' Almost the whole province 
demanded peace at any price. Paris, on the other hand, 
cried for war to the knif e^ She elected only those men 
who were pledged to the continuation of war, and who 
opposed a peace piu-chased at the price of yielding. up 
territory." (M. Louis Debreuilh, "La Oommurie," 
Paris.) 

On February 12th the National Assembly met in Bor- 
deaux, and on March Ist it voted for the Peace Treaty 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 65 

by 516 against 117. Nearly the half of these 117 votes 
represented the delegates from Paris. The National 
Assembly was elected only with a view to the conclu- 
sion of peace. Only in consideration of this had the 
electors given their votes. The great majority of 
reactionaries in that Assembly was attributable not to 
the dislike of the Eepublie, but to the insuperable 
demand for peace. After thif event the mandate of 
the National Assembly came to an end. In its place a 
new one had to be elected, which should decide on all 
matters in connection with the constitution. These 
votes might have turned out other than did those in 
the Assembly at Bordeaux, for the Eepublie met with 
less opposition than did the continuation of the war. 
As a matter of fact, however, the elections which took 
place throughout Eranee on April 30th, 1871, gave a 
great Eepublican majority. But just because the 
'junkers ' of that Party feared the National Assembly, 
they clung all the more tenaciously to their mandates. 
They formed themselves into a Constitutional Assem- 
bly, and without any doubt would have reinstated the 
monarchy, if they had not been split into two halves, 
the one half among them consisting of the legitimate 
supporters of the dynasty, which up to 1830, in France, 
had been regarded as the legitimate dynasty; and the 
other half being the Orleanists, the opposers of the 
dynasty, who, as a result of the Eevolution of 1830, 
were placed in the position of the hereditary rulers. 
This spht saved the Eepublie, yet it did not prevent 
Paris from being the object of the combined hatred of 
both factions. The French Eepublie had no other 
strong support outside Paris, but the strength of this 
support had proved itself on numberless occasions 
since 1789. There was no possibility of restoring the 
monarchy so long as Paris was not overcome. Pro- 
vincials fought with more and more fury against Paris, 
against the immoral, godless, war-like Eepublican Paris, 
quite apart from its Socialism. From the very begin- 



56 TEEE0EI8M AND COMMUNISM 

ning of its sittings, the National Assembly gave loudest 
expression to its horror. Heroic Paris, which had sus- 
tained a fearful siege of over five months in the service 
of land defence, was now the object of the most scan- 
dalous vituperation on the part of its sublime pat- 
ricians. To humiliate Paris, to deny it all self-govern- 
ment, to rob it of its position as the capital, and finally 
to disarm it in order wiflh greater security to carry out 
a monarchic coup d'etat — this was the chief concern 
of the National Assembly and of Thiers, its chosen 
Chief of Executive. 

We see how utterly different this was from the coup 
d'etat of the Bolshfeviks, who derived their power from 
the desire for peace, who had the support of the 
peasants behind them, and who found no monarchist 
opposition to them in the National Assembly, but only 
the opposition of social revolutionaries and Mensheviks. 
The immediate causes of the Bolshevik Eevolution and 
of the Second Paris Commune were as difiEerent as 
the results of these two movements. The Bolsheviks 
acquired power through a well-prepared coup d'etat, 
which in one stroke yielded to them the entire State 
machinery, which they immediately proceeded to 
exploit in the most energetic and reckless manner pos- 
sible, with a view to depriving their opponents of all 
political and economic power — of all their opponents, 
including the proletariat. On the othei'hand, at the time 
of the suspension of the Commune, nobody was more 
surprised than the revolutionaries themselves, and to 
a very large number of them this conflict was anything 
but desirable. Certainly, as the result of revolutionary 
tradition, the tactics of the armed insurrection, which 
received due preparation, were strongly supported by 
the Parisians. The Blanquistes were their chief repre- 
sentatives among the Socialists. At different times 
during the siege they and other elements of a Jacobin 
character tried to promote riots; but they could not 
find sufficient support, so that these attempts 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 57 

invariably came to nothing. As a consequence of the 
impression made by the capitulation of Metz on 
October Slet they rose and demanded the election of 
a Paris Eepresentative Council, namely, the Commune, 
on socialist but not on patriotic grounds, in order 
to carry on the war more energetically than the First 
Paris Commune had done from 1792 to 1794. That 
part of the National Guard faithful to the Government 
succeeded in quelling this revolt without shedding 
blood, since the Government troops found so little 
opposition to overcome. In order to strengthen their 
position, the Government had a General Election of the 
people in Paris on November 3rd. As the result, there 
were 558,000 votes for the Government, and not quite 
63,000 against. The " men of action at any price" 
fared no better on January 22nd. Although they 
opposed at the time the highly popular and patriotic 
voting for the continuation of the war, the Government 
had announced that capitulation was inevitable; and, 
as a result, there was an outburst of fury among the 
revolutionaries, which had bloodier results than the 
revolt of Ootober 31st, but which, likewise, was soon 
crushed without difficulty. 

These failures had wearied, deceived and weakened 
these men of action. They were not yet prepared on 
March 18th to call for a new revolt. On the other hand, 
the men of the Socialist International were, from the 
outset, opposed to any attempt at revolt. Immediately 
after the downfall of Napoleon, during the September 
revolution, Karl Marx wrote to Engels (September 6, 
1870) :— 

" I had just sat down to write to you when 
Seraillier came in, and informed me that he would 
leave London for Paris on the morrow, where in any 
case he will stay only a day or two. His object is 
to arrange affairs there with the International 
Federal Council of Paris. This is all the more 
neceseary, eince at th^ present moment the whole 



58 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

' French Section, ' is streaming into Paris, in order 
to perpetrate some folly in the name of the Inter- 
national. They want to overthrow the provisional 
Government, to establish the Commune of Paris, 
and to appoint Pyat as French Ambassador to 
London, etc. I received to-day a proclamation of 
the Federal Council of Paris to the German people, 
which I will send you to-morrow. It contains -an 
urgent request to the General Council to issue a new 
and special manifesto to the Germans. I had 
already intended to make the same proposal this 
evening. Be so kind as to send me, as soon as 
possible, in English, military information about 
Alsace Lorraine, which will be useful for this mani- 
festo. I have already answered in detail the 
Federal Council in Paris, and at the same time have 
undertaken the disagreeable business of opening 
their eyes to the real state of affairs." — (Correspond- 
ence between Engels and Marx, I. IV., p. 330.) 
I have been reproved for being merely a " degene- 
rate Epigone " of Marx. It is certain that Marx's 
revolutionary nature and his volcanic temperament 
at the time would have driven him straight into the 
camp of the Bolsheviks. "We see from his letter how 
his volcanic temperament, at the time of the Eevolu- 
tion, made him regard it as his first duty to undertake 
the disagreeable duty of opening the eyes of his com- 
rades as to the actual state of affairs; and that this 
same temperament, in spite of all its volcanic 
character, was capable, under circumstances, of carry- 
ing out a revolutionary action, even though it was a 
stupid action. Engels replied to Marx on September 
7th as follows : 

" Dupont has just gone. He was here this evening 
and is furious over the wonderful Paris proclama- 
tion ! The fact that Seraillier is going to Paris, and 
that he has already spoken to you, has pacified him. 
His views of the whole affair are perfectly clear and 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 59 

right, namely, to turn to account the freedom 
which the Republic has granted for the organisation 
of the party in France; to take action when oppor- 
tunity shall present itself after the organisation 
has been formed ; and to restrain the International in 
France until peace has been made." 
To this Marx replied on September 10 : 

' ' Tell Dupont that I am in entire agreement with 
his views." 
In other words, it was organisation, and not action^ 
which appeared the more important to his volcanic 
temperament. In the very fact of maintaining reserve 
the International in France was pursuing nothing less 
than a plan for precipitate action. 

Let us give an example. On February 22nd, at the 
sitting of the Paris Federal Council of the Inter- 
national, a member proposed that a peaceful 
demonstration on February 24th should be made, on 
the anniversary of the Eevolution of 1848. Even this 
peaceful demonstration appeared to the majority of the 
Federal Council, in view of the tense situation, highly 
inopportune. Frankell, in particular, opposed this 
suggestion. He demanded that they should devote 
all their strength for the moment to the organisation 
of the proletariat, to the study of the most important 
economic problems, and above all, to the payment of 
the wages that had become overdue during the siege, 
and also to the question of unemployment. 

The representatives of the International in the 
National Assembly, Malon and Tolsiin, were to give 
expression to the will of the people. As the result of 
Frankell 's proposal, the Federal Coimcil decided not 
to arrange a demonstration, but to leave it to each 
individual member to decide whether he should take 
part in such demonstration or not. This shows no 
very strong leanings towards insurrection. Indeed 
this insiureetion was engineered, not by the revolu- 
tionaries but by their opponents. As a result of the 



60 TEREOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

exigencies of the war, the proletariat of Paris was being 
formed into the National Guard, and heid become 
armed. This state of affairs appeared to those 
elements that had formed round Thiers; — ^junkers, 
financiers, the heads of bureaucracy and of the army 
— as a very grave danger. After the signaitiure of peace, 
it seemed to them that nothing was so imperative 
as the disarmament of the proletarian section of the 
Paris National Guard. This was begun by their being 
deprived of cannon. The German rulers had caused 
the Paris National Guard to come into possession of 
these cannon; since they, the Germans, hoped that 
this National Guard " would be the spark to set tire 
to the powder magazine," as Bourgin has rightly said. 
(Georges Bourgin 's " Histoire do la Commune," Paris, 
1917, page 43.) 

The thorough exploitation of victory 13 of the very 
essence of military action and science. It is part of 
a general's duty not only to conquer, but also to bring 
about the complete demobilisation and breaking up 
of the conquered enemy. Of a different order, how- 
ever, are the aims of a statesman. He must look 
beyond the victory, in order to discover what conditions 
a,re possible for future relations with the momentary 
enemy. These two oonceptions are found in opposi- 
tion to one another in every crusade. The resxdts are 
fatal when the military idea gains influence on politics, 
outside the actual prosecution of war. In the year 
1866 Bismarck had already mastered and acqxiired the 
military way of thinking, if, however, witt great 
difficulty. Yet it was the very successes of 1866 that 
had given the Prussian General Staff such enormous 
prestige, which, through the victory of 1870, increased 
still more. Bismarck could not oppose the Prussian 
General Staff. He had to yield to the military way 
of thinking, and as a result his own political under- 
standing waa disturbed and blinded. Hence the 
demand for the annexation of Alsace-Lorraine, which 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 61 

lengthened the war by months, which drove France 
into the arms of Eussia, and prepared the present dis- 
ruption of Germany. Nevertheless, Alsace-Lorraine 
was still economically and strategically a very tangible 
gain for the moment. But they were not content with 
that, but in addition tried to bring about the humilia- 
tion of Paris, that centre which the Germans so hated, 
because of its opposition to their armies; and they 
compelled France on February 26th to grant that 
German troops from March 1st should invade Paris and 
take possession of the Champs Elys^es. When on 
February 27th this information became known to the 
Parisians, there arose a general cry of indignation and 
a call to arms, in order to throw back the common enemy 
by means of force. Nearly all the battaUons of the 
National Guard declared themselves ready to follow. 
It was only the Internationalists who kept quiet. 
However disastrous for them at the moment an insur- 
rection again&t an internal enemy appeared to be, no 
less disastrous was a rising against the enemy from 
without. They implored the Central Committee of 
the National Guard to abstain from every attempt at 
armed resistance, which they said would only lead to 
a repetition of the slaughter of the June before, and 
to the drowning of the Eepublic in the blood of the 
Paris workmen. They proposed that the National 
Guard, instead of offering armed resistance, should 
svuTound the Germans with a cordon, which would cut 
them off completely from the Paris population, and 
keep them in isolation. 

The Central Committee allowed itself to be persuaded 
at the last moment, and so we have the International 
to thank that the vain arrogance of the German con- 
querors did not provoke the most fearful street fighting 
in the world's history. It was not the German but 
the French soldiery, which a few weeks later let loose 
the bloody slaughter among the Parisian proletariat. 



62 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

According to the capitulation of Paris on January 
28th, all war material of the troops in the town had been 
made over to the victor, excepting the arms of the 
National Guard ; not only their weapons, but also their 
cannons, which were provided, not by the State but 
by the city of Paris. When, therefore, the Germans 
entered Paris, the Government took no steps what- 
ever to remove to safety those cannons which, by can- 
tract, the victors had left in their care. The Govern- 
ment probably wished that the enemy had taken them, 
and thus weakened the strength of the enemy within. 
But the National Guard were well prepared, and brought 
these cannons, four hundred in number, in good time 
to those parts of the town to which the Germans had 
no access. To get back these cannons into their pos- 
session was the great anxiety of the Government after 
the conclusion of peace. In this way they hoped to 
disarm the proletarian section of the Paris National 
Guard. The National Guard had threatened to decapi- 
tate and decapitalise (ddcapiter et d^capitaliser) Paris. 
With this end in view, they decided not to sit in Paris. 
With great difficulty Thiers persuaded them to make 
the seat of their Conference in Versailles, in the neigh- 
bourhood of Paris, instead of in Bordeaux, .as had been 
the case up till then. On Mardh 20th they proposed to 
meet there. Beforehand they had to be reassured that 
they had nothing to fear from Paris. Therefore it was 
decided to confiscate these cannon on March 18th. 
Thiers thought it the wisest course to steal these can- 
non secretly, instead of openly by force. At three 
o'clock in the morning, while all Paris was asleep, 
several regiments took possession of Montmartre, where 
the cannon were standing unguarded, and endeavoured 
to. remove them. But, strangely enough, they had for- 
gotten to bring with them the necessary horses. These 
.therefore had first of all to be fetched ; in the meantime 
the Parisians "smelt a rat" and, quickly gathering 
together, formed a continually increasing group, which 



THE SECOND PARIS COMMUNE 63 

finally compelled the soldiers to leave the cannon 
alone. They were successful. The soldiers who had 
lived among the Paris populace, who had fought with 
it against the common enemy, and had joined with it 
in despising the incapable generals, now fraternised with 
the people and the National Guard. General Lecomte, 
who ordered the troops to fire on imarmed crowds, 
merely succeeded in causing his own soldiers to turn 
against him, and arrest and shoot him. This shooting 
affray belongs to those terrorist atrocities, which one is 
inclined to lay to the blame of the Commtine. This 
is also true of the shooting of General Thomas, who 
was seized on the morning of March 18th in civilian 
dress, as he was taking notes among the crowd. He was 
executed for being a spy. Already on the 28th of 
February a police agent, who was caught in the act of 
espionage, was thrown into the Seine and cruelly 
drowned. 

Those people who attribute these deeds to the Com- 
mune forget that, at the time when such things 
happened, the Commune was not yet in existence. On 
the other hand, one should not lay the blame to the 
civil population of Paris. Each one of these execu- 
tions was carried out by the soldiers, and not by the 
civilians. They were the outcome of the ideas, not 
of the proletariat but of the militarists who do not 
attach much importance to human life. And those 
friends of humanity, who wax indignant over the 
soldiers because they shot their bloodthirsty generals, 
would not have a word to say if those same soldiers 
had shot down women and children. " Instead oif his 
shooting women and children, his own people shot 
him." (Lecomte), " Deep-rooted habits, which soldiers 
acquire as the result of training given them by the 
enemies of the working classes, do not suddenly lose 
their power at. the moment when these same soldiers 
go over to the working people, and join them." — Marx, 
." Civil War in France," p. 38.) 



64 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

Whatever action the National Guard took in these 
events was undertaken only with a view to prevent 
further bloodshed. They succeeded, in fact, some- 
times at the risk of their own lives, in rescuing from 
the indignant soldiers the officers they had arrested, 
so that only those mentioned were killed. On March 
19th the Central Committee of the National Guard at 
last protested against any participation whatever in this 
slaughter. In its declaration, which was published in 
the official journal of the Commune of March 20th, is 
the following statement: 

" We declare with indignation that the bloody 
disgrace with which our honour has been besmirched 
is a shocking infamy. Never did we decide on an 
execution, and never has the National Guard taken 
part in any such crime." 

This was a strong denunciation, not only of the 
accusers but also of those cruel deeds which were 
ascribed to the National Guard. In view of the 
secession of the troops to the people, the Government 
had only two courses open to pursue — either to make 
concessions to the enraged masses, to bargain with 
them, or else to retire in flight. Thiers would, on no 
account, engage in discussions, but took a headlong 
flight with his Government out of Paris, and hurried 
to gather round him all those troops that, as yet, 
were untainted with the spirit of mutiny. He even 
abandoned the forts round Paris, including the pro- 
minent fort of Mont Valarien. If the Parisians had 
kept to the heels of Thiers, they would perhaps have 
succeeded in overcoming the Government. The troops 
which were withdrawing from Paris would not have 
been able to offer the least opposition. That is what 
their general later on declared. Then it would have 
been possible to introduce a new Government, which, 
however, would not have been able to carry out a 
Socialist programme. For that the conditions were 
not ripe enough. But they could have dissolved the 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 65 

National Guard, and have elected a new one with the 
following programme, namely, the strengthening of the 
Eepublio, self-determination for the various districts, 
Paris included, and the substitution of militia in 
place of' the standing army. More than this, at that 
time, the Commune did not demand, and this pro- 
gramme was possible at the time on account of the 
conditions in France. But Thiers continued to retire. 
They allowed him to take his troops and to reorganise 
them in Versailles, to fill them with fresh spirit and to 
strengthen them. Nobody was more surprised at the 
retreat of the Ministers than the Parisians themselves. 
There was no organisation at hand that could take 
•ever the guidance of affairs in place of the rulers, who 
had taken flight. Even on the morning of March 19th 
Paris was entirely without any Government. Force 
of circumstances made it necessary for the Central 
Committee of the National Guard to take their place, 
and thus was formed a body without a fixed pro- 
gramme and without any clear purpose. They dis- 
charged their responsibility, in the first place, by 
delegating their power to a single individual, LuUier, 
to whom they confided the supreme command over 
Paris. He was the most unsuitable man conceivable,' 
a drunkard and one who did not know whether he was 
" more of a fool than traitor, or vice versa. This man 
succeeded within the space of forty-eight hours in 
making the most terrible blunders possible — blunders 
that could not be remedied. But this unfortunate 
choice of Lullier was at bottom merely a sign and 
indication of the situation at that time." — (Dubreuilh 
"La Commune," page 283.) 

It was not till April 3rd that it was decided to make 
an attack on Versailles. But what might have brought 
success on March 19th was on April 3rd a cause of 
failure. The expectation that the soldiers would again 
go over to the Parisians as on March 18th ended in 
bitter disappointment. The Parisian National Guard 



66 TEREOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

stumbled upon most obstinate and detOTmined opposi- 
tion, which they could not overcome. From that 
moment they were put on the defensive against the 
whole of France, and in consequence, from that time 
onwards their downfall was certain. And from that 
time onwards the Paris rising was exclusively prole- 
tarian. Up to that moment many of the supporters of 
the bourgeois Besitated as to whether or not they should 
go over to the proletariat, but henceforth they let the 
proletariat alone go on with the fight. 

How very differently things proceeded in the instu:- 
reetion of March 7th, 1917, in Petersburg, as compared 
with that of March 18tK, 1871, in Paris ! This Eussian 
insiurection was prepared by the Eevolutionary Com- 
mittee, which organised the working classes and the 
soldiers, and urged them to attack the Government, 
which at that time was in Petersburg, and had as little 
strength behind it as had Thiers in 1871 in Paris. 
But it is certain that the immediate occupation of 
aU posts of power in the capital would not have deter- 
mined the victory of the Bolsheviks, had not the con- 
dition of things in the whole Empire been far more 
favourable to them than they were for Paris in 1871. 
At the time when Kerensky fled to Gatschina, as 
formerly Thiers fled to Versailles, he could not reckon 
on a peasantry which would uphold him. The 
peasantry, and along with it the armed rising in 
Eussia, all went to the side of the revolutionaries, who 
were in power in the capital. This gave their regime 
a force and permanent character, which was denied 
the Paris regime. On -Ehe other hand, it brought about 
an economic reactionary element from which the Paris 
Commune was saved. The Paris Dictatorship of the 
Proletariat was never foimded on Peasants' Councils 
as was the case in Eussia. 



THE SECOND PARIS COMMUNE 67 

Workmen's Councils and the Central 
Committee. 

The Paris Commune and the Soviet Eepublic were 
fundamentally different in their starting point, no less 
different also in their organisation and the methods 
then employed. It is true that the Paris Commune 
had an organisation which might easily be compared to 
the Workmen's and Soldiers' Council. Indeed, it was 
in a similar position to the Eussian Eevolution, since 
it followed, like the Eussian, a despotic regime which 
prohibited every kind of open political organisation of 
the masses, and also forbade the organisation of Trade 
Unions only shortly before its downJEall. Just as little 
as in the case of the Eussian workmen in 1905 and 
1907, the French workmen, after September 4th, 1870, 
found no strong political and Trade Union organisation 
ready to hand, which would have enabled them to make 
a united fight. This was one of the reasons, as we have 
seen, which led Marx to desire so sincerely that the 
workers should, in the first place, utihse the new Eepuib- 
lic for their own organisation and instruction, and by 
this means make it ready and well equipped to act as 
a ruling power, and not waste its strength in little 
skirmishes, which even in the most favourable circum- 
stances could never give them any lasting supremacy. 
But since they came into power by means of a contest 
that was forced upon them, and not by a mere skirmish, 
they had to be careful to provide, in the absence of any 
political and Trade Union organisation, some substitute 
which they found ready to hand. For the Eussian 
workmen there was such a substitute to be found in the 
organisation of gross industry. 

"Modem industry has changed the small workshop 
of the patriarchal master of former days into the lai^e 
factory of the industrial capitalist. Groups of work- 
men herder together in a factory become organised like 
soldiers. Like all ordinary industrial soldiers they are 



68 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

placed under the supervision of a thorough-going 
hierarchy of ofiBcers and under officers." (Engels to 
Marx, " Communist Manifesto.") 

" The industrial soldiers " of the factory had only to 
substitute for the officers and under-officers, placed in 
command by the capitalists, similar officers of their 
own choice, and hence organisation in the factory be- 
came in reality a close organisation of factory workers. 
Thus arose the institution of the Workmen's Councils 
among the proletariat of Eussia. As against the organ- 
isation of party and Trade Unions of countries more 
advanced than Eussia, these Workmen's Councils do 
not represent any higher form of proletarian organisa- 
tion, but merely an emergency measure to supply what 
was lacking. But Paris workmen had no such measure . 
Parisian industry was, for the most part, industry for 
the leisured, and not industry for the masses. Even up 
to the time of the Second Commune, the " small work- 
shop of the patriarchal master " was paramount, since 
the great factory of the industrial capitalist was almost 
entirely lacking, the contrary being the case with the 
industry of Eussia, especially in St. Petersburg. The 
Eussian Empire shows its economic backwardness in 
its lack of industry, and in the small number of indus- 
trial workers as against the peasantry. Whatever there 
is, however, of capitalist industry bears the stamp of 
modern manufacture on a large scale. The Parisian 
workmen had to furnish some other substitute for the 
political and economic organisation of the masses, 
which at that time was lacking, and this substitute was 
found in the National Guard. The Eevolution of 1789 
had as a result the arming of the people everywhere in 
France, but especially in Paris. This arming served a 
double purpose. The lower classes, the proletariat and 
the small middle class took to arms, and organised 
themselves for insurrection. The Eevolution had not 
brought them what they wanted, and could not bring 
it them, as the result of the conditions then prevailing. 



THE SECOND PARIS COMMUNE 69 

Hence their persistent impulse, by means of an armed 
rising, to push the Eevolution still further forward. The 
situation was quite different for the bourgeoisie, the 
capitalists and the well-to-do middle classes, and the 
intellectuals who were in quite comfortable circum- 
stances. The Eevolution of 1789 brought them exactly 
what they wanted. They armed and organised them- 
selves in order to defend that which they had won, and 
they fought on two sides — against the reactionary 
powers, which strove to restore the ancient feudal 
absolutism, and also against the lower strata of the 
people, who were impatiently pursuing their object and 
pressing forward. Their armed organisation was that 
of the National Guard. The bourgeoisie remained the 
victor in the revolutionary struggle, and along with 
the bourgeoisie the National Guard was established as 
an institution for the protection of the propertied 
classes, who themselves nominated their officers and 
who possessed a certain degree of independence, as 
against the Government. 

The height of importance was attained by the 
National Guard in the July monarchy, 1830 to 1848. 
Nevertheless, it could not save that monarchy, and 
proved itself in 1848 to be very unreliable. Napoleon 
III., after his coup d'etat, took from the National 
Guard its independence, namely, the right to elect its 
own officers, but he dared not dissolve it completely. 
Then came the war of 1870 and the speedy defeat. 
Once again the Fatherland was in danger, and once 
again the spirits of 1913 were incited to continue the 
traditions of the victorious fight againeit Europe, by 
means of the " levie en masse," through the armed 
rising of the whole people. Under pressure of this 
situation, the legislative Body in Paris on August 11th 
proclaimed a law, on the proposal of Jules Pavres, that 
the National Guard, from being a citizen Guard, should 
be converted into a universal Guard for the whole 
nation. To the sixty old battalions of the National 



70 TEBEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

Guard, which were drawn from the propertied classes, 
were attached two hundred new battalions from the 
power classes, who even had the privilege of nomina- 
ting their own officers. In this way the new battalions 
of the National Guard of Paris became in reality the 
organisation of the proletariat. The whole law over 
the extension of the National Guard was really due 
to sudden fright rather than to mature reflection. The 
fathersi feared their children, eo they decided to do all 
in their power to prevent these children from gaining 
strength. But they could not hinder the Paris pro- 
letariat from arming itself; the military authorities of 
Paris, however, under the command of Troeus, 
omitted everything which could have helped towards 
the National Guard's developing into troops of any use. 
In this way they betrayed their Fatherland, but they 
feared the Paris workmen more than the soldiers of 
Wilhelm. In Paris, at the beginning of the siege, one 
himdred thousand troops were to be foxmd,- and in 
addition a himdred thousand Giiards. If one assumes 
that, of the more than three hundred thousand National 
Guards, two hundred thousand were fit for active 
service, that makes altogether an army of four hundred 
thousand men, to which the Germans, when they were 
outside Paris, could not have opposed more than half 
the number, which, moreover, were scattered over a 
very wide area. But from August onwards the 
National Giiard was given ample time to get into 
shape. As a consequence, the authorities in Paris 
had a large ma,]'ority at their disposal to oppose the 
Germans. If they should succeed in breaking through 
at any point the iron ring that enclosed Paris, the 
outlook for the German army of ever winning the war 
was extremely small. But that would have been 
possible only if the National Guard could become 
militarily organised at once. Before this eventuality 
they shrank. They preferred to lose the war, and to 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 71 

hand over Alsace-Lorraine to the enemy. That is 
what tihe Parisians felt, and hence their fury against 
those rulers who had betrayed France. When Paris 
had capitulated, and the whole Assembly had been 
elected, and when the hatred of this latter body againei 
the Bepublic and the capital had come to light in the 
most provocative way, the Parisians realised that they 
were involved in a serious conflict. The only power 
on which they could rely was the National Guardi. 
The Revolutionary battalions had ahready, dtiring the 
siege, kept in close contact with one another. They 
now joined into a federation. Hence they were called 
the Federalists. It was on February 15th that the 
delegates of the revolutionary battalion© first met 
together, in order to discuss the federation. They 
appointed a commission to draw up the Statutes, which 
were then laid before the new Assembly on February 
24th ; but the Assembly was at that time too excited to 
deliberate, because a German invasion was feared. 
They broke up the meeting, in order to take part in a 
revolutionary demonstration on the Place de la 
Bastille. ' During the followiHg days, a provisional 
Central Committee of the National Guard came into 
being; which was in the highest degree necessary, in 
view of the imminent incursion of the Germans, and 
in order to guard against panic. It was not until 
March 3rd that the delegates' Assembly came to any- 
thing like a definite organisation. It was decided 
that a Central Committee of the National Guard should 
be app(Hnted, consisting of three delegates for each 
of the twenty districts (arondissements) of Paris. 
Two of the three were elected by the Council of the 
Legion, and the third by the Chief of the Battalion 
of the Legion. On March 15th the men chosen as the 
definite Central Committee met together, and so dis- 
solved the Provisional Committee, which had func- 
tioned hitherto. One might regard this Central Com- 
mittee, since it wasi elected froin among the National 



72 TEEEOKISM AND COMMUNISM 

Guard, as a Soldiers' Council; but it was cho«en from 
among the proletariat and from the National Guard, 
who stood in close relation with the proletariat, since 
the battalion of the leisured classes took no part in 
these deliberations. According to the information 
received by the Central Committee, this latter had 
supporting it, on March 18th, 215 of the 260 battalions 
of the Paris National Guard. So far, therefore, it was 
a kind of Workmen's Coimcil. One can therefore 
quite well compare it with the Central Committee of 
Workmen's and Soldiers' Councils. Nevertheless, the 
Paris Commime was by no means a Soviet Eepublic. 
When on March 18th the Government took to flight, 
there was none to occupy public ofi&ce. This very 
naturally fell to the Central Committee, for it was the 
only organisation in Paris that was held in universal 
esteem, although all its members were wholly un- 
known people. On March 10th they met together, in 
order to deliberate what was to be done. As is so 
often the case, they formulated the problem on this 
occasion as an " either, or " whereas a " both, and " 
would have been more to the point. Thus the Social- 
ists repeatedly discussed the question whether there 
should be reform or revolution, instead of saying that 
the striving for reform and the struggle for revolution 
should be so conducted, that neither one of these move- 
ments should exclude the other, but rather support it. 
On March 19th some members of the Central Com- 
mittee demanded that a march should be made against 
Versailles. Others wanted to appeal to the electors 
then and. there, and again, others wanted first of all 
to take revolutionary measures. As if each one of 
these steps was not equally necessary, and as if any 
of them could exclude the other! The Central Com- 
mittee decided, in the first place, to take only one 
of these steps, and one that seemed to be the most 
imperative. It wished to show that behind the Paris 
rising the majority of the electors was to be found. 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 73 

and it wished in this way to give the insurrection the 
greatest moral support. That was perfectly right; 
only it would have been more advantageous to streng- 
then, by means of revolutionary power, the moral 
authority of the General Election as against the 
enemy, who himself was undoubtedly endeavounug to 
get the support of the army. The immediate election of 
a communal administration for Paris, based on univer- 
sal suffrage, which the Empire had hitherto withheld 
from the Parisians, was certainly inevitable. Immedi- 
ately after the downfall of the Empire in September, 
1870, the Paris workmen had obtained from the new 
provisional Government the assurance that the election 
of a commune would soon be undertaken. The failure 
to fulfil this promise contributed not a little to the 
disorders that arose during the siege. The iusun-ee- 
tions of October 31st and of January 22nd took place 
amid the cries of " Long live the Commune." Hence it 
was necessary to make at once a complete list of the 
electors for the Commune. It was arranged first for 
the 22nd, and then for the 26th of March. The Central 
Committee regarded itself merely as a temporary body 
to hold places in reserve for those who should be elected 
by universal and equal suffrage. In the Journal 
Officiel de la Bepublique Frangaise de la Commune of 
March 20th, the following announcement was made to 
the citizens of Paris : 

" In three days you will be called upon, in perfect 
freedom, to elect members for district representation 
of Paris. Those who have seized power as the result 
of necessity will then hand over their provisional 
authority into the hands of the elected of the 
people." 

But they did not stick to their promise. After the 
Commune had been constituted the Central Com- 
mittee delegated its power to that body on March 28th. 
It- even went so far as to give signs thaij it would 
dissolve completely; but the Commune did not insist 



74 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

on this, and so this Central Committee continued to 
fimctdon under the Commune as a part of the military 
machinery. This did not serve to facilitate the carry- 
ing on of business, nor the conduct of war. But the 
Central Committee never attempted to upset the prin- 
ciple that the supreme power belonged to those elected 
by imiversal suffrage. This Central Committee never 
claimed that all power should fall to the Workmen's 
and SoldieiBi' Coimcils, that is, in the present case, 
to the Central Committee of the workmen's battalions. 
In this point also, therefore, the Paris Commune was 
the exact contrary to the Euisaian Eepublic, and yet 
Freiderioh Engels wrote on March 18th, 1891, on the 
twentieth aimiversary of the Paris Commune: 
" Gentlemen, do you want to know what the dictator- 
ship of the proletariat looks like? Look at the Paris 
Commune. That was the dictatorship of the prole- 
tariat." We see that Marx and Engels, tinder the title 
of dictatorship, in no way understood the withholding 
of imiversal and equal suffrage, or the suppression of 
democracy. 



The Jacobins in the Commune. 

At the election on March 26, ninety members of the 
Commune were elected. These included fifteen Govern- 
ment supporters, and six citizen radicals who were in op- 
position to the Government, but who nevertheless con- 
demned the insTirrection. A Soviet Eepublic would never 
have allowed such elements of the counter-revolution- 
aries to appear as candidates, let alone to be elected as 
members. The Commune, out of its respect for demo- 
cracy, never hindered its civil opponents from election. 
If their activity in the Commune came to a sudden end, 
this was their own fault. The company in which they 
found themselves was not to their lining, and they very 
soon took their departure. Some, indeed, retired 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 75 

before the election candidates met together, and others, 
a few days after the Commune was estabhshed. These 
resignations, as well as certain mandates, made a re- 
election imperative, and this took place on April 16th. 
The great majority of the members of the pommune 
were on the side of the insurrection. Moreover, among 
the revolutionary members of the Commune, not all 
were Socialists. The majority consisted simply of 
revolutionaries. Most of them were guided by the prin- 
ciples laid down in 1793, and by the traditions of the 
Jacobins. Some had already shown their allegiance in 
1848 to the " Mountain," for instance, Delesoluse and 
Pyat, and not a few were forced out of tiieir private 
professional life as the result of their political struggle, 
and became conspirators and revolutionaries by pro- 
fession. The older members among them Hved accord- 
ing to the traditions of the past, and had no real interest 
for new developments and conceptions. 

" The others, that is the younger ones, were to a 
lai^e extent men who resorted to force without any 
sound foundation. They were often merely heroes 
in word, and were now playing with the insurrection 
just as, a few months before, they had played with wars 
— men who talked a great deal and contented them- 
selves with mere talking. Their revolutionary ideas were 
confined to mere externalities. They were superficial, 
and even the very best of them were actuated by feel- 
ing rather than by reason." This is the criticism of 
these men given by that great revolutionary, Dubreuilh. 
(" La Commune," page 332.) 

Most of them understood nothing about Socialism. 
Not a few of them were du-ectly against it, especially 
Delescluse. One could not call them bourgeoise politi- 
cians in the sense that they at all represented the 
interests of the propertied classes. On the contrary 
they stood side by side with the lower classes and 
fought for them as much as the people of the " Moun- 
tain " of 1793 had done. But just like these latter, 



76 TEREOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

they could not escape from the questions of property 
and privilege belonging to the bourgeois classes, and for 
this reason they may be said to have formed a bour- 
geois element. This applies to the majority of the 
revolutionaries in the Commune. Only a few of them 
belonged to the working classes. Among them were 
to be found ordinary officials, apothecaries, investors, 
lawyers, and, above all, journalists. Different from the 
Jacobins were the Blanquistes, seven in number, 
among them Blanqui himself, who, however, could not 
take his seat. It shows how little the Blanquistes 
expected the insurrection of March 18th, for Blanqui, 
shortly before the outbreak, in order to recuperate his 
health, had left Paris. On March 17th he was arrested 
in Figeac (Department Lot). Blanqui agreed with the 
Jacobins on one point, namely, in their endeavour, by 
means of an insurrection on the part of the lower classes 
in Paris, to govern Paris ; and through Paris, by means 
of a regime of force, the whole of France. Biit they 
went further than the Jacobins, since they recognised 
that this method of government would not suffice to 
liberate the exploited^, unless that government could 
be used to create a new social order. In other words 
they were Socialists. Yet in their case it was always 
the political rather than the economic interest that 
weighed most with them. They did not study economic 
life, nor did they endeavour to gain asy systematic 
economic knowledge. They betrayed this characteristic 
by frequently excusing ignorance, saying that they 
wished to be entirely untrammelled by dogma. They 
did not want to be "bewildered " by prejudices and 
" academic discussion." When the proletariat came 
into power, they said, it would very soon know what it 
had to do. Their chief concern was to give the prole- 
tariat this power, and they regarded the insurrection, 
which was being prepared, as a means towards this 
end. 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 77 

They were unfortunate, however, since the insur- 
rections which they carefully prepared always came 
to grief, and the one that was successful found them un- 
prepared. Moreover, the Blanquiste teaching made no 
great claims on the intelligence, but contented itself 
with immediate action. Indeed, this teaching had 
enormous attraction for men of action. In spite of this 
fact, however, it found more acceptance among the 
intellectuals, especially students, than among the 
workmen. 

The following is a tabulation of the elements which 
constituted the Blanquiste Party at that time. On 
November 17th, 1866, a secret meeting of the Blan- 
quiste group was surprised by the police in a Paris cafe 
and the members were arrested. There were forty-one, 
and each one's occupation was given. These included 
fourteen artisans, four shop assistants, thirteen 
students, six journalists, one lawyer, one foreman, one 
landowner, and one independent merchant. The 
number of students would have been far greater, only 
on November 7th the holidays were not yet at an end, 
and so many students were absent from Paris. 

This meeting throws a light upon Blanquism, not 
only on the manner of its constitution but also on its 
aims. In September, 1866, the International Con- 
gress met in Geneva, and the Blanquistes were invited 
to attend. Blanqui refused, but two of the chosen 
delegates, namely, the lawyer Protot and the employee 
Himabert, nevertheless went. In consequence there 
was great excitement in the Blanquiste camp; for, 
according to its traditions, the dictatorship belonged, 
not only to the proletariat, but also to the leader of 
their party. Both kinds of dictatorship were closely 
connected. For the first time since the existence of 
the Blanquiste organisation an order from the head of 
the party had been disobeyed. Up to that time they 
had followed in blind obedience, and even later they 
adhered to this principle. A meeting was held on 



78 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

November 7th in order to bring Protot to judgment; but 
this meeting was dissolved before any conclusion was 
reached. A few were able to take to flight, among 
them Protot himself. The others, as we have said, 
were arrested. (Charles Da Costa, " Les Blanquistes, ' ' 
Paris, 1912, pages 17-22). 

. Among the Blanquistes of the Commune were found 
the lawyer Protot again, and also two of the members 
who were arrested on November 7th. They were the 
lawyer Tridon and the student Eaoul Eigault. Among 
the others elected were Blanqui, a lawyer and a doctor 
(who had studied both faculties), Eudes, an apothe- 
cary, and Ferr6, an aocoimtant. In the whole 
Blanquiste faction was found only one single working 
man, the coppersmith Chardon. Of the elected 
members of the International who were found in the 
Commune two had relations with the Blanquistes, 
namely, a smith, Duval, and the student Vaillant. 
We see how much the intellectuals preponderated 
amongst them. Even within the Commune itself, the 
Jacobins, like the Blanquistes, troubled little about 
economic questions. The war against Versailles, the 
policing of Paris^ and the struggle against the Church — 
these were the questions to which they devoted their 
«nergies. This last struggle also, like the military 
struggle against Versailles and the police struggle 
against the Versailles associates in Paris, was carried 
out by means of force, and by an attack on persons 
and externalities. 



The International and the Commune. 

The third of the groups in the Commune was formed 
by members of the International, seventeen in num- 
ber, almost exclusively Proudhonistes. Proudhonism 
was in sharp contrast to Blanquism and Jacobinism. 
The Eegiment of Terror of 1793 was for Proudhonism 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 79 

something to be avoided, not to be imitated. It saw 
very clearly the weaknesses of this regiment and the 
uHavoidability of its failure. It realised that the mere 
acquirement of political power on the part of the 
proletariat could alter nothing in its social position, 
and that it could not abolish the system of exploitation 
from which the proletariat suffered. It realised 
further that the change could be reached, not 
by political disturbances but only through an 
economic reorganisation. This, therefore, made the 
Proudhonistes suspicious of the Blanquiste methods, 
suspicious of the insurrection and of Terrorism, and 
none the less opposed to democracy. In the February 
Eevolution of 1848 the Parisian Proletariat had con- 
quered the democracy; but what bad it gained by its 
action ? A growing, mistrust of the proletarian struggle 
for political freedom, and of the participation of the 
proletariat in matters of policy animated the Proud- 
honistes. 

To-day similar ideas have arisen, and are offered as 
the latest products of Socialistic thought, as the pro- 
duet of experience, which Marx neither knew nor could 
know of. These are merely variations of ideas that 
are over half a century old, but they have not for that 
reason become more correct. Proudhonism showed 
how a policy for the liberation of the proletariat, 
undertaken by means of an economic transformation 
alone, is doomed to failure. To-day we preach about 
the powerlessness of democracy to free the proletariat, 
so long as this proletariat is held bound in the chains 
of capitalism. But if economic liberation must 
precede the political, then, logically, every kind of 
political activity on the part of the proletariat is equally 
useless, of whatever kind it may be. Whereas the 
Blanquistes devoted their attention exclusively to the 
political struggle against the existing powers of State, 
Proudhonism, equally exclusively, sought means to 
give the proletariat economic freedom, without any 



80 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

assistance from the State. As a consequence, the 
Blanquistes reproached the Proudhonistes for dis- 
couraging the working classes in their struggle against 
the Second Empire, under which they lay bleeding. Even 
Marx accused Proudhon, saying that " he coquetted 
with Louis Bonaparte and endeavoured to justify him 
in the eyes of the French working-men." (In his 
article of January, 1865, which appeared m the 
German edition of "Misery of Philosophy," second 
edition, page 32.) On the other band, the 
Proudhonistes were conscious of the class antagonism 
between the proletariat and the bourgeois, for the 
good reason that, with the Proudhonistes, the economic 
question was of first importance. They realised, 
further, that the proletariat would have to trust to its 
own strength to gain its freedom. They realised this 
far more than the Blanquistes; for these latter were 
to a large extent a student party, whereas the 
Proudhonistes formed the real Labour Party in France 
under the Second Empire. 

When in the 'sixties the Labour Movement every- 
where awoke from the death-sleep into which it fell, as 
a result of the reaction after 1848, and at the time when 
the International of the working party was being 
formed, it was the Proudhonistes in France who joined 
up with them. This was reason enough for Blanqui 
to forbid his followers to attach themselves also. In 
the International, however, they learnt to know of a 
new order of theory and practice, which made them 
turn away all the moire from one-sided Proudhonism. 
For jufit at the time of the foundation of the Inter- 
national Labour League, their leader, Proudhon, died 
on January 19th, 1865, and in France a new condition 
arose for the continuation of the class struggle. 
Proudhon wished to inaugurate a purely labour move- 
ment without politics, but that was possible only by 
renouncing al! attempts at a struggle that would 
involve their coming into conflict with State authority. 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 81 

Quite peaceful means were to be employed to free the 
working classes, namely, guilds, banks of excbange, 
a mutual system of insurance. These ideas were pos- 
sible in Paris where industry, as has been shown before, 
had very little of the character of manufacture on a 
large scale, and where the exploiting capitalist 
appeared to the workman much more as the monied 
capitalist, taking all the profits, than as a real indus- 
trial contractor. 

In the International the French Proudhonistes learnt 
something of English industrial capitalism, and of a 
Labour Movement corresponding to this capitalism, 
which laid most emphasis, in economic matters, on 
the importance of the organisation of their struggle, on 
Trade Unions and strikes, with which the Proudhonist 
would have nothing to do. Over and above this system 
of practice, there arose a theory which shed the clearest 
light upon the laws underlying modern society and 
social life, a theory which was still unknown to the 
majority of the International, and was not rightly 
understood even by those who knew. The creator of 
■this theory, however, by his immense superiority, 
inspired the International in all its activity with his 
spirit and ideas. In Marx's theory, the one-sidedness 
of Proudhonism and of Blanquism also was overcome. 
Like the Proudhonistes, Marx recognised that the 
economic relations were of the first importance, and 
that without some alteration of these relations no 
political change of whatever kind could possibly 
emancipate the proletariat. But, none the less, he 
recognised that the possession of State power and 
authority was absolutely necessary in order to break 
the domination of capital, and in order to carry out 
the emancipation of the proletariat by economic 
changes. The fimdamental importance of the 
economic factor received at the hands of Marx 
an utterly different character from that given by 
Proudhon. Economics in the eyes of Marx made poU 



82 TEKEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

tics not superfluous, but necessary. The character and 
ou,tcome of political struggle and its very effect 
depended, to a large extent, on the economic question. 
But he realised that economic conditions themselves 
form a steadily progressing process, which makes a 
political result possible to-day and inevitable 
to-morrow, whereas yesterday it seemed impossible. 
The relation between economics and politics consisted 
for him in studying the economic conditions and 
tendencies, and in ajttempting to make political laims 
and methods fit in with them. The Blanquistes and 
Proudhonistes, on the other hand, entirely neglected 
the historical aspect. Their chief endeavour was not 
at any given moment to find out what was possible and 
necessary from sm economic point of view, but to find 
the means which, under all conditions and in al? 
historical and economic circumstances, should give the 
desired result. If the Socialists have foimd the right 
means, they are then in a position to carry out their 
Socialism exactly as they wish. It was believed that 
these ideas had been superseded by Marxism, but we 
find them still in existence even to-day. Once again 
we find men in Moscow and Budapest who, instead of 
asking what policy is possible and necessary in the 
present economic conditions, are proceeding from ithe 
standpoint that, since Socialism is desired by the Pro- 
letariat, the Socialists have a duty to carry out their 
Socialism, wherever they have the power to do so. 
Their duty consists not in examining whether, and how 
far, this scheme is possible, but in discovering where 
the Philosopher's stone is to be found, that universal 
remedy which Socialism, in all circumstances and in 
all conditioms, undertakes to provide. And people of 
the present day believe that this problem has been 
solved by the proclamation of the dictatorship on the 
basis of the Coimcil system. In the Second French 
Empire the Blanquistes thought to discover the 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 83 

Philosopher's stone in a revolt, the Proudhonistes, in 
the banks of exchange. 

Even at the present day Marx has been Uttle under- 
stood. He demanded far too great mental energy and 
far too great subordination of personal desires and 
needs. But, in a general way, all the aims, ways, and 
means adopted by him, as well as by Engels, were suc- 
cessful, because the logic of things was on their side. 
In consequence, the Marxist ideas gradually ousted the 
Proudhonist ideas from the French Internationalists. 
As soon as the Labour movement again came to life in 
France, Trade Unions and strikes were inevitable. The 
Empire endeavoured to lead the movement on legal and 
non-political lines, and sanctioned the formation, in 
1864, of Trade Unions, as well as the carrying out of 
strikes — in the very year in which the International 
was founded. The members of this International, 
including the Proudhonistes, not only were forced to 
take part in this spontaneous Labour movement, but 
circumstances forced them, as the best representatives 
of the economic interests of the Labour classes, to come 
to the head of the organisation and the movement. 
It was inevitable that they should thus come into con- 
flict wilih the State authority, and in this way lihey were 
drawn into the political struggle, into the struggle 
against the Empire. Under these circumstajices the 
ideas of the French Internationalists, which at the 
start had been Proudhonist in character, became more 
and more Marxist in colour. Yet, at the outbreak of 
the revolt of the Commune, not one of them could be 
described as a Marxist. They had lost their old Proud- 
honist foundation, but had not yet gained new ground. 
Their ideas were still lacking in clearness. Neverthe- 
less they were the members of the Commune who took 
the most trouble to examine economic life, and who 
best understood the vital needs of the time. They 
formed the real Labour representatives in the Com- 
mune. Li&sagaray says about them: — 



84 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

" People have said that the Commune was a 
Government ol the working classes. That is a great 
mistake. The working classes took part in the 
struggle, in the administration, and their breath 
, alone made the movement great ; but they were very 
little engaged, in actual government. The election 
of March 26th gave the workers only 25 votes as 
against 70, which went to the revolutionaries." 
("History of the Commune," second edition, page 
145.) 

But of these 25, the majority, 13, belonging to the 
International, had all told only 17 representatives in 
the Commune. Only four of the International were 
not Labour members and of these one of ithem, the 
student, Vaillant, had leanings towards the BlaJi- 
quistes. Out of the 13 members of the Labour group 
among the Internationals we .find the most important 
men in the Commune, nam«ly the bookbinder, Varlin, 
the carpenter, Theiss, the painter, Malon, and the 
jeweller, Frankel. In accordance with their Party 
standpoint they left all direct action, the conduct of 
the war, and the organisation of the police, to the 
Jacobins and Blanquistes, and turned their attention to 
the question of peace, to the administration of the 
districts, and to economic changes. Only one of them 
showed any warlike spirit, namely, the metal worker, 
Duval, and he was inclined, as we know, like Vaillant, 
to Blanquism. He was one of those in the Commune 
who, at the outbreak of April 3rd, was captured and shot 
by order of General Vinoy. Thus he was one of the 
first martyrs of the Commune. 

His comrades in the International confined their 
attention almost entirely to the economic problems, 
and they did remarkably good work, namely, in admin- 
istration. For instance, Theiss in postal arrange- 
ments, Varlin and Avrial in other important positions 
of command, in spite of the. enormous difficulties, 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 85 

which arose from the fact that the higher officials hav- 
ing fled from Paris, or at least from their positions, the 
working classes had suddenly to take over and carry 
on work to which they were wholly strangers. Along 
with the Internationalists of the Commune there were 
other members of the Paris International who were 
successful in their labours, for instance, the bronze 
worker, Camelinat, who, in the month of April, took 
over the coinage, and in a very few weeks made vast 
improvements, which, after the fall of the Commune, 
were still maintained. Then there was Bastelica who 
undertook the direction of customs, and Combault,. 
Director of Indirect Taxation. Both were workmen. 

One of the first actions on the part of the Commune 
consisted in handing over the separate districts of the 
Executive, not to individual ministers but to special 
commissions. The Commission for Labour, Industry 
and Exchange, also the Commission representing 
the Socialist side of the Commune consisted of the 
Internationalists Malin, Theiss, Dupont (basket 
maker), and Avrial (mechanic), Gerardin and one 
single Jacobin, whose occupation I could not find. Of 
the five members of the Commission for Finance, three 
belonged to the International, the painter, Victor 
element Varlin, and the rather wealthy philanthropist, 
Beslay, one of the few bourgeois in the International. 
Besides these men there were the Jacobin, Eegere, a 
veterinary surgeon, but an old fighter against the 
Empire, as well as the cashier, Jourdes, who had no 
particular tendencies, and who was the real head of 
finance, through whose hands millions of francs had to 
pass, while his wife continued to carry on the family 
washing in the Seine, he himself never dining at a 
higher cost than 1.60. fr. In both the Commissions for 
labour and finance utterly different methods were 
employed from those in the Commissions for the army 
and police. The contrast in these methods has been 
very well characterised by Mendlessohn, in his 



86 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

appendix to Lissagaray's, " History of the Commune " 
(second German edition). 

' ' The war administration in the Commune had very 
little satisfactory means to hand. &ere we find 
incapacity, ignorance, vanity, absence of all feeling for 
responsibiUty, etc. Here we find the reflection of aU 
the unfortunate disorganisation of the conditions under 
which the Socialist movement had to suffer during the 
Empire, and we need only go from the Place Ven- 
dome to the Prefecture of Police, in order to find the 
second reflection of these conditions. 

" We certainly find a peaceful change from the noisy 
self-importance of the new Hebertists, who formed the 
general staff of police at the time, when we pass over 
to the Ministry of Labour and the Ministry of 
Exchange. The name itself shows the influence of 
the Proudhonist doctrine. Apart from this, however, 
the conscientious and modest members of the Inter- 
national were so occupied in their labour, that they put 
aside all that was impossible and fantastic. Eegarding 
themselves as a committee of the working-classes, they 
did not look for signs of their power in orders and 
badges. They formed a commission out of the 
members of the Trade Unions and Labour Commis- 
sions. As a result, this Ministry so carried on its 
work, that one can say it did what it could according 
to the conditions then prevailing, and never under- 
took anything that it could not carry out." 

In this Ministry the Socialists stood well concen- 
trated. It was Marxist in character. It represented 
the actual revolutionary elements in the Commune, 
and yet it showed a measure of caution, which was 
perfectly amazing. The reason for this caution, which 
was also noticeable in the Ministry of Finance, was 
given by Jourde on the occasion of a debate on pawn- 
brokers' shops. It was ordered that pledged clothes, 
household fiuniture and utensils up to twenty francs 
in value should be returned to their original owners 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 87 

without payment from May 12th onwards. The State 
undertook the compensation. In the coiu'se of this 
debate Avrial proposed that in the place of these pawn- 
brokers' shops a better kind of Labour institute should 
be established, whereupon Jourde replied: 

" They say form an institute. But that is all very 
well. We must first have time in order to study the 
question before we do anything. If Avrial was told to 
manufacture cannons he would demand more time. 
I demand that also." (Sitting of May 6th, Officiel 
Journal of May 7th, page 493.) 

The Commune found no time to do anything on a 
large scale on the social question, and the best people 
among them would not undertake anything, without 
thoroughly studying the question first. Most of their 
social measures would to-day seem trivial. For 
instance, the suspension of niglhit labom: among the 
bakers, and the prohibition of fines in business houses. 
The most important conclusion never got beyond mere 
examination. During the siege and after March 18th 
there was a large number of factories in Paris closed 
down by their owners, who fled and escaped. On the 
proposal of Avrial an inqtdry into this very serious 
question for the working classes was made, and the 
conclusion ran as follows: 

' ' In consideration of the fact that numerous factories 
have been closed down by those who hitherto ran 
them, in order that the owners might avoid their civil 
duties, and without taking into consideration the 
interests of the workmen; further, in consideration of 
the fact that, through this cowardly flight from their 
positions, much important labour for the communal 
life has been interrupted, and that the working nan 
is thus endangered, the Commune of Paris makes the 
following declaration: 

" The Trade Unions of the workmen shall be called 
together, in order to form commissions of inquiry with 
the following object in view : 



88 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

" (1) To gather statistics of the businesses thus 
closed down, as well as an exact description of the 
state in which they are at present, as well as of the 
machinery contained therein ; 

■' (2) To provide a report as to the practica,! 
measures to be taken in order to put these factories 
into working order, not through those who have 
deserted them, but through associations of workmen 
who were employed in them ; 

" (3) To form a scheme of action for these associa- 
tions ; 

" (4) To set up a court of arbitration, which shall 
settle under what conditions these factories shall be 
definitely handed over to the possession of these 
Labour associations, when the owners who have fled 
shall return to Paris; and further, to decide on the 
compensation that these associations shall make to 
the original owners. This Commission of Inquiry must 
lay its report before the Commune Commission for 
Labour and Exchange. Furthermore, and in the 
shortest possible time, a synopsis of this decree, which 
shaU serve the interests of the Commune and of the 
workmen, is to be laid before the Commune." 

This Order is dated April 16th and the Journal 
Officiel, April 17th. 

This Commission of Inquiry met together on May 
10th and 19th. Soon after that came the defeat of the 
Commune. That socialising Commission therefore 
came to no practical result. Nevertheless, its forma- 
tion was of importance, for it pointed the way which 
the Socialists of the Commune would have been forced 
to go, if the proletariat regime had been of longer 
duration. There could be no question of a complete 
socialising or of an immediate elimination of the whole 
system of capitalistic enterprise. On the contrary, 
these very men were reproached for abandoning their 
factories in such a cowardly manner, and for leaving 
the working man without employment. At the same 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 89 

time, however, the contrary reproof was hurled at 
them. 

The Central- Committee of the twenty arondisse- 
ments (districts) (not to be confused with that of the 
National Guard, which had been formed during the 
Siege), complained that the employers had kept the 
workmen in the factories, and in this way prevented 
them from fulfilling their duty as members of the 
National Guard. Only those concerns which had been 
abandoned by their owners were to be socialised, in 
the first place, according to the plan of the Commune; 
and only these after very careful and exact consider- 
ation. Another step in the direction of socialisation 
was planned in connection with supplies for army 
uniforms and ammunition. These supplies were, as 
far as possible, to be made through the workmen's 
associations on the basis of Treaties of Supplies, which 
were to be drawn up by the Director, in common with 
the Guards and the Minister of Labour. There is to 
hand a scheme of Labour Order, which was submitted 
by the workers to the Commune, and which was 
concerned with the factories employed in repairing 
arms, and demanded a fixed ten-hours day. 
This Order, which contains some twenty-two para- 
graphs, was printed in the Journal Officiel de la 
Commune on May 21st (pages 628-629). It shows very- 
well the socialising tendencies of the Socialist workers 
of the Commune. In accordance with this Order, the- 
workers elected their own representatives of work- 
shops in the Commune, their own superintendent, as 
well as their foremen. A Management Council was 
formed consisting of the above officials, to which a 
workman from each worker's bench was allowed to- 
come. On the part of the Commune a Supervisory 
Council was to be formed, which should be duly 
informed of all that was done, and which had free 
access to inspect the books and ledgers. The workmen 
showed themselves to be very anxious to uphold the 



90 TERE0KI8M AND COMMUNISM 

interests of the Commune. In Article 15 the scheduled 
time was fixed at ten hours per day, and not at eight, 
which the International Congress of Geneva in 1866 
had demanded. In special cases of urgency over- 
time was permitted, if the Management Council agreed. 
For any overtime no increased pay was granted. Apart 
from this, the wages at that time were very low. The 
Director received 250 francs a month, the manager 
210, the foreman 70 cents, an hour. For the ordinary 
worker there was no minimum wage fixed, but a 
maximum wage. He could not receive more than 60 
cents, an hour. Interesting also is the declaration 
contained in Article 16, which ordains that there 
should always be a night watchman in the workshops 
in case of weapons being needed. Every workman 
was boimd to take his turn at night duty. The 
conclusion ran as follows : 

" As under the present circumstances it is absolutely 
necessary to be as economical as possible with every 
farthing of the Commune, the night watchman will 
not be paid." {Journal Offioiel, page 629.) 

Truly these workmen did not regard the time of their 
" dictatorship " as an opportune moment for demand- 
ing an increase of wages. The great and general cause 
for good, in their estimation, had a higher claim than 
their own personal interests. 



The Socialism of the Commune. 

In spite of bis volcanic temperament, Marx did not 
find anything in these precautionary measures to 
which he could not agree. He said in his " Civil War 
in France," page 53: 

" The great social measure adopted by the Com- 
nnme was one for the existence of the working element. 
This special measure could only point the way in which 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 91 

a government of the people, through the people, could 
function. ' ' 

After Marx had so described the dictatorship of the 
prolet^ariait as the government of the people through the 
people, in other wonds, as democracy, he continues, and 
praises the financial measures adopted by the Com- 
mune as " excellent both in their wisdom and 
moderation " (page 54). 

Shortly before, Marx shows in the same work the 
principles on which a period of transition from 
capitalism to Sociahsm must proceed: — 

" The working classes did not demand any miracle 
from the Commune. It had no ready-made Utopias to 
introduce, as a result of popular decision. It knew 
that, in order to obtain its own freedom, and to fashion 
along with that some better standard of living, which 
the present state of society had made impossible 
through the economic complications then existing, the 
working class would have to go through a long process 
of preparation, and sustain many fights before men, as 
well as circumstances, could be completely trans- 
formed. It had no ideals to realise. It had merely to 
give the elements of the new society freedom to 
expand, the elements which were already latent in the 
crumbling bourgeois society " (page 50). 

From the sentence, " the working class had no ideals 
to realise," it has been concluded that Marx contri- 
buted to the Social movement no set aim and no 
definite programme. But this is disproved by the fact 
that he himself drew up the Socialistic programmes 
from " The Communist Manifesto " of 1847 onwards 
to the time of the programme of the French Labour 
Party, which he finished in 1880 with the collabora- 
tion of Guesde and LaJargue. In the above-cited 
paragraph he already gives the aims of the Social 
movement, namely, emancipation of the working class 
by means of victory and progressive class war, and the 
creation of a better standard of living, which would 



92 TEEE0EI8M AND COMMUNISM 

follow from the coming into power of the working 
class, and which would be based on the results of 
modem science. 

It might be urged against Marx that these aims were 
nothing else but ideals, and therefore that the working 
class had still ideals to realise, but among the ideals 
which were not realisable Marx clearly understands 'all 
transcendental ideas, such as lie beyond the spheres of 
time and place, such, for instance, as the ideas of 
eternal justice and freedom. The aims of the workers' 
movement were provided by the economic development 
that was then in progress. The special forms of their 
realisation are in a continuous state of development, 
and are indeed dependent on time and space. 
Socialism is for him no ready-made Utopia, but a pro- 
cess which promises a lengthy development of 
economic relations and also of the working class itself, 
a development which should not come to an end after 
a political victory, but which could only continue by 
setting at liberty " the elements of the new society." 

Already two decades before Marx had prescribed a 
lengthy preparation on the part of the working class, 
and the knowledge of the actual state of affairs as 
conditions necessary for the social revolution. After 
the breaking up of the Revolution of 1848, he recog- 
nised, as a result of his study of the economic condi- 
tions, that the Eevolution for the time being had come 
to an end. This brought him into conflict with many 
of his comrades, who saw in this mere treachery 
towards the Eevolution. The masses had need of a 
revolution, and they had the will for it; and therefore 
it was iaevitable, so they said. But Marx replied in 
September, 1850, in the following words: — 

" In place of a critical examination the minority 
(the League of the Communists) sets up the dogmatic ; 
instead of the materialistic conception of things, the 
idealistic. Instead of the actual condition of thiags 
being the driving force of the Eevolution, they seek 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 03 

for that driving force in mere will; whereas we say to 
the workmen, ' you have to go through twenty or fifty 
years of civil wars and struggles, not only to change 
conditions but also to' change yourselves, and to make 
yourselves capable of political government.' You say 
to the workmen, on the contrary, ' we must at once 
seize power or we might as well lie down and sleep.' 
Whereas we point out; specially to the German 
workers, the undeveloped state of the German prole- 
tariat, you flatter in the crudest manner possible their 
national feelings and the class prejudice of the German 
artisan, which is naturally much more popular. 

" Just as the democrats have converted the word 
' people ' into something almost sacred, you have 
done the same with the word ' proletariat. ' Like 
the democrats you substitute the word ' revolution ' 
for 'revolutionary development.'" Marx: (" Dis 
closures in connection with the Communist Congress In 
Cologne," new issue, 1885). 

When Marx protested against the idea that mere 
will should be made the driving force of the Eevolution, 
he did not mean to say, of course, that the will had 
nothing to do with the matter. Without will-power no 
conscious action is possible. Without the will, no 
revolution is possible, indeed no history. The first 
condition of every social movement lies in the strong 
will, which social endeavour engenders, and which 
arises from a deeply felt need. But with the will 
alone nothing can be achieved If the movement is 
to have any success, there must be something 
more than the mere will and mere need. I may have 
the will to live for ever, and this will may be unusually 
strong in me, nevertheless it cannot preserve me 
from death. If then the movement is to have success, 
the will must confine itself to what is possible, and the 
need must find the means to secure its own satisfac- 
tion. Moreover, those who will to do anything must 
possess the power to overcome any opposition tihat 



94 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

may arise. It is the purpose of discussion to dis- 
tinguish, as a result of the examination of actual con- 
ditions, the possible from the impossible, and to show 
the mutual relation of strength. In this way the 
latent powers in humanity can be concentrated on 
what is practicable at the time. In this way all waste 
of energy may be avoided, and the existing power may 
be turned to better use, and operate more intensively. 

This discernment in social matters is, however, by 
no means easy to obtain ; for the economic foundations 
of society are in a state of continuous development and 
change, and, in addition, social needs change also, as 
well as the means by which these needs shall be 
satisfied, and the forces which shall acconaplish what 
is practically possible. Moreover, society becomes more 
complicated, wider in its embrace, and ever more 
difficult to penetrate. Certainly huiman intelligence, it 
is true, increases, and the methods of knowledge 
improve, but the human mind is not always fashioned 
to recognise actual relations as they are. It always 
tries to satisfy the needs of the time. But wherever 
the actual condition of things renders the satisfaction 
of these needs impossible, the humian mind is only too 
inclined, from sheer imagidation, to read into these con- 
ditions a very friendly aspect in accordance with what 
it desires. Man does not wish to die, but knowledge 
of actual conditions tells him that he must die. Yet 
human penetration has managed to discover in these 
very conditions some sign that we continue in 
existence after death. The proletariat of the Eomaa 
Empire lived in wretched poverty. Nevertheless they 
felt most strongly the need for a joyous life of pleasure 
without work; but actual conditions excluded such a 
life from the bounds of possibility. Despite all, their 
human instincts promised them such a life in the 
direction in which they thought they were going. 

The idea of the deity was the means to make the 
weak strong, and the impossible possible. It was to 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 95 

raise the small, ill-treated Jewish people to be lords of 
the earth. It would give the indignant band of defence- 
less peasants, at the time of the Eeformation, the 
\iotory over the well-equipped and well-disciplined 
armies of the potentates of that time. In the nine- 
teenth century the proletariat discontinued to believe 
in a deity that would thus come to the rescue; but 
the picture of the great French Eevolution, in which 
at certain times the proletariat of Paris was able to 
challenge the whole of Europe, caused a new belief in 
mira<5les to arise, , which made them believe in the 
wondrous powers of the Eevolution and the revolu- 
tionary proletariat. They needed merely to will in 
order to achieve what they willed. If nothing came of 
it, that was due merely to the fact that they had not 
willed. As against this idealistic conception, Marx 
championed the materialistic view, which insisted that 
the actual conditions of things should always be taken 
into account. Certainly these conditions made the 
emancipation of the' working classes and a higher 
standard of living one of its aims which " the present 
state of society, as the result of its development, 
absolutely possesses." These aims were not, how- 
ever, to be immediately achieved, like some " ready 
made Utopia." They did not form a complete scheme 
applicable to all times, but engendered merely a new 
form of social movement and development. 

The working class, therefore, is not always, and in 
all circumstances, mature enooigh to take over control. 
It must everywhere go through a period of develop- 
ment, in order to become capable. Furthermore, it 
cannot choose the moment when it shall come into 
power. If the working class does take over control, 
then it must not simply destroy the means of pro- 
duction which it finds in existence. It must rather 
■seek to carry on what is already existent, to develop 
it further in accordance with the needs of the 
proletariat, and to "liberate the elements of the new 



96 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

society," all which in different circumstances requires 
very different treatment. It will thus at any given 
moment more easily find what is attainable the more 
clearly it understands the actual conditions and takes 
them into account. 

When, after the downfall of Napoleon, the 
possibilities of- a proletarian Eevolution arose, Marx 
gave it a good deal of serious thought. Certainly the 
Parisian workers were the most intelligent workers Jn 
the world at that time. They were not living in vain 
in the very heart of the world, in the very home of" 
enlightenment and revolution. Nevertheless, the 
Empire had denied them a good school-system, 
freedom of the Press, as well as political, and for a 
long time also industrial, organisation. Therefore, to 
make use of the Eepublic for the better education and 
organisation of the working classes, to uphold and 
defend the Eepublic with every means in power, 
seemed to Marx to be the most imperative need of 
the time. There was one circumstance which rendered 
acquisition of political power by the workers at the 
timt impossible, namely, the fact that the greater part 
of the country was still agrarian, and the population of 
Paris itself still largely small bourgeois. More- 
over, the world's history does not depend upon 
our mere will power. It can just as little 
postpone the comiag of revolution as it can 
hasten it. The rising of the Paris workers and their 
victory on March 18th were inevitable. From hence- 
forth it was for the people to become clear as to what 
the actual state of affairs permitted the victorious 
proletariat to carry out, and to concentrate all their 
strength upon this design. 

Marx did not regard it as the chief duty of the Paris 
Commune at that time to do away with all capitalistic 
means of production. He wrote to Kugelmann about 
this on April 12th, 1871 : 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 97 

" If you will tiim up the last chapter of my ' 18th 
Brum^re ' you will find that I proposed, aa the next 
attempt for the French Eevolution, to undertake that 
they should not endeavoiir to wrest the bureaucratic 
military machine out of the hands of one ' man and 
give it to another, but smd,sh it up completely. This 
is the necessary condition of every real popular revolu- 
tion on the Continent. This is also what our heroic 
comrades in Paris are attempting." (" The New 
Times," No. 20, 1, page 709.) 

There is no word of Socialism in this letter. Marx 
proclaims that the chief duty of the Commune is to 
destroy the power then in the hands of the bureau- 
crats, the militarists. Obviously the proletariat can 
never come to the head of affairs without striving, 
along with the changes in the organisation of the 
State, to realise also the changes in the organisation 
of the means of production, which should ameliorate 
its position. If we characterise all such attempts at 
political power with this end in view as Socialism, then 
certainly there was Socialism in the Commune, but 
State Socialism was far removed from what we to-day 
understand as Socialism. Naturally that was due in 
part to want of time. The whole rising lasted only a 
few weeks. For the most part this was due to the 
fact that this rising was confined to the small industrial 
elements in Paris. As the result of the existing 
economic basis, little more could be achieved than the 
transformation of eingle workshops into associations of 
productive workers. 

The organisation of a complete branch of industry 
into a unified systern of production and control of its 
exports, as well as of its raw materals, was hardly 
possible at that time. If the Commune had been 
successful, it might have acquired for itself the whole of 
the State and Government machinery. It might also 
have introduced nationalisation of railways, perhaps 
also of mines and ironworks. But all this would not 



98 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

have done away with capitalism, for it was ahready in 
operation to a iBXge extent, or at least in preparation, 
in neighbouring Germany. But under a proletarian 
and democratic regime it would nevertheless have 
greatly raised the social position of the working-class. 
In addition to lack of time and to the economic back- 
wardness of the coimtry, there came a further serious 
hindrance to " socialisation," namely, the ignorance of 
the men who were in the Commune. The Jacobins 
and Blanquistes cared not one farthing for economic 
matters. The Internationalists, as we have seen, 
attributed to them the greatest importaince ; yet just 
at the time of the Commune they were theoretically 
imtenable. These Internationalists had the intention 
of abandoning the Proudhonist basis, but they were 
not prepared to go so far and deh'berately put them- 
selves on the side of the Marxists.. In the meanwhile, 
in spite of their fears, Marx agreed with the method 
of the Commune, namely, first of all to examine the 
economic question before making any changes, and 
not to introduce hasty decrees, which would fail of 
their object, cause confuBion, and finally discourage- 
ment. Even if this caution arose more from theoretic 
uncertainty than from theoretic discernment, it agreed 
with all that Marx, in consequence of his materialistic 
conception of things, regarded as necessary, namely, 
that in the Revolution we must be guided not by raere 
will alone, but by a knowledge of the actual state of 
affairs. Debreuilh has characterised this feature of 
the Paris rising extraordinarily well in his 
" Commune," page 419. 

" The policy of methodic expropriation, quite apart 
from the opposition of the other classes, was 
impossible, for the very good reason that the day 
labourers in the mass had no idea of the constitution 
of society other than the traditional one, and because 
they had not developed any institutions or trade 
guilds, which are absolutely necessary to ensure the 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 99 

normal working oi produafcion and exchange after all 
capitalistic organisation has been removed. It is 
impossible to improvise a new regime, especially a 
Socialistic regime, by means of decrees. Decrees and 
laws should rather make secure the relations already 
existing. If in this matter the Commune had 
attempted to act prematurely, probably the sole 
result would have been to cause a section of its own 
best powers to turn against it, without causing among 
the daily workers any appreciable disposition in their 
favour. They could not do otherwise than prepare the 
way for a general social provision, under the pretence 
of democratising the political machinery then in exist- 
ence; and that is what they did." (DebreuUh.) 

In this way the Marxian idea of the Dictatorship of 
the Proletariat was realised on the social plane. This 
Marxian method of socialisation, which was so very 
much like that of the Commune, must be our method 
to-day. That does not mean to say that this same 
method and this same reserve must be employed in 
present day Germany, as was the case in the Commune 
of 1871 in Paris. Since then, half a century of the 
most powerful capitalistic development has elapsed. 
The enormous progress that was made is shown by 
the fact that, at that time, it was Paris alone which 
rose in an insurrection that was not purely proletarian, 
without any support from the country ; and that it had 
to succumb to the superiority of agrarianism, which 
was intimately bound up with bureaucracy and higher 
finance. In the year 1918 the German Eevolution 
broke out throughout the entire Empire, and it was 
everywhere led by the proletariat. German agriculture 
constitutes hardly more than a quarter of the popula- 
tion (1907 — 29 per cent.), and industry has made 
enormous progress and has advanced to the formation 
of. Trade Unions comprising whole branches of 
industry. 



100 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

The Parisian proletariat in 1871 had only just 
emerged from the Bonaparte regime, which had 
hitherto prevented it from acquiring any means of 
education or of organisation. The German proletariat 
entered on this Eovolution with the political and 
corporate experience of half a century, with political 
and economic organisation, which embraced millions of 
people. And finally, the Socialists of Paris in 1871 
were on the point of giving up an economic theory that 
had proved to be unsatisfactory. But they had not 
gone so far as to evolve another and supeiid' theory. 
German Socialism has at its command the historical 
and economic insight and the clear methods of a theory, 
which has been recognised by the Socialists of all 
countries as the highest and best, and which even the 
bourgeois classes accept, thanks to its enormous 
superiority over any other conception of economics now 
prevailing. In these circumstances Socialism can 
proceed much more rapidly, more energetically and 
with quicker results than was ever possible in 1871. 



Centralisation and Federalism. 

We have already spoken of an economic method of 
the Commune. But we have shown that such a 
method in the real sense of the word was not to be 
found. It is impossible to speak of a well-considered 
and well-planned method in the Commune. For this 
reason alone, that in the Commune so many opposing 
forces were endeavoiuring to work together. The 
method of procedure in the Commune was the result 
of opposition, and not of a definite theory. The 
Socialists themselves in the Commune were not very 
clear and definite, and they represented only the 
minority. Nevertheless their spirit and conception of 
things ruled the economic ideas of Paris at the time. 
Whereas, however, the majority attached little 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 101 

importance to economics, and felt themselves even 
more insecure than did the minority, with politics in 
the Commune it was different. The opposition that 
arose in the Commune over politics was far greater. 
This opposition seriously influenced and almost des- 
troyed the capacity of the Commune for work, but the 
general tendencies arising therefrom gradually found a 
middle course, which Marx also accepted, as he did 
the methods of procedure in regard to economics. We 
know already that the majority of the Commune con- 
sisted of Jacobins' and Blanquistes. When they 
entered the Commune of Paris they hoped to influence 
the whole life of Prance similar to the manner of 
1793. They were Eadical Eepublicans and free- 
thinkers; they wished to destroy the whole apparatus 
of monarchy, of the clerical system as well as the 
bureaucracy, and the standing army; and yet thej 
could have arrived at the supreme command of Paris 
only by means of a State organisation, which would 
have made one of the central positions in Paris a 
strong means of force. They forgot that the Paris 
Commune of 1793, by means of the centralised power 
which was thereby developed, actually prepared the 
way for Bonaparte land the Empire. They hoped to 
get salvation by means of dictatOTial power, without 
realising that a dictatorship, which is not supported 
by sternly disciplined armies and organised adminis- 
tration, is the mere shadow of a dictatorship. In 
strong opposition to the centralising Jacobins were the 
Proudhonistes, who were extremely critical of the tra- 
ditions of 1793, which they in fact abhorred. They 
realised the illusions which led to the Eeign of Terror, 
and which befooled the proletariat and made it blood- 
thirsty and brutal, without in the least aiding it 
towards freedom. But they were not less critical 
towards democracy. Universal suffrage in 1848 had 
helped to create the reactionary National Assembly, 
and had beoome the main support of the Empire. 



102 TEEEOKISM AND COMMUNISM 

Indeed, in the economic conditions of France at that, 
time the State policy, whether of the dictatorship or 
of the democracy, could ofEer no hope for the immediate 
emancipation of the proletariaifc. A means towards 
this end was sought by the Socialists. The idea of 
development in general, as well as of the significance 
which democracy might have for the development of 
political insight and the organising capacity of the 
proletariat, and ultimately for its emancipation — ^to 
this idea they were completely strange. For the 
immediate emancipation of the proletariat at that 
time neither the dictatorship nor the democracy was 
very hopeful. This the Proudhordsbes understood very 
well; but the consequences they drew from this were 
not good. Entirely without . a policy such as they 
wished, they found it was impossible for them to pro- 
ceed. At this time the communal pohcy in certain 
industrial municipalities offered the proletariat quite 
other prospects than those offered by the State policy 
in a country which was preponderantly agrarian. 
Democracy in the districts was of great importance ; in 
the State it was of small account. The bitter critics 
of the State Parliaments, of these " talking shops," as 
they called them, had nothing to say against the com- 
munal talking shops and Parliaments. The sovereignty 
of the municipality became the ideal of the Proud- 
honistes. Their idea is shown already in the status of 
industry as they regarded it. Moreover, they did not 
intend to do away with exchange ; for even at that time 
there were business concerns, whose economic 
importance extended far beyond the single community. 
In order to control such concerns, it was necessary for 
the different municipalities to combine. In this way 
the Proudlionistes hoped to emancipate the industrial 
proletariat and agrarian France. But they forgot one 
small thing, namely, that the idea of dissolving the 
State into sovereign mimicipalities was also a State 
idea, to carry out which the overthrow of the existing 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 103 

"State was necessary, which was exactly what the pro- 
Jetariaifc wished to avoid. The idea of the Commune, 
in the Proudhonist sense, was therefore the direct con- 
trary to the idea such as the Jacobins held. For the 
•Jacobin, the Commune of Paris was a means to obtain 
State power for the control of the whole of France. 
For the Proudhonist, the sovereignty of each Com- 
mune was a means to putting an end to State power as 
«uch. 

Arthur Amould characterises very well this contrast 
of the revolutionary Jacobins and the " Socialist 
Federalists " in his book, " Histoire Populaire et Par- 
liamentaire de la Commune de Paris. " The same words 
were often understood By the different members of the 
Assembly in two quite different ways. " For one 
group, the Commune of Paris represented the first 
application of anti-government principle, the war 
against the old conception of the centralised despotic 
single State. The Commune represented for them the 
triumph of the principle of autonomy, of the free 
federation of groups, and of the most direct form of 
government ' of the people by the people ' ; but in their 
eyes the Commune formed the first stage of a great revo- 
lution, social as well as political, which had nothing to 
do with the old methods of procedure. It was the very 
negation of the idea of a dictatorship. It was the seizure 
of power by the people themselves, and therefore the 
destruction of every power that stood outside the 
people or over them. The people, who so felt and 
thought and willed, represented that group which 
afterwards was called the Socialist Group, or the 
Minority. For the others, on the other hand, the Com- 
mune of Paris was the continuation of the old Cam- 
mime of 1793. In their eyes it represented dictator- 
ship in the name of the people, an enormous concen- 
tration of power in the bands of a few, and the des- 
^;ruction of the old system through the setting up of 
new men at the bead of the system, whom, for the 



104 TEEROBISM AND COMMUNISM 

moment, they provided with arms to fight a war in 
tiie eervice of the people against the enemy of the 
people. 

"Among iihe men of this authoritative group, the idea 
of the centralised individual State had by no means 
disappeared. If they accepted the principle of 
municipal autonomy and the free federation of groups, 
and even proclaimed this on their banners, they did so 
solely because the will of Paris forced them. They 
remained slaves to old habits and thoughts. As soon 
as they c&me into power, they continued in their old 
habits and allowed themselves, certainly with the best 
of intentions, to employ old methods to new ideas. 
They did not realise that in such cases the former 
always gains . the victory in the struggle, and that 
those who try to estabUsh freedom by means of the 
dictatorship, or of mere arbitrariness, generally destroy 
that which they would save. This group, which con- 
sisted of many various elements, formed the majority, 
and they were called ' The Revolutionary Jacobins.' "■ 

Debreuilh has quoted these comments with the 
remark that they referred only to the two extreme 
tendencies. That is true. It is equally true that in 
all such tendencies many new shades of opinion are 
to be found. Still, if we wish to have a clear idea of 
them we must regard the most pronoimced character- 
istic as if it were the classical characteristic. The 
opposition that existed was enormous. It might never 
have been overcome had the Commune been victorious. 
But it was not victorious, and that forced the contend- 
ing parties to strike out some fresh line. From 
April 3rd onwards the Commune found itself on the 
defensive, and had to surrender all idea of conquering 
France and ruling it. In this way all the Jacobin 
hopes fell to the ground. Far from hoping to rule 
through the Commune, they had to be content if they 
succeeded merely in preventing the new-found liberties 
of Paris from being, crushed by reactionary France. 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 105 

But in those circumstances there was just as little 
hope that the Proudhonist dreams would be fulfilled, 
that the French State would crumble to pieces, and 
that complete sovereignty would be bestowed on the 
separate municipalities. The Centralising Jacobins, 
like the Federalist Proudhonistes,~were obliged by the 
force of circumstances to work for the same object, 
which would be realisable under favourable circum- 
stances, which became of paramount importance for 
the whole of Frahoe, and was even demanded by many 
of its citizens and politicians. This object wa®, riaimely, 
the self-oontrol of the municipalities, their independ- 
ence within limits drawn by the State democracy, 
and the. limitation of the power of State bureauctacy, 
as well as the setting up of a militia in place of the 
standing army. The Internationalists recognised this 
democratic State all the more readily, because,, as we 
have seen, they were drawn into a fight against the 
Empire in those latter years, and therefore were 
involved in a State policy and had begun to carry out 
strict Proudhonism mingled with Marxist ideas. 

The final result was a policy, which Marx himself 
would have recognised and sanctioned if he had been 
in Paris ; but he woaild not have been able to join either 
the one or the other party. He would have been quite 
isolated. Nevertheless, force of circumstances and the 
wisdom of the best heads of the Commune, who really 
took into consideration the actual ' circumstances " 
and were not driven by " mere will," resulted in the 
striking out of a line of policy, which showed much 
resemblance to that of Marx himself. To this 
policy, still more than to its economic measures, 
Mendelssohn's remark well appUes (in his appendix 
to Lissagaray, page 525): "The creators of the 
Commune seem not to know what they have created." 

The political order of things newly created by the 
Commune, amidst the bitterest internal struggles, 
proceeded on lines between the two extremes. The 



106 TEEEOKISM AND COMMUNISM 

great misfortune from which the Commune suffered 
was its lack of organisation. It was the natural out- 
come of the lack of organisation, routine and. ability in 
the Parisian proletariat at the time, which had really 
only just broken away frx>m the Empire. The 
Commune, from the very beginning, stood in a state of 
war with Versailles. Nowhere are organisation and 
discipline more necessary than in war. They were 
completely failing in the Commime. The battalions 
of the Commune were commanded by officers whom 
those battalions themselves had elected. In this way 
the officers were independent of the supreme command, 
but were dependent on those who had chosen them. 
On these lines it is impossible to organise a real fight- 
ing army, for such an army is only possible where 
internal disorganisation is forbidden. 

This is what the Bolsheviks in Eussia have seen, for 
they very soon put an end to the powers of the Soldiers' 
Councils and of the election of officers through the men, 
when they found themselves involved in a really serious 
war. Whether or not the different battalions of the 
National Guard obeyed the orders of the supreme com- 
mand depended entirely upon their mood. Small 
wonder, therefore, that the number of actual fighters 
in the Commune was very small. Pay was made to 
162,000 men and 6,500 officers, but the number of 
those who went into the fire and fought varied after 
those fatal days of April 3rd from 20,000 to 30,000. 
These brave fellows had to sustain the whole fearful 
burden of battle against a well-disciplined and well- 
equipped superior force, which in the second half of 
the month of May numbered at least 120,000 men. 
Disorganisation from below was still more increased by 
disorganisation from above. Alongside of the Com- 
mune, the Central Committee of the National Guard 
continued to exist. It had formally handed over all 
its power to the Commxme. Nevertheless, it continued 
to intervene in all orders given to the National Guard. 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 107 

Marx, in a letter to Kugelmann, on the Commune of 
April 12fch, 1871, regards it as a mistake that tihe Central 
Committee so early abandoned its power in order to 
make room for the Commune (" Neue Zeit," XX., 
page 709). He does not give the ground for this state- 
ment, and we therefore cannot tell why this seemed 
to him to be a mistake — apparently on account of the 
reaction of the conduct of the war. He regards this 
mistake as the second one made by the Parisians. The 
first mistake, according to him, consisted in itheir not 
having marched against Versailles immediately after 
March 18th. These two mistakes may have been the 
cause of defeat. In the meantime, unforifcvmately, all 
these fundamental mistakes, which made the military 
situation of the Commime from the very start so hope- 
less, were made already, before the Commune ever 
assembled. Nothing can show that the conduct of 
the war, under the command of the Central Com- 
mittee, would have met with any more success than it 
had under the Command of the Commune. On the 
contrary, tha* Committee showed itself to be more 
vacillating even than the Commune. The conduct of 
war is not the proletariat's strongest point. 

The worst that happened, however, was the exist- 
ence of two simultaneous independent supreme 
powers, to which was added yet a third, which inter- 
fered with the carrying on of the war, namely, the 
^'Committee of Artillery." The Committee of Artil- 
lery, which was formed on March 18th, made trouble 
with the Ministry of War over the cannons. The 
Ministry of War was in possession of the cannons of 
Marsfeld, whereas the Artillery Committee had those 
of Montmartre. (Lissagaray, " History of the Com- 
mune," page 206.) 

Everywhere an attempt was made to minimise the 
general organisation, by strengthening the power of the 
Government. In place of the Executive Commissions, 
of which we have already spoken, there was formed. 



108 , TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

on April SOtli, an Executive CJounoil consisting of nine 
men, each of whom was a delegate from each of the 
nine Commissions. But the evil was too deep-rooted 
to be removed by such a measure. The Jacobins, 
mindful of the traditions of 1793, demanded a Com- 
mittee of Public Safety with dictator's powers, which 
would reduce the Commune to nothing. The con- 
tinuous adventures of the Versailles troops caused the 
member of the Commune, Miot, " who had one of the 
finest beards of 1848 " (Lissagaray, page 273) to 
demand on April 28th the formation of a Committee of 
Public Safety, in other words, of a new Commission, 
which should be over all other Commissions. As to 
the necessity for a powerful executive everybody was 
in agreement, although the question of a name for 
that executive caused heated deEate. The Eevolu- 
tionary Jacobins thought that if this Commission was 
called the Committee of Public Safety, it would 
bestow on that Committee the victorious power of the 
French Eepublic of 1793, with its Committee of Public 
Safety. But this very tradition, which brought into 
remembrance the Eegiment of Terror, repelled the 
Proudhonistes. With 34 votes against 20 it was decided 
on May Ist to form this Committee. In the election, 
which led to its formation the greater part of the 
minority, 23, abstained, giving the following explana- 
tion : 

' ' We have not set up any candidate. We did not 
want anybody who appeared to us to be as injurious 
as he would be useless; for we see in this Committee 
of Public Safety the denial of the principles of Social 
reform, out of which the Communal Eevolution of 
March 18th arose." 

This Committee of Public Safety, which was to lead 
to increased energy on the part of the Commune, at 
the same time prepared the way for its disorganisation. 
In fact, it split the Commune. For this reason alone 
the Committee lost all moral power, and further, those 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 109 

who alone performed any serious work in the Com- 
mune, namely the Nationalists, held aloof from it. 
Its members were all, with the exception of one, 
"bawlers," as Lissagaray expressed it. On May 9th 
this futile Committee was disposed of, in order that a 
new one might be elected. This time the Minority took 
part in the election, after it had seen that behind the 
much-feared name there was l\irking nothing less than 
an actual dictatorship. But meanwhile the opposition 
between the Majority and the Minority had become 
so acute, thatr the Majority made the extraordinary 
mistake of not electing one member of the Minority 
to the Committee. The second Committee of Public 
Safety proved to be as incapable as the first. It even 
went further than the first, by actively rising against 
the. Minority, and removing a certain number of the 
Minority from office, thus robbing the Commune of 
some of its best men. This led^to an open breach. On 
May 16th the Minority published in the papers a 
declaration, in which they protested against the abdica- 
tion of the Commune in favour of an irresponsible 
dictatorship, and announced that, from that time on- 
wards, they would no longer take part in the work of the 
Commune, and would confine their activities solely to 
the districts and to the National Guard. In this way, 
they said, in conclusion, they hoped to save the Com- 
mime from internal strife, which they wished to avoid, 
because the Majority and the Minority were both work- 
ing towards the same purpose. In spite of this con- 
ciliatory conclusion, it seemed that this declaration 
implied a complete rupture. 

Nevertheless, although the Minority, for administra- 
tive work as well as for the solution of economic 
problems, was a good deal more capable than the 
Majority, in its politics it was not very decisive or 
logical. Against the dictatorship of the first Committee 
of Public Safety it had protested by abstaining from 
voting on May 1st. But on May 9th it had already 



110 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

recognised the dictatorship by proposing candidates for 
the Second Committee. On the 15th, a^ain, they 
decided to make public protest against this same dic- 
tatorship, by stopping all collaboration in the Commune. 
On the 16th, the day of the publication of their pro- 
test, they yielded to the pressure of their friends, 
namely, of the Federal Council of the International, who 
urged them not to destroy the unity of the Commune 
in face of the insistent enemy; and so on the 17th 
fifteen of the twenty-two subscribers to the manifesto 
were a-gain in their places in the Committee. But the 
majority was not by this means appeased, in spite of 
the attempt at reconciliation made by some of the more 
reasonable of their members, including Vaillant. A 
resolution, conciliaitory in character, was refused, and 
a proposal of Miot's was accepted, which ran as 
follows : 

" The Commune will forget the attitude of every 
member of the Minority, who withdraws his signature 
from the declaration. It blames this declaration." 
Debreuilh remarks in connection with this, (page 440) : 
" Thus Jacobins and Federalists stood together as 
enemy brothers at the last battle before their death." 

On May 21st the Versailles troops entered Paris. On 
the 22nd the last sitting of the Commune took place. 

The policy of the Commune offers us a remarkable 
spectacle. Of the two tendencies which are re- 
presented in the Commune each was guided by a pro- 
gramme, which, had it been applied, could never have 
been carried out, and which only led its disciples to 
actions that were purposeless. But in spite of all this, 
the action and reaction of these two programmes on 
one another, as the result of the force of circimastanoes, 
produced a political programme, which was not only 
capable of being carried out, but which corresponded 
to the needs of France at the time, and which even 
to-day has latent within it the most fruitful possibili- 
ties. This programme consisted of a demand for self- 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 111 

administration of the municipalities, as well as for the 
dissolution of the standing army. These two funda- 
mental demands of the Commune are to-day no less 
important for the welfare of France than they were 
at the time of the Second Paris Commune. 



Tehroeist Ideas of the Commune. 

We cannot speak of the Committee of Public Safety 
without^ thinking of the Eegiment of Terror, which 
represented the very soul of that body in 1793. It 
was only natural that the opposition arising over 
the dictatorship of the Committee of PubUc Safety 
should find its eontdauation in the question of terrorism. 
The Jacobins were, from the very start, as much in 
favour of recognising terrorism as a fighting means as 
the Internationalists were of repudiating it. Even in 
the very first meeting of the Commune its opposition 
was noticeable. A member proposed tlie abolition of 
the death penalty. " He wants to save the head of 
Venoy ' ' (the General of Versailles), was the retort they 
levelled at him. 

Before the federation c£ the Intematioeal, Frankel 
formulated on April 29th the policy of the International, 
saying : ' ' We wish to establish the rights of the 
workers, and that is only possible by persuasion and 
moral force." 

On the other side were people like the dramatic 
critic Pyat, the accoimtajit Perr^, and the student 
Eaoul Eigault, who in their bloodthirsty demands were 
insatiable. In principle all Jacobins had to support 
Terrorist measures, but in acttial practice there was 
little of these measures to be seen. Few could escape 
the humanitarian spirit which inspired the whole of 
democracy, bourgeois as well as proletarian. More- 
over, the conditions which obtained at the time cf the 



112 TEEKOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

Second Paxis Commune were not those that produced 
Terrorism at the time of the First Commime. 

The Second Commune did not set about the 
impossible task of erecting a communal system on 
bourgeois lines which should serve the interests of the 
proletariat, and, further, it confined the application 
of its power to Paris, of which city the majority were 
certainly on its side. Thus it was not necessary for 
them to iatiraidate their opponents by resorting to 
forceful measures. The enemy who was really danger- 
ous to the Commune stood outside the confines of 
their communal life, and was not to be affected by 
recourse to Terrorism. Thus the motive for putting 
Terrorist tradition into practice was lacking. What 
Eaoul Eigault and Perr^ in the Committee of Public 
Safety accomplished by their suppression of the Press 
and by their arrests was much more a mere bad 
imitation of the Empire than of the Eeign. of Terror, 
which proceeded on entirely different lines. The 
Blanquiste student, Eigault, gained his laurels under 
the Empir© in a continuous fight with the police, 
whose tricks he knew perfectly well. 

Even before March 9, that is, before the insurrection, 
Ijauser said of him : " Those who know him have told 
me the most astonishing things about his mad ways, 
and the cunning with which he spied out the police 
to frustrate all their persecutions, and indeed himself 
to play the part of the Prefect of Police of Paris." 
("Under the Paris Commune — a Diary," Leipsig, 
1878, page 18.) 

On March 18 he had received official orders to act as 
the Prefect of Police of Paris. His first act was to 
take up a position at the Prefecture of Police on the 
night of March 18. His police system very soon met 
with lively opposition from all parties, but especially 
from the Internationalists. This system had little to 
do with the principles of 1793, although at the time 
he was working on a History of the Commune of 1793. 



THE .SECOND PABIS COMMUNE 113 

On the other hand, we must not attribute the 
execution of Generals Thonaas and Clement to the 
Commune. As we have already shown, these execu- 
tions took place before the Commune existed and in 
spite of the opposition of the Central Committee. 

There was only one measure adopted by the 
Commune which can be described as Terrorist, and 
that was the arresting of hostages, undertaken to 
intimidate the enemy by oppressing, the defenceless. 
That the taking of hostages is a hopeless method of 
procedure, which seldom prevents cruelties from taking 
place, and more often increases the barbarity of the 
fight which caused it, has often enough been proved 
in experience. 

Bub it was difficult for the Commune to do anything 
else, unless it wished to suffer patiently and without 
protest that the men at Versailles should shoot the 
prisoners they had taken. In numerous 'cases this 
actually took place after April 3rd. 

" As the result of the indignation, which arose on 
account of the execution of the prisoners Puteaux and 
Chatillon, as well as of Duval, who was one of the 
officers of the National Guard taken prisoner by the 
Versailles troops during the attack on April 8, several 
members of the Commune insisted that one should 
forthwith shoot a number of the reactionaries, who, for 
the most part, were taken from the clergy of Paris. 
Other Jacobins, and particularly Delescluse, indig- 
nant at these excesses, proposed the decree concerning 
hostages. It was decided to oppose the Versailles 
elements on the bloody way into which they had 
bL'ndly stumbled. By means of an implicit under- 
standing, however, it was agreed that this decree 
should nob be carried out." (Fiaux, "Civil War of 
1871, •• page 246.) 

This decree, therefore, arose not out of an attempt 
to destroy human life, but to save it. On the one 
hand, to force the Versailles commanders to stop all 



114 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

further executions, and an the other, to make the 
Prussians renounce the idea of immediate reprisals. 

" Ever noble and righteous even in its anger," so 
ran the proclamation of the Commune of April 5th, 
" the people view with horror the shedding of blood 
as well as civil war. But it is its duty to defend itself 
from barbaric attacks of its enemies ; it must thetef ore 
act on the principle of an eye for an eye and a tooth 
for a tooth." {Journal Officiel, April 6th, page 169.) 

In reality the Commune showed itself to be very 
noble and righteous, but it did not act in accordance 
with the principle of an eye for an eye and a tooth for 
a tooth! 

The decree issued by the Commime concerning 
hostages determined that any persons accused of being 
in agreement with Versailles should be immediately 
denounced and arrested. A court of justice was to be 
set up within the space of twenty-four hours to hear 
the accused, and within forty-eight hours pass judg- 
ment on him. No accused person was to be shot, but 
kept as hostage. Likewise all prisoners of war were 
to be brought before this same tribunal, which would 
thereupon decide whether they were -to be set free or 
detained as hostages. Finally, it was decided that 
every execution practised on a fighter or follower 
of the Commune, who had been caught by the 
Versailles command, should be followed by the execu- 
tion of three times the number of hostages. This last 
and most terrible decision of the decree really remained 
a dead letter. It was never put into practice by the 
Commune, although those in command at Versailles, 
after short interruptions, continued to shoot the 
prisoners they had caught, and seemed quite uncon- 
cerned by the fact that, by their action, they had 
jeopardised the lives of their friends, who had been 
kept as hostages in Paiis. Thiers did his best to incite 
the Commune to slaughter. He knew perfectly well 
that every hostage shot rendered a service, not to the 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 115 

Commune, but to himself; because it roused public 
opinion at large, which was still governed by bourgeois 
thought and feeling, and oooUy accepted the shoot- 
ing of numberless prisoners at Versailles, whereas 
it waxed violently indignant over the mere arresting of 
hostages in Paris. This miserable attitude was shown 
by Tniers in the affair of the exchange of hostages. 
After the decree of April 5th, there were tsuken 
as hostages in Paris a number of the clergy, a banker, 
Jeoker, the originator of the Mexican Expedition, as 
well as the President of the Cour de Cassation, Bonjean. 
But the Commune proposed an exchangie. They 
wished to set at liberty the arrested clergjr, among 
them the Archbishop Darboy, the Pastor Deguerry, 
and the Vicar-General Lagarde, as well as President 
Bonjean, provided the Versailles Government would 
deliver up Blanqui, who was then under arrest. They 
were good-natured enough to allow the Vicar-General 
Lagarde to proceed to Versailles on April 12th with a let- 
ter of Darboy's to Thiers, after he had sworn to return if 
the deUberations should come to grief. But before that, 
on April 8th, Darboy had already addressed a letter to 
Thiers, and implored him to shoot no more prisoners. 
Thiers remained silent. On April 13th a Paris news- 
paper, L'Affranchi, published this letter. "Whereupon 
Thiers replied; but with a lie, since he characterised 
all news about executions as being mere libel. The 
answer to the second letter, which Lagarde had handed 
in, was not received until the end of April. But the 
Vicar-General, in spite of his oath, was cautious 
enough not to return to brave the vengeance of the 
lion. In this answer Blaaiqui's release was refused, 
but the Archbishop was comforted with the assurance 
that the lives of hostages were not in danger. Further 
attempts on the part of the Papal Nuncio and of the 
American Ambassador, Washburn, to intervene in 
favour of an exchange remained equally without 
success. Therefore Thiers was responsible for the fact 



116 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

that the above-named, with the exception of Lagarde, 
were still to be found as hostages in the prisons of 
Mazas, when the Commune broke up and lost the 
power to protect them. He was quite right in his 
assertion which, by the way, entirely disproved his 
libellous statement about the brutality of the 
Commune, that the lives of the hostages in the 
Commune were not in danger. But it was he himself 
who laboured to overthrow the protecting bodyguard of 
the hostages, namely the regiment of the Commune,, 
indeed, imder circumstances which placed the lives of 
these hostages in the gravest danger. Through some 
treacherous act, the Versailles troops forced their way 
into Paris on a Sunday, May 21st, quite by surprise, at 
the very time when a popular concert was in full swing 
in the Garden of the Tuileries, and at the conclusion 
of which concert an officer of the General Staff invited 
the audience to come again the following Simday, 
adding : 

" Thiers promised to march into Paris yesterday. 
He did not come, nor will he ever come." At that 
very moment the Versailles troops entered Paris. The 
inhabitants were so panic stricken, and the troops of 
the Commune so exhausted, that the Versailles army 
would probably have succeeded, by means of a rapid 
and determined advance, in occupying the whole of 
Paris without any serious opposition. But they 
entered very slowly, and this gave the defenders of 
the. Commune time to gather together for a furious 
street fight, which lasted the whole of the week, the 
famous " terrible May week." This succeeded all tbe 
more in bringing passions to fever heat, since the 
Versailles commanders gave no pardon, and not only 
shot down all those who were arrested with' weapons 
in their hands, but even all the suspects. Many 
historians of the Commune point out that this slow 
advance of the Versailles troops had the result of 
increasing the opposition, and likewise the number of i 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 117 

those who fell, thus enhancing the immensity of the 
defeat. 

" Paris could have been taken in twenty-four hours 
if the army had proceeded along the quays of the left 
bank. It would have met with opposition only from 
the Ministry of Marine at Montmartre and at 
M^.nilmontant. By means of its slow advance into 
Paris it gave time for the opposition to organise. They 
made eight and ten times as many prisoners as there 
were fighters, and they shot more men than actually 
stood behind the barricades, whereas the army lost 
only 600 dead and 7,000 wounded." (G. Bourgin, 
" L'Histoire de la Commune," page 106.) 

The number of dead on the side of the Commune 
exceeded 20,000, put by some at 30,000. The Chief 
of Military Justice, General Appert, coimted 17,000 
dead. The number of victims who did not come to the 
knowledge of the authorities cannot be fixed, but 
amounted to at least S,O0O. 

It is not to be wondered at that, in this fearful storm, 
the thirst for vengeance in many cases gained the 
upper hand. It became the more furious the more 
power it lost and the less able' it was to avoid defealr. 
It was only after the Commune had ceased to exist 
that the execution of hostages began. On May 21st the 
Versailles troops entered Paris; on the 22nd street 
fighting began; on the 24th the last shot was fired. In 
this respect, although the executions were more the 
result of desperate rage and blind revenge than of 
premeditated action, the opposition betv/een Jacobins 
and the Internationalists became obvious. The begin- 
ning of the executions was made by the fanatic 
Bl&nquist, Eaoul Eigault. He ordered a number of 
gendarmes, who were arrested on March 18, along 
with an editor, by name Chaudey, caught in the middle 
of April, to be executed on the night of May 23. 
Chaudey had caused the crowd to be fired upon on 
January 22, during which affray Sapia, a friend of 



il8 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

Eigault, was killed by his side. On the 24th Eigault 
himself was arrested and shot. At the same time the 
old Blanquist, Genton, demanded the execution of six 
hostages, among them the Archbishop Darboy, Presi- 
dent Bonjeaai, and Pastor Dugeurry, already known to 
us. The Blanquist, Ferr^, gave him the authority. 

" The firing party of the execution was composed 
almost exclusively of young people, practically 
children. In most cases those taking part in these 
crimes were hardly more than adolescent young men, 
■escited through the vice rampant in the towns, and 
whose passions, which had grown faster than their 
beards, left no place open for the feeling of responsi- 
bility." (Fiaux, " Civil "War," page 528.) 

Unfortunately we cannot make the same observa- 
tion to-day in Germany in the case of those who would 
justify by practice the right of war. 

On the 26th it was again the Blanquist, Ferr4, 
who arranged that forty-eight hostages, mostly 
priests, secret police, and gendarmes, who had 
fired on the crowd on March 18th, should be 
handed over to Colonel Gois, likewise a Blanqtiist. 
He took them along with him, followed by an armed 
«rowd who were in ijtter disorder, since they could 
hope for no pardon, and since they were themselves 
-doomed to death. In desperate rage they fell upon 
the hostages and killed them one after the other. In 
vain the Internationalists, Varlin and Serailler, tried 
to rescue them. They themselves were very nearly 
lynched by the furious crowd, who accused them of 
belonging to the Versailles Party. On May 28th this 
same Varlin, who had risked his life to save the host- 
ages, was arrested by the Versailles command as a 
result of the denunciation of a priest, who had recog- 
nised him in the street, and he was forthwith shot. 

Of the countless victims who succumbed to the 
murderous lusts of the victors, both during the fight 
and after it, those bourgeois elements that waxed 



THE SECOND PAEIS COMMUNE 119 

indignant over the terrorism of the Commune had 
nothing to say. On the contfary, they had not words 
enough to express their furious condemnation, when 
they came to speak of the five dozen hostages who, 
after the downfall of the Commune, fell victims to the 
vengeance and irresponsibility of some of the Versailles 
Party. 

It is this very account of the affair with the hostages 
that proves most clearly how far removed the 
Commune was from any form of terrorism. In the 
whole of history there is no mention of a civil war, 
hardly of a national war, in which one side, in spite 
of the murderous inhumanity of the other side, upheld 
in practice the principles of humanity with such noble 
determination, and in suieh contrast to the blood- 
thirsty phrases of a few of the " Eadicalinskis, " such 
as appeared in the French Civil War of 1871. This is 
the reason why the Second Paris Commune ended 
quite differently from the First, which had formed 
such a fearful Regiment of Terror. 

The Eegiment of Terror of the First Commune fell 
to pieces, without the workers of Paris offering any 
opposition. Indeed, its faU was felt as a relief by 
some, and by many even greeted with satisfaction. 
When, on the Ninth Thermidor, 1794, the farces of the 
two opposing parties came into contact, the followers 
of Robespierre turned tail before a single shot wad 
fired, and fled. On the other hand, the Parisians clung 
to the Second Paris Commune with fanatical tenacity 
to the very end. Tho fiercest street fighting was 
necessary for a whole week, before it could be over- 
come. The number of victims, of dead, wounded, 
prisoners and escaped, which resulted from the death 
struggle of the Commune, reached the number of 
100,000. (In July, 1871, the number was put at 
90,000— Bourgin, "La Commune," page 183.) 

The Second Commune was torn asunder by violent 
opposition. "We have seen this in the enmfby of the 



120 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

two parties engaged in the last struggle. But never 
did one of these parties ever oppress the other by 
terrorist means. The Maximalists (" Bolshevik " 
means Maximalist in English) and the Minimalists 
(Eussian " Mensheviks ") fought together, in epite of 
all, to the bitter end; and so all fafctioris of SocialiMn 
in the Commune foresaw the necessity of common 
representation of the whole of the fighting proletariat. 
In recognising this they combined the views of Marx 
and Bakunin, Lassalle and Eisenach. The first govern- 
ment of the proletariat has engraved itself deep in the 
hearts of those who craved for the emancipation of 
humanity. The powerful effect of this " dictatorship 
of the proletariat " on the fight for emancipation in all 
countries was due, not a little, to the fact that it was 
inspired throughout with a spirit of humanity, which 
animated the working classes of the nineteenth 
century. 



CHAPTEE VII. 

The Effect of Civilisation on Human Customs. 

Brutality and Humanity. 

We have seen that fh© massacres of the great French 
Revolution were not repeated in succeeding revolu- 
tions; that from 1830 to 1871 the revolutionary fighters, 
even when they were under the influence of the tradi- 
tions estabUshed by the Eegiment of Terror, neverthe- 
less in practice strove to be as humane as possible — in 
contrast to their enemies who, both before and after, 
developed the worst form of brutality in June, 1848, as 
much as in May, 1871. 

During the whole of the nineteenth century we can 
observe a progressive humanising taking place among 
the working clas.ses. Now, at the beginning of the 
twentieth century, the Eevolution in Eussia and 
Germany has come, and has given rein to massacres, 
which remind us of the French Eevolution of the 
eighteenth century. How can we explain this 
reversal? According to general ideas, humanity is a 
product of culture. We assume that man is by nature 
an evil unsociable creatxire, with the instincts of beasts 
of prey, ever ready to attack his neighbour, to oppress 
him, to torture and kill him. We believe further, 
that it is only after long progress in education and 
training, in other words, in civilisation, that man 
acquires social sentiment, a sense of mutual assistance 
and of kindness, as well as of abhorrence of cruelty 
and murder. 

This idea is expressed in the language we employ, 
which uses the word "humanity" to describe those 
qualities that we have just mentioned, and dia- 

121 



122 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

tinguishes them from those other features, which are 
stigmatised as bestial (" bestia," the beast) and brutal 
(" brutus, " the brute.) A great number of our ethno- 
logists share this point of view, which is also that 
adopted by Lombroso and his school, who see in violent 
crime what tihey call atavism, a drop back into the 
sensient life of the animal precursors of man. More- 
-over, even bloodthirsty beasts of prey do not, as a rule, 
kill their own kind ; and nothing justifies us in assuming 
that man is really by nature a beast of prey, with 
violent bloodthirsty instincts. We know nothing about 
the ajiimal precursors of the human species, but we 
must aissume that, among the animals of the present 
day, the human ape approaches them most nearly. 
Like these, the ancestor of man apparently lived on 
vegetable noiuishment, which he occasionally supple- 
mented with small animals, caterpillars, worms, 
reptiles, even small birds; but he never killed a large 
mammal in order to devour it. No ape does the like. 

In the first place, the ape never carries on any 
murderous war against its own kind. From the very 
start, he has not the necessary organs for sudh. Single 
creatures may indulge in fights over their booty, or over 
a wife, and receive scratches, but these scrimmages do 
not end fatally. 

All this is changed in the case of man, as soon as his 
technical knowledge provides him with materials in 
addition to his natural organs, wifh tools and weapons 
of shell and sword. In this way he acquires the facul- 
ties of a beast of prey, and their development in him 
gives him all the functions and instincts of a 
beast of prey. Now he can kill larger animals and 
rend them. Vegetable nourishment thus loses its 
importance for him. The hunt and the shedding of 
blood become for him daily occupations. In this way, 
conflicts between two single individuals may lead to 
■death. Nevertheless, the murder of whole peoples, 
namely war, cannot be explained by the invention of 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 12a 

weapons alone. War presupposes a further cultivated 
development, namely, the grouping of people into close 
communities. 

Since this point has hitherto been very little 
considered, and as I myself have hitherto not 
treated it sufficiently, a few remarks may here 
be made, although they lead us somewhat 
away from our subject. Without doubt man 
takes his orighi from the social animals, but he 
distinguishes himself from them by the fact that he 
forms close communities. The social animals, as a 
rule, live in flocks and herds, which have very Httle 
internal cohesion. According to the conditions of life, 
to the supply of food, to the number of enemies, etc., 
these aame individual creatures sometimes form them- 
selves into immense herds. Another time they are 
split up into many small groups, and even into mere 
couples, until some more favourable opportunity brings 
them together again in large masses. Without any 
diflBculty one individual can pass from one group to 
another. With man it is utterly different. It would 
lead us too far here to discuss to what this, change is 
due, but the following short remarks may be made. 

The animals' means of commimication between one 
another are dependent on the natm*al noises, which 
they instinctively make, as also on the method of 
speech contained in gesture and mimicry, which, how- 
ever, they do not have to learn from each other, but 
which are innate in them. Hence every member of 
the community can equally well express itself in this 
manner, and be understood by all. 

What distinguishes human beings from animals, 
apart from the use of tools, is articulated speech. 
Besides these tools, which are not given him at 
birth, but which he himself fashions, and the con- 
struction of which he must learn from his neighbours, 
there is a further means of understanding, which like- 
wise is not bom with him, but which his fellow-beings 



124 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

have developed as a result of tlieir environment, and 
which he himself must learn from them. This means 
of communication is not given to the whole community 
from the start, but is differently formed in different 
places. Through this method of speech, social unity 
becomes stronger and more intimate, since, through it, 
understanding and community of labour are rendered 
easier and more varied. Through these differences the 
several tribes and groups of mankind are, from the 
very start, kept apart one from the other. Therefore 
each will be forced to remain with that particular tribe 
or group whose speech he has learnt. He cannot 
communicate with others. He feels strange and 
uncomfortable when he is among them. In addition to 
this another factor arises. Speech permits single 
individuals to establish their relations with one another. 
It also permits memories of the past to be recorded. 
In other words, it forms a conservative element. The 
fully developed animal easily forgets its parents and 
the members of its family, which it is unable to dis- 
tinguish from other creatures of its kind. But the 
human being, his whole life long, can preserve these 
relations. He can even recognise and remember the 
parents of his own parents and the children of his own 
children, as well as the children of his brothers and 
sisters, and so on. 

It is generally assumed that the family is something 
ordained by nature, and that the " voice of blood " is 
proof of this fact. In reality it is the " voice of 
speech " that is created. Without some indication of 
relationship no family can exist as a permanent 
institution. " The voice of blood " ceases in the case 
of animals, so soon as the young creatures are fledged 
and have become independent. This makes it all the 
more ridiculous, when people of to-day attempt to 
explain not only family, but even national ties as 
being the result of the "voice of blood"; as, for 
instance, when the impulse of the German Austrians 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 125 

towards union with the Germans of the Empire is 
given as an example of the secret law 'of this " voice." 
Actually in German Austria there are living more men 
of non-German origin, especially Czechs, than men 
directly connected with the German Empire. 

The intimate nature of a family was further enhanced 
by the formation of households and by the accumula- 
tion of private property in the shape of tools and 
weapons, utensils of all kinds, which survive the 
possessor. For, after his death, all such private property 
went to those members of the family who lived in closest 
communication with him, and was therefore a good 
reason for maintaining the permanency of this com- 
munication to his death. The intimacy of the stock 
was further preserved through possessions of another 
kind, that is, through the possession of the land, which 
was the common property of the stock. Even animals 
prefer to live in those parts in which they have been 
brought up, and where they are, so to speak, at home ; 
in which every source of food is known to them, every 
comer, and every dangerous spot. Nevertheless, the 
limits of such parts are not very closely drawn, and an 
individual member of the stock, which cannot find 
suificient food in the locality, or because of danger in 
some way, caoi without difficulty extend the range 
of his sphere, until he comes into a different region that 
pleases him better. But there, sooner or later, he 
attaches himself to another tribe. 

This is different in the more intimate societies of 
human beings. Whoever comes into another 
province finds himself among a group of men and 
women he cannot understand. Primitive man does 
not adapt himself to new conditions by passing into 
new regions thinly populated, and there settling. This 
adaptation is to be found only in a higher stat« of 
culture, and even there in an imperfect state. On the 
contrary, the herd or stock keeps together, and seeks 
to extend its sphere at the cost of its neighbours. Thus 



126 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

we have the beginnings of war, and of race 
murder, as soon as the technique of armies 
has become sufficiently highly developed. Thus 
we see what we call " brutality " is not due to the 
animal precursors of man, but is rather a product of 
his development. Ethical instincts themselves, the 
feeling ior solidarity, of sympathy for others, of 
rendering assistance, in the course of man's develop- 
ment change their character. In the case of the social 
animals, these instincts are shared in common by .all 
the individual members of like species. 

In the case of man, however, their sphere of 
influence is confined to the members of the immediate 
circle. Whoever is outside this circle is, for such a 
man, an object of indifference. He has no sympathy 
for him and is often directly hostile. As inter-communi- 
cation develops, the sphere of society, a member of 
which our "individual man" feels himself to be, is en- 
larged also. To-day we are, as it were, reverting to the 
origins of human development; and the sphere of our 
social and ethical feelings is again begmning to extend 
itself to all individuals of like species, in other words, 
to the whole human race. But, generally speaking, 
this is more an ideal towards which we are very slowly 
striving. At the same time, economic development, 
through the division of labour and increasing variety 
of social communications, has led to the constitution 
of single, circumscribed societies within the State, 
which again, in its turn, is broken up into groups of 
varying kinds. These also Become more or less 
separate communities, such as the nobility, families, 
ecclesiastical organisations, sects, guilds, etc. Each of 
these communities develops its own ethical ideals, 
which have effect only on the members of each par- 
ticular community. And even these different com- 
munities can fall into disagreement with one another. 
They are capable of developing great solidarity and 
sympathy for members of their own narrow group, at 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 127 

the same time shawing a complete lack of charity 
towards other groups. Each individual may belong 
to several different social communities, with different 
and often opposing interests and ethical principles. 
The sharper the contradiction within the society, the 
greater will be the opposition between individual men. 
llie ladies of the feudal barons of the South States 
were most charming and adorable to others of their 
own kind, full of generosity and sympathy; but their 
slaves they tortured unmercifully. The same man 
can show the most delicate feeling for the members of 
his family, and yet in his business relations be the 
most callous extortioner and pitiless taskmaster. 

Culture does not necessarily, at the same time, help 
towards the humanising of conduct. On the 'other 
hand, it would be absurd to assume the contrary, and 
to regard the primitive state of nature as an idyllic 
conditioin of the Golden Age, from which we have been 
gradually falling away. In this connection we can 
distinguish two conflicting tendencies in the history 
of human development, of which either the one or the 
other becomes paramoimt according to the conditions 
at the time. 



Two Tendencies. 

One tendency we have already discussed.- It con- 
sists in the continuous improvement in the weapons 
for slaughter, as well as in the increasing of the forces 
of antagonism in man. It makes for the increase of 
national opposition, the opposition that arises between 
over-populated and under-populated regions; further, 
the opposition between poor people and rich people, 
between those who monopolise the treasures of nature, 
and others, who are forced to remain in unfruitful 
deserts. It leads, further, to the opposition between 
the industrially developed and the industrially back- 



128 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

ward. And finally, among the nations themselves, there 
arise different forms of expropriation and enslavement 
of man by man, whence arise hatred and cruelty. 

A cooitrary tendency arises with the beginning of agri- 
culture. In earlier methods of production, hunting 
and cattle-driving take the upper hand. Both cattle- 
driving and the hunt necessitate skill in arms, and 
cause the shedding of blood as a means to the main- 
tenance of life, and as a means of defence against beasts 
of prey, which threaten the cattle at the dawn 
of civilisation. Agriculture, on the other hand, does 
not necessarily employ weapons. The husbandman 
often sees a friend in the wild beasts, because they 
attack other beasts of prey, which threaten to devour 
his crops; and the preserving of wild game, which is 
of importance to the huntsman, is disliked by the 
husbandman. Still more than in the case with agri- 
culture is the use of weapons superfluous, as a means 
of production, in the ease of the artisan and the intel- 
lectual worker. The time and material required for 
the fabrication of such weapons, and the learning of 
their employment is, to suich men, in contrast t© the 
huntsman and the cattle breeder, an economic 
extravagance, which they would reduce as much as 
possible. Thus the peasant, the artisan, and the 
intellectual become more and more amicable in nature ; 
especially the last group, for the peasant and the 
artisan do- need muscular strength to carry on their 
occupation. Such muscular strengtih stands in high 
honour with them, and is welcomed, not only in actual 
work but even in play, and especially in sports that 
involve competition. The intellectual, on the other 
hand, needs no other strength. The time the otkers 
devote to the development of their muscles he devotes 
to the acquirement of knowledge, or t"o the exercise of 
his brain. Whoever slioiild endeavoxur to carry on a 
literary contest with weapons, other than those of the 
mind, would at once betray his inferiority. This con- 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 129 

tention is by no means disproved by the fact that, in 
German student circles, rowdy and bullying manners 
often come to the fore. They are the result of the 
brutal behaviour, characteristic of the reHgious strife 
that led up to the Thirty Years' War. 

The priestly castes of the ancient world, as well as 
the spiritual leaders of Christianity, showed, in general, 
aversion to the shedding of blood and to acts of 
violence, at any rate so long as they did not belong 
to the ruling or exploiting classes. Such also was true 
of the intellectuals of the eighteenth century. When, 
however, the intellectuals themselves became ex- 
ploiters, they did not always give evidence of the same 
peaceable tendencies. Where they are not so inclined, 
it is the same with them as with the peasants, the 
artisans, and the proletarians. Man in such a case is 
regarded not as a means for the end of others, but as 
a means for his own ends, or as a means for the ends 
of the community at large; not, however, as means 
for the ends of other individuals. Kant's ethics cor- 
respond exactly to this standpoint. Only for Kant 
ethics do not form a mere moral code for particular 
classes or times, but rather a permanent moral law, 
over and beyond the world of appearances, to which 
the Almighty himself is subject, since even to Him 
it is forbidden to make use of man as mere means. 
(For what?) (Cf. Kant's " Critique of Practical 
Reason," 2nd edition, section 5, " TJie existence of 
God as a postulate of pvu-e practical reason.") 

However this attitude may have arisen, there 
resulted, as a consequence, the greatest respect for 
human personality, and for the sanctity of human life 
and human happiness. But these peace-loving ten- 
dencies already began to show to. disadvantage in the 
early beginnings of agricultural and communal life, for 
the peaceable classes of the various nations were the 
most defenceless. They were exploited by armed 
groups, whidh lauded it over them as a war-like aris- 



130 TBBBOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

tocraoy, and now, in their turn, with rigorous exclusive- 
ness betook themselves to the hunt, to war and to 
slaughter, as formerly the huntsman and cattle- 
breeders had done. So they erected into a principle 
the methods and instincts of beasts of prey, in their 
attitude towards their fellow-men who were hostile to 
them. 

Thus brutality and humanity became two charac- 
teristics of civilised society. According to changing 
conditions, either one or the other of these charac- 
teristics prevailed. In Ancient Eome the whole popu- 
lation was involved in a policy of conquest. The 
Eomans, thanks to their warlike superiority, succeeded 
in making aU the countries of the Mediterranean ser- 
vile to them. The whole population lived on the 
exploitation of these lands. They became enthusiastic 
for war, and upheld the most merciless conduct of war ; 
and as success in war brought crowds of cheap slaves 
to the Romans, it ultimately became one of their pas: 
times to employ slaves ia the amphitheatres, to make 
them fight one another, and eventually Mil each other 
for the delight of the populace. Gladiatorial contests, 
and the murdering of men as a mere pastime for an 
indolent mob of both high and low degree, mark the 
extreme limit of al most vulgar cruelty; and yet such 
facts represent the ancient Eoman city, not in the con- 
dition of barbarity but at the height of its civilisation. 
These gladiatorial contests did not cease imtil the 
Eoman State had been brought down from its high 
level of " culture," through the incuirsion of bar- 
barians who were living on the borders. 

In the course of economic developments, alongside 
of the war nobility there developed a capitalist class 
with two diverging tendencies. Being an exploiter, 
the capitalist regarded the man, from whose exploita- 
tion he lived, not as a means to that man's end, but 
as a means to his own ends. In such an attitude there 
lurk already the germs of inhumanity and cruelty, 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 131 

and it depends entirely upon conditions prevailing how 
far these germs will develop. Colonial policy was 
responsible for the bloodiest and most fearful atroci- 
ties. On the other hand, at the time of commercial 
monopoly, opposition arose between commercial capital 
and industrial capital. Commercial capital showed 
itself to be at this period warlike and unscrupulous. 
It massacred and. plundered the people of India. It 
carried on slave-driving with negroes, and forced its 
various governments to embark on murderous and 
exhausting commercial wars. On the other hand, 
industrial capital has had to pay the greater part 
of the costs of these wars, and has been thereby handi- 
capped. It stands, therefore, in direct opposition to such 
methods, and indeed indignantly so. Human sympathy 
comes to the sinrface, and becomes incensed over the 
treatment of the black slaves in the West Indies, all 
the while, however, cruelly torturing the white human- 
beings of England by overwork at starvation wages. 
But not even the proletariat shows at this stage any 
consistent and unified tendency. We have seen that 
the conditions of life forced the proletariat to regard 
human life as something sacred. Since it is not merely 
an exploiting, but rather an exploited class, it suffers 
most from the disregard of human Hfe; so that war 
imposes upon it, apart from expense, as in the case of 
Ancient Eome, burdens and dangers; whereas success 
and the booty derived from war go to the ruling classes 
alone. All this inspires the proletariat with a horror 
of all slaughter and of every kind of cruelty. Never- 
theless the proletariat does not appear on. the historical 
stage at the same time as the industrial proletariat. 
Tendencies towards proletarianism appear among the 
masses long before modern industrial mamifacture has 
become developed through the downfall of feudalism, 
which imposes upon the peasants heavier taxes so that 
the peasants' occupation is adversely affected, and the 
rate of production rapidly sinks. 



132 TEEKOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

The result is, that apiculture thus has to turn away 
more and more labourers, and consequently the burden 
of labour increases on those who remain behind. 
Hence at such a time superfluous labour finds little 
chance of being taken on in industrial occupation, 
since industry itself is circumscribed by guilds. There- 
fore countless masses of the imemployed, starving and 
despairing proletariat swarm the country ; and because 
they themselves are incapable of productive laboiu:, 
they have recourse to all kinds of parasitical means of 
livelihood, from begging and stealing to downright 
robbery. Living in utter misery, excluded from and 
despised by society, these people are naturally filled 
with a wild hatred against all society ; and the hatred 
increases, because those in power, incapable and un- 
vrilling to take some measures towards social reform, 
resort to terrorism. The starving people have to be 
checked, by means of frightfulness, from begging, 
from stealing, from cheating, from prostitution and 
robbery. The most fearful punishments were thus in- 
flicted on these unfortunate people. " A real bloody war 
against vagabondage," as Marx described it in his book 
on " Capitel," which gives many examples of this kind 
of legislation. (Popular edition, pages 664 and follow- 
ing.) The result was the same as that which any reign 
of terror produces. It lowers social products, without 
being able to change the ground from whence those 
products arise. The number of criminals did not 
diminish, however much they might be sent to the 
galley-ships, or however much they might be hanged 
and tortiured. For those who survived there remained 
no other choice than that of leading the life of swindlers 
Hence arose continual conflict with the police. The 
only noticeable result was the increasing demoralisa- 
tion of the proletariat, whose hatred and rage, and 
wliose thirst for blood and cruelty were all increased 
by the horrors and cruelties of the executions that took 
place. Of course this was true in the first place only 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 133 

of the eriminal section of the proletariat. This Tery 
section was at that time so numerous, and was con- 
nected by so many ties of relationship and comradeship 
with the elements of the working-class proletariat, (as 
also with the lower strata of the small middle class 
as well as of the peasantry, who all stood more or less 
with one foot in the bog of evil influences), that even 
their own ways of thinking and feeling were affected 
by them. As a consequence, all feelings for humanity 
were, at the time of the outbreaJc of the French Eevolu- 
tiou, confined to the intellectuals, and to those strata 
of the well-to-do sections of the small middle class and 
of the capitalists and industrials, who were influenced 
by the intellectuals. In the proletariat itself, and in 
those strata standing in closest relation with it, the 
coarsening and brutahsing that resulted from thia 
bloody legislation often came to the light of day, as 
soon as the power of the State, under whose pressure 
all this lay hidden, finally broke down. 



Slaugfitee and Ti:rroeism. 

In view of the treatment meted out to the poorest 
elements of the masses by the ruling classes, it is not 
to be wondered at that the revolutionary elements, sa 
soon as they could operate freely, often gave to the 
struggle a wild and cruel character, thus turning 
the great revolution into one of a particiilarly san- 
guinary character. Nevertheless it would be a mistake 
to class all revolutionary massacres under one head. 
One must moreover distinguish between excesses, to 
which a brutalised people, in the passion aroused by 
struggle and despair, or out of thoughtless fear, allowed 
ittclf to give way ; and those excesses, which are the 
result of a pre -considered system of training, and which 
are introduced into the State system, in the form of 



134 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

carefully-planned legislation, by those in power, in 
order to grind down elements, which eeemed to those 
rulers to be dangerous. 

Atrocities which sprang spontaneously from the 
people we find already at the beginning of the revolu- 
tion; but the commencement of the Eeign of Terror 
dates from the summer of the year 1793, at the time 
when the Girondistes were arrested and executed. The 
people showed their brutality as early as the day of the 
storming of the BastiUe, when the garrison capitulated. 
Some were killed; others had their heads hacked off, 
which were triumphantly carried round on pikes. This 
parading of heads on pikes happened often enough 
during the course of the revolution. The thirst for 
blood and cruelty increased when it came to a war of 
the Eevolution with the monarchs of Europe. When 
the Prussian army was marching on Paris and 
the Prussian Commander-in-Chief, the Dvike of Bruns- 
wick, in his manifesto, threatened Paris with total 
destruction, rumours as to a conspiracy of the aristo- 
crats throughout the land in support of the external 
enemy were rampant. Then did the Parisians rise in 
uncontrolled and fearful rage, in order to aimihilate 
the political prisoners in the prisons. That took place 
on September 2nd, 1792. This massacre, which cost 
3,000 men their lives, represented the height of the 
horrors of the great revolution. A very Intoxication 
for blood seized these crowds of exeeutibners. They 
were not content with killing. They literally bathed 
with delirious delight in blood. 

The Princess de LambaUe, whose whole crime con- 
sisted merely in being a friend of the Queen, was non 
only killed; but her body was cut open and her heart 
torn out. Her head was put on a pike, and brought to 
the imprisoned Queen before the window. At the 
sight of this horror the Queen swooned away. 

Even acta of mercy took on a cruel form. An 
example may be found in the experience that happened 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 135 

to Mme. de SombreuiU, who at fhe lime of the 
September masBiacres was in prison with her father. 
A certain M. de Saint Mart, who was near her father, 
had his skull split open. Her father was to suffer the 
same fate ; whereupon she in desperation covered hirn 
with her own body, and fought for a long time, until 
she succeeded, after having received three wounds, in 
moving these men. 

" One of them took a glass, poured therein blood 
that was flowing from the head of the murdered M. de 
Saint Mart, mixed it with wine and powder, and said 
that if she would drink that to the health lof the nation 
she could save her father. She did this without a 
shudder, and was forthwith carried out by these sielf- 
same men." 

(This report ie presented in the collection of " Letters 
from the French Kevolution," by Guistav Landauer, 
2nd volume, page 176, which was finished in the 
simimer before the latest German Eevolution. The 
Preface, dated Jime, 1918, closes with the following 
remark: "An intimate knowledge of the spirit and 
the tragedy of the Eevolution should be of help to us 
in the serious times that now confront us." The 
unfortunate man little suspected how soon, in these 
" serious times," the tragedy of the Eevolution would 
be fulfilled on his own person.) 

There is no doubt tha.t the cruelty of the enraged 
and desperate masses in the Eevolution was terrible. 
But one should not blame the Eevolution alone for 
that, even if one is justified in ever blaming mental 
occurrences of this kind. They were the result of the 
treatment that had been meted out to the people 
by high authority for many a long day. Juet one 
example. 

In the year 1757 a man, Damiens by name, 
attempted the life of Ludwig XV. He attacked him 
with a kind of penknife, whiclh proved to be quite 
harmless. But the revenge for this deed was terrible. 



136 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

Damiens' right hand was hacked off, and burnii before 
his own eyes. Wounds were made in his arms, legs 
and chest, and boiling oil and molten lead were poured 
into these wounds. Then they boimd each oi hia 
limbs to horses, and drove the animals each in different 
directions, so that his, whole body was literally torn 
to pieces. This infansious torture was executed in full 
publicity, in order to make an effect on the crowd. The 
effect, alas, we know. 

Such barbarities were perpetrated till right into the 
time of the Eevolution. It was really the Eevolution 
that finally brought them to an end. But still, on 
August 13th, 1789, Gaultier de Biauzat made the fol- 
lowing report from Versailles: 

" Last Tuesday, about midday, the people of 
VersailleB succeeded in preventing iihe execution of a 
criminal, who had been condemned, on account of 
patricide, to be bound alive to a wheel and burnt." 
(" Landauer's Letters." volume 1, page 315.) 

" These atrocities committed by those in higher 
authority preceded those perpetrated by the masses. 
The slaughter, which the masses engaged in, found no 
approbation from the acknowledged leaders of the 
Eevolution. Indeed, they inveighed bitterly againjt 
such deeds. Such was the case with the September 
massacres, which have been quite falsely attributed to 
those leaders. If one could attach any blame to them, 
it would be, at flie very most, that they were unable 
to restrain the rage of the mob. This rage was so 
terrible, so fearful and intimidating, that nobody dared 
to risk falling a victim to it, not even the Girondistes. 
The Commissioners of the Commune endeavoured, 
with danger to their own lives, to rescue the ladies in 
immediate attendance on the Queen; and they suc- 
ceeded in every case with one exception, that of the 
Princess de Lamballe, whom we mentioned above." 
(Krppotkin's " French Eevolution, " volume 2; page 5.) 

Among those who were most incensed over the 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 137 

September massacres was Robespierre. He cried bit- 
terly, "Blood, ever and always blood. These miser- 
able people will end in drowning the Eevolution in 
blood." (Louis Blanc, " French Eevolution," volume 
2, page 207.) 

Even Marat himself recoiled horror-stricken before 
those massacres. "It is characteridstic of Marat him- 
self, a fact which according to my knowledge has 
not yet been mentioned by any historian, that he 
openly disavowed the September massacres, or at least 
bitterly regretted them — ^the self-same Marat, who 
recommended them ia his issue of August 19th, and the 
benefit of which massacres ^he, on September 2nd, 
wished to extend to the whole of France." (Jean 
Jaur^s, " La Convention," volume 1, page 75.) 

Needless to say, in the case of Marat it was more 
political consideration than regard for humanity that 
made him disavow the September massacres. Eobea- 
pierre, on the other hand, belonged to the intellectuals, 
who were fimdamentally opposed to any sheddiug of 
blood. This he proved in the Constituent Assembly, 
in the discussion on May 17th, 1791, over the new penal 
law. At the discussion of the new penal law, when 
the death penalty came under consideration, Eobes- 
pierre was among those who most vehemently opposed 
this penaltp, on the ground that it did not prevent 
crime, but merely made the populace more brutal and 
more inclined to deeds of violence. His efforts were 
frustrated. The death penalty remained. Only the 
most horrible forms of its execution were to be 
prohibited. Decapitation only was retained. This 
decision formed one of the very rare occasioais that 
caused Marat to express his approval of the National 
Assembly, in opposition to Eobespierre. Two years 
later Eobespierre found himiself on Marat's side, and 
was obliged to renounce his opposition to the death 
penalty. From henceforward this penalty was his 



138 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

ehief political weapon, even against his own political 
friends. 

We have already urged that the well-planned and 
orderly execution of terrorist methods should not oe 
classed with ijhe excesses of an excited mob. For 
tihese excesses had their origin among the uncultivated 
and coarse elements of iiie populace, whereas the 
Eegiment of Terror, was maintained by highly culti- 
vated men who were filled with, the most humane 
feelings. This Eegiment of Terrcar was the result of 
the conditions then existent, and was different in 
origin from the spontaneous atrocities. These latter 
were a result of the merciless legislation of the old 
regime against the poverty-stricken masses; whereas 
the Eegiment of Terror was forced on the Jacobins 
because they, in the most appalling circunaetances and 
in the midst of a war, which had come about through 
the misery of the decaying masses, and only became 
paramount when the Jacobins came into power, found 
themselves face to face with a task that was insoluble. 
The task they had to solve was to preserve bourgeois 
society and private property, and at the same time to 
do away with the misery of the people. The result of 
this was that they found themselves in a most des- 
perate position, out of which they could extricate them- 
selves only by the employment of the very means of 
which they themselves disapproved, and of whose 
uselessnesB they were perfectly well aware. It was 
the very misery of the masses that caused the old 
regime to proceed to its bloody legislation, and to havp< 
reeounse to terrorism. Indeed, the general misery 
itself gave rise to this bloody legislation, to the terror- 
ism of the new regime. The only difference was, 
that the ancient State endeavoured to gain the mastery 
over the wretched populace, by beheading and ill- 
treating the poor; whereas the new State sought to 
diminish the misery of the masses, by beheading — 
without ill-treating — the rich and their servants. Yet 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 139 

the one failed of its object just as did the other. But 
even in this respect there was a difference. The 
existence of the old regime did not depend upon 
whether iShe Eegiment of Terror destroyed the pro- 
letariat or not. The failinre of terrorism was certainly 
a disagreeable fact, but it represented no serious danger 
for the old State, because, the •Jass that it wished 
to keep under, namely, the mob proletariat, was quite 
incapable, by its own strength, of ever gaining the 
upper hand, and was, from an economic point of view, 
a completely negligible factor. The new regime, on 
the other hand, was banlorupt, and went to pieces as 
soon as its terrorism failed. For the class that it tried 
to keep under, namely, the boiu-geoisie, was the very 
one wihich, imder the circumstances, was best cal- 
culated to gain the supremacy; and at that time it was, 
economically considered, indispensable. The repres- 
sion of this bourgeois class hindered social development 
and production, and in consequence gave rise to still 
greater misery, even among the very people who should 
have derived advantage from the Eeign of Terror. 
And a still greater difference distinguishes the old 
from the new " Beign of Terror." In the case 
of the former, it corresponded entirely with the 
ethics of the circles that directed it. They were 
not necessarily unfaithful to themselves, by putting 
terrorism into practice. It appeared to them to De a 
perfectly obvious and justifiable meauB:. The new 
Eeign of Terror, however, was set up in absolute 
opposition to the ethics of the class that put 
it into execution. From the very beginning, therefore, 
the terrorists suffered from a bad conscience, which 
they endeavoured to salve by all sorts of sophistry, but 
which, nevertheless imdermined their moral strength, 
lessened their authority, and increased the friction aiid 
the inseciuity then existing, and even rendered corrupt 
many of their members. Even if there be no absolute 
" morale '- existing in the world beyond, and even 



140 TEEBOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

supposing that the morality, of a particular time, of a 
particular country, or of a particular class, is some- 
thing relative, ethics do remain the strongest social 
bond, and the stoutest support in all problems and 
conflicts of life. Nothing can be worse than unfaith- 
fulness to oneself, or to act against those ethical prin- 
ciples that one has acknowledged as forming the 
categorical imperative. It was the result of all this 
which contributed largely to the complete destruction 
of the Beign of Terror, as soon as it met with energetic 
opposition. How quickly the surviving terrorists be- 
came converted to quite other views I The legitimate 
Monarchists were for Napoleon a far greater danger 
than the old Eepublicans. This was proof of how 
seriously the " morale " of these latter had sufEered in 
the Eeign of Terror. 



The Humanising of Conduct in the Nineteenth 
Century. 

The great French Eevolution belongs to the most 
sanguinary epoch of world history, and many people 
have drawn the conclusion that the shedding of blood 
is one of the indispensable factors in a real revolution. 
In consequence they have either condemned the Eevo- 
lution or glorified slaughter. As a matter of fact, tht 
E«volution of 1789 itself removed some of the most 
important features which gave the lievolution go cruel 
and violent a character, and prepared the way for 
milder forms of fut\ire revolutions. It accomplished 
this, on the one hand, by putting aside feudalism and 
by encouraging industrial capital, which had the effect 
cf turning the masses of the proletariat from being 
mere vagabonds into wage-earners ; and, on the other 
liand, by starting a movement, which sooner or later 
was to end with the triumph of demoei-acy. And finally. 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 141 

out of the fitudy of the Eevolution, as also of capi- 
talism, a theory arose which enabled the proletarian 
party, in every given moment, to take some practical 
act}on, the object of which lay within the bounds of 
possibility; so that there was no reason for it to fall 
into one of those blind alleys, which would only lead to 
a Keign of Terror. Through the Eevolution the peasant 
was emancipated, and became master of bis own land. 
As a result, land economy reached a higher stage and 
produced greater returns, of which the peasants had 
the benefit; and therefore there was a decrease in the 
amount of superfluous labour that had abandoned 
agricultural work. On the other hand, there was a 
gi'eat incursion of men coming from the land, who were 
now seeking employment in the town. AH the old 
guild restrictions had broken down; manual labour 
could develop itself unimpeded. It is true that, in one 
way after the other, such labour was adversely affected 
by the rising industrial capital; but even this helped 
to develop, with its rapid increase, large demands for 
labour. The industrial proletariat now became a 
special class with a special class-consciousness, which 
bficame more and more pronounced, and differed from 
the mob proletariat. 

Under capital the position of the industrial prole- 
tariat had certainly deteriorated, in comparison with 
that of the independent labourer at the time when 
manual labour was prosperous. On the other hand, 
capital certainly improved the position of labour as 
against the mob proletariat. A mob proletariat is, as a 
class, incapable of struggle ; whereas the industrial pro- 
letariat, by its class struggles and by its organisation 
obtained a marvellous result and a remarkable intel- 
lectual and moral impetus. In the very beginning the 
industrial proletariat was dreadfully kept under by 
eapital, not only economically, but also morally so. In 
its housing conditions, in the meagreness and uncer- 
tainty of its existence, in its ignorance, it was not far 



142 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

removed from the mob proletariat. Indeed, it stood 
in many respects below it on account of the monotony 
of its life, ae a resiilt of the continuous oppression of 
factory discipline, which excluded all liberty of action, 
through the callous sweating of women and children. 

As a result, the boldness of the more powerful 
elements of the mob proletariat was absent from the 
working proletariat. Hence it became less sensitive, 
but it did not thereby get rid of its coarseness. In such 
a condition it would have been quite impossible to 
think of emancipation. Only after a long time could 
a man, by engaging in contiuuous class struggle, 
expect to extricate himself from the seemingly hopeless 
bog that threatened to engulf him. The more this 
process went on, the more were the tendencies towards 
humanisation, which came to light as the result of the 
conditions then prevailing, able to develop and grow. 
Favourable to these tendencies was the fact that, as 
a result of the Eevolution and of its consequences, 
even the penal laws erected against the proletariat 
began to lose the cruel character that they had had 
before. 

These are all the causes of the results which we have 
already notified, namely, that the revolutionary 
elements of the proletariat show themselves to have 
been a class filled with the greatest humanising force, 
especially in the movement that took pla,oe in the 
nineteenth century; and that they departed more and 
more from the brutal savagery that distinguished 
their forerunners at the time of the great French Eevo- 
lution, and which even Engels observed in the early 
'forties of the nineteenth century among the factory 
hands of England. At the same time, the causes 
that led to the Eeign of Terror disappeared. Already 
after the collapse of this Eeign of Terror, the more far- 
seeing friends of the proletariat clearly recognised that 
it could not lead to any emancipation based on bour- 
geois society. They came to the conclusion that this 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 143 

object could be achieved only by the doing away .with 
private property, in respect to the means of production, 
and by the introduction of communal production. But 
they found neither the necessary material conditions 
among the capitalists, nor the psychical conditions 
among the proletariat; and they could not see that 
economical development and class struggle were at 
work to produce thesje conditions. Therefore, they 
endeavoxured to solve the social question, and 
attempted to find a plan or formula which seemed 
possible of practical application, as soon as the neces- 
sary means were at their disposal. If the revolutionary 
proletariat accepted this idea and sought for power, not 
in some philanthropic millionaire, but in the political 
dictatorship after the pattern of the first Paris Com- 
mune, every such attempt, when undertaken by a 
minority in the State, was of necessity bound to lead 
to a reign of terror similar to the rule of the first Paris 
Commune. In any case this attempt was at least 
rational. It did not seek any more to escape the con- 
sequences of bourgeois society and yet preserve this 
society, but it attempted to remove the consequences 
by destroying their foundation. But even this 
endeavour must have come to grief when an attempt 
was made to put this into practice, so long as the social 
conditions failed, which alone could remove the foun- 
dations they were attempting to destroy. It would 
have meant the attempt of a minority to impose upon 
a majority something that was impossible, or at least 
without purpose and even contrary to its interests. And 
that would have been possible only by resortiiig to 
means of force, which would have culminated in the 
necessity for terrorising by means of slaughter. 

Such an attempt was frustrated, not only because the 
mass of labour at the time was only gradually adopt- 
ing social ideas, but because the proletariat for many 
decades had no longer maintained so supreme a, 
position as it had held in conjunction with those 



144 TBEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

elements of the small bourgeoisie in Paris, with 
which it had been in close contact from 1789 to 
1794. The second Paris Commune indeed gave it 
authority over Paris, but not over France ; and even in 
Paris the Socialists were not in the majority. In 
fact, these latter had no sure theoretical foundation, 
and therefore they were very cautious and retiring. 
They found a much stronger basis after the Commune, 
when Marxism began to be accepted by the masses. 
It was the conception that Marx and Engels had 
given in the 'forties, and had deepened and extended in 
the 'fifties and 'sixties; in other words, it was the 
materialistic conception of history. They embodied 
the idea of a perfectly natural development in history, 
which, according to their ideas, was governed by the 
development of economical relations. From this 
standpoint they realised that, the capitalist means of 
production resulted in conditions that ultimately 
made necessary and inevitable a socialist means of 
production ; but they equally well recognised the fruit- 
lessness of any attempt to replace the first method of 
production by the second, so long as the conditions 
were not ripe for that. 

For these men, therefore, the task of the Socialists 
lay no more in finding a plan or a formula for general 
socialisation, which should forward and, in all condi- 
tions, introduce Sociahsm. They had to study economic 
conditions, and as a result of their studies, make clear 
what was necessary for society in general, and 
endeavour to fight for its introduction. In other 
words, the Scxsialists from now onwards were not 
merely concerned in introducing Socialism. Where 
this was not yet possible, they were forced to concern 
themselves with the conditions of capitalist industry, 
and demand their development in proletarian interests. 
Bait this was by no means immediately imder- 
stood by the Socialists themselves. Indeed, even 
in the International, some years later, the Socialists 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 145 

regarded with contempt such matters as free trade and 
the strike, because such things did not affect the 
system of wages. It was Marx and Engels who taught 
the workers the importance of the proletarian struggle 
for emancipation, of the economic problems and con- 
flicts of the capitalist system of that time. Socialism 
for the proletariat schooled in Marxist thought thus 
ceased to be something that could at once be intro- 
duced and realised everywhere, and under any con- 
ditions. Even where it did obtain political power, it 
had to introduce only so much of Socialism as was 
possible under the existing conditions, and in a 
form corresponding to those particular conditions. 
According to this conception, Socialism could not be 
introduced by means of a coup d' etat. It was to be 
the result of a long historical process. At the same 
time, the Socialists were for ever being inrged to under- 
take, in any given moment, only what was possible 
under the conditions, material and moral, then prevail- 
ing. If, therefore, everything was to be done with due 
consideration it would have been impossible for the 
Sociahsts to fail of anything they undertook, or for 
them to find themselves in a desperate condition, which 
should force them to act contrary to the spirit of the 
proletariat and of Socialism, and have recourse to 
Terrorism. 

In fact, since Marxism has led the Socialist niove- 
ment, this latter, even up to the beginning of the great 
world war, has in nearly every one of its actions always 
been preserved from grave defects, and the idea of 
carrying anything out by means of Terrorism has com- 
pletely dropped out of its programme. Much contri- 
buted to this result. At the same time in which 
Marxism became the dominant social doctrine, demo- 
cracy had taken root in Western Europe, and had 
begun, as a result of its struggles there, to form a sound 
foundation for political life. In consequence of this, 
not only were the enlightenment and organisation of 



146 TBEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

the proletaxiat facilitated, but also its insight into 
economic conditions as well as into the relative power 
of the classes increased. Hence all fantastic adven- 
tures were eliminated, as also was civil war, as a means 
of class struggle. In 1902 I wrote in my pamphlet 
" The Social Eevolution" (chapter 6, "Democracy") : 

"Democracy is one of the highest values, if for no 
other reason .than because it makes possible higher 
forms of revolutionary struggle. This struggle will no 
longer be like that of 1789 or 1848, a struggle of 
unorganised masses without any political education, or 
without any insight into the relative powers of the 
struggUng elements, and without any deeper under- 
standing of the objects of the struggle and the means 
for its solution. It will be no longer a struggle of 
masses that let themselves be carried away by every 
rumour, and by every chance circumstance. It will 
be a struggle of organised enlightened masses, full of 
stability and reflection, who do not follow on every 
impulse, who do not explode over every disadvantage, 
and who do not become downhearted as the result of 
failure. On the other hand, election and the means 
thereto make it possible to take stock of oneself and of 
one's enemies. They help towards a clear insight into 
the relative strength of the classes and parties. 
Further, they put a check on over -hasty action, and 
overcome defeat. They also help to make even the 
opponent himself recognise the untenable nature of 
his position, and often cause him voluntarily to abandon 
it, wherever such might prove to be a matter of life 
and death for him. Thus all struggle becomes less cruel 
and merciless, unless dependent on blind chance." 

As a result of the combined working of aJl these 
conditions, of the formation of the industrial prole- 
tariat, and of the elevation of this latter above the 
level of the mob proletariat; as a result, further, of the 
development of Socialist theory and the establishment 
of democracy, it was possible to put in the background 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 147 

"the gloomy fears, which Engels even in 1845 expressed 
in his book, "The Position of the "Working-Classes in 
England," where he said: — 

" If the English middle-class does not reflect — and 
it seems to have no intention of doing so — there will 
fohUow a revolution, which will bear no comparison 
with any that has hitherto taken place. The proletariat, 
driven to despair, will seize their torches. The revenge 
•of the people will betray such rage, of which not even 
the yeaar 1793 can give us any idea. The war of the 
poor against the rich will be the most fearful that has 
«ver been waged." (2nd Edition, page 298.) 

It must be said that Engels' fears would have been 
justified only in the case of a revolution breaking out 
at the time he expected. Even in the 'forties his fears 
were still rather exaggerated, in spite of the fact that 
crowds of imdeveloped people, especially Irish, had 
been engaged in industry. But Engels himself expected 
that, if the revolution would not come soon, the prole- 
tariat would have time to develop itself, and become 
imbued with a Socialist spirit, which would then cause 
the revolution to take some milder form. 

" In proportion as the proletariat assimilates 
Socialist and Communist elements, will the shedding 
of blood, vengeance and rage decrease in the revolu- 
tioin." The revolution expected by Engels came in 
1848, but not in England. After the outbreak there 
began in all countries in Europe an epoch of capitalist 
development, which was accompanied by a growth of 
the economic, intellectual, and moral strength of the 
working-classes . 

In the most progressive countries of Europe things 
rapidly changed. As early as 1872, a year after the 
Commime, Marx gave expression to the hope that, in 
countries like America, England and Holland, the pro- 
letariat would assumei a peaceful form. Ever since that 
time, the rise of the proletariat has brought with it 
further progress. Yet no one with a keen insight into 



148 TEEEORISM AND COMMUNISM 

the matter can suppose that a monarchy based on mili- 
tarism, such as the German, Austrian and Eussian, can 
be overturned by means of force alone. But, even in 
this matter, people thought less of slaughter by actual 
weapons, and more and more of the one means best 
suited to the proletariat for obtaining its object, 
namely, refusal to work, or, in other words, the strike. 
It was perfectly clear that the men of the old regime 
in Germany, as also in Eussia, would endeavour to 
crush any attempt to overthrow them by a resort to 
arms. But that a considerable section of the prole- 
tariat, when once it came to power, should again have 
recourse to slaughter, revenge and rage, as did indeed 
happen at the end of the eighteenth century, was 
expected by no one. This set the whole development 
upside down. 

In opposition to the views of Engels, who was the 
author of the book " The Development of Socialism 
from Utopia to Knowledge," which voiced the belief 
that there would be a continuous diminution of bar-, 
barity and cruelty in future proletarian revolutions, 
another view has lately been discussed in a book 
entitled " The Development of Socialism from Know- 
ledge to Action," which appears in the preface to a 
book entitled " The Programme of the Communists," 
by N. Bucharin (Zurich, 1918). There it is written : — 

" The more capitalism develops in. any country, the 
inore reckless will be its defenceless struggle, and so 
the more murderous will be the proletarian revolution, 
the more cruel the measures by means of which the 
victorious working-class will tread imder foot the 
defeated capitalists " (page 19). 

This is the very contrary to what Marx and Engels 
had expected It is all the more wrong, since it erects 
into a general law for the whole of social development 
those Bolshevik practices that have prevailed for the 
last eighteen months. It is wrong, because it declares 
these practices to be the outcome of the recklesMiess 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 149 

and the brutality of the capitalists' defenceless war. Of 
all this brutality there was no sign in November, 1917, 
in Petersburg and in Moscow; and still less recently 
in Budapest. But that the proletarian revolution has 
become more murderous in the extreme is perfectly 
true. The reason for this state of affairs, I, in my 
"senile obstinacy" or my "senile stupidity" 
(Bucharin, page 22), attribute, in any case, to other 
factors than capitalist barbarity, which was never less 
evident in the countries involved in the world- war than 
in Germany at the beginning of the last revolution. 



The Effects of the War. 

The real cause of the change, in the process of the 
hitherto recorded development towards humanisation, 
into a development towards brutality is attributable t® 
the world-war ; but even earlier there were other factors 
that were inimical to the general tendency of the 
humanising influence. The most important of thes* 
was brought to light by the very French Eevolution 
itself. It was universal military service, which the 
revolutionary regime found necessary, in order, by 
means of a superiority of troops and the continual 
filling up of vacant appointments, to cope with the 
professional, armies of the united monarchs arraigned 
against them. There was only one of these monarchic 
States, which introduced this system and indeed pre- 
served and developed it at a time when France had 
already again discarded it. This was Prussia, the 
smallest and most recent of the great Powers of 
Europe, with the most imfavourable frontiers; whose 
very existence demanded an army, which, in relation 
to the population, was far greater than that in any 
other land. Apart from this fact, the old Prussia, from 
perfectly natural causes, was regarded as a stepchild 



150 TEREOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

and the poorest among the great States. If, therefore, 
it really wished to assert itself, all other considerations 
had to go in favotir of th© army. As a consequence, 
ever since the day of its ascendancy, when it ranked 
as one of the great Powers, it has been a militarist 
State par excellence. In his book on Germany (" My 
Four Years in Germany," London, 1917, page 447) 
Gera-rd, the American Ambassador, makes several 
remarks, which show up Prussia's military calling in 
a drastic light. 

Thanks to universal military service and the uphold- 
ing of militarism in general, Prussia arrived at the 
height of its power in the West, between 1866 and 1870. 
As a result, universal service was forced upon the 
remaining States of the Eiuropean Continent, and at 
about the same time the railway system became a 
decisive factor in the conduct of war. All military 
States endeavoured to develop this system to the best 
of their powers, which brought about the necessity for 
a continuous increase of armed forct — in other words, 
a more and more rigid application of universal service. 
Hence we finally arrived at th© glorious result, that 
the whole of the male population, which was not 
crippled or physically unfit, was pressed into war ser- 
vice ! But war service means the becoming accustomed 
to the shedding of human blood, and to competition 
in such shedding. It signifies the deadening of human 
feelings, of culture, and the cultivation of brutality. 
In the eighteenth century, when there were only small 
professional armies (militia), the great mass of the 
people was preserved from such influences on their 
morals; but, as a consequence of universal military 
service, the people, in the course of the nineteenth 
century, became more and more brutalised, and first 
and foremost in Prussia. 

The humanising t-endencies of the nineteenth cen- 
tury were thereby not wholly without effect; but they 
■were most adversely affected. These humanising 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 151 

tendencies became most pronounced in the case o£ 
the intellectual elements. These remained longest 
exempt from military service, even at the time when, 
instead of voluntary enlistment, forced recruiting was 
resorted to. But, under the conscriptian system, it was 
in the first place only tEe peasants, artisans, and the 
labour classes, who were affected ; the middle class and 
the intellectuals were spared. Universal service, how- 
ever, could ultimately make no exception in their case. 
On the contrary, officers to command reserves were 
required. But before, as after, the educated man 
occupied a special position in regard to military ser- 
vice. It was not a position that excluded him from 
the army, but one in which he, within the army itself, 
as a volunteer for one year and as a reserve officer, had 
certain privileges. As a result, the educated classes 
had the influences of military force on their thoughts 
and feelings, and indeed to a still higher degree than 
was the case with the other classes. For it put them 
in a privileged position and created in them already a 
certain taste for army life. Moreover, the system of 
professional officers enhanced the attraction of the 
army. Those who had made military service their life 
vocation, for whom it was no mere temporary form of 
activity, and who in all war measures had to take the 
initiative, and make their regiment excel in energy and 
smartness, developed the characteristic traits of mili- 
tarism ; in a still higher degree than the ordinary men, 
who had to serve for only a short period, and even then 
were compelled to do so. 

As a result, the educated classes were more strongly 
influenced by militarism than even the rest of the 
population. Fiuiihermore, professional occupation 
brings with it a tendency to develop every idea and 
conception in a more thorough and radical way — ^which 
after all is quite compatible with very reactionary 
modes of thought — than is the case with men, who, 
through practical experience, know the obstacles that 



152 TEEROEISM AND COMMUNISM 

oociir in daily life. Those of the educated classes who 
wished to become reserve ofi&cers, and took as their 
example the professional officers, easily adapted them- 
selves to militarism, and became the very pioneers of 
roughness and violence which, the outcome of universal 
service, soon spread to the whole of the people. Even 
in this respect Prussia was to the forefront of the 
other States ; since it first introduced the system of one 
year volunteers and reserve ofi&cers, and raised the 
reserve ofi&cer, more than any other State had done, 
to a privileged and much-coveted position. Yet, in 
spite of universal military service, the humanising ten- 
dencies in the proletariat were stronger, as a result of 
its class posil3on, than the brutalising influence of mili- 
tarism. In the case of the educated classes, especially 
in Prussia, a strong check was put on these tendencies, 
which contributed not a little to the bitterness of 
class opposition and class struggle. 

What is here said of the educated applies especially 
to the capitalists, whose humane instincts, from the 
outset, find stronger opposing forces to overcome, as a 
result of their position. When, therefore, the war broke 
out and dragged in its train for four years practically 
the whole of the healthy male population, the coarsen- 
ing tendencies of militarism sank to the very depths 
of brutality, and lack of human feeling and sentiment. 
Even the proletariat could no longer escape from its 
influence. It was in a very high degree infected by 
militarism, and when it retxumed home again, was in 
e%ery way brutalised. Habituated to war, the man 
who had come back from the front was only too often 
in a state of mind and feeling that made him ready, 
even in peace times and among his own people, to 
enforce his claims and interests by deeds of violence 
and bloodshed. That became, as it were, an element 
of the civil war; it also contributed fmther to make 
the masses mere savages. Nevertheless, many of the 
more mature, as soon as they were removed from the 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 155 

influences of war, fell easily enough into the ways of 
thinking and feeling they had acquired in times of 
peace. It is much worse, however, in the case of 
youths; for they, without any teachers or guides, have 
been powerless to withstand the brutaUsing influences 
that prevailed during the four years of the war; and 
hence have received impressions, which they can 
never eradicate completely, so long as they lived. 

Besides all this, there is a very profound change nt 
work in the very conditions of the proletariat. The 
war has affected most seriously the small middle class, 
and has claimed many of their ranks, and forced 
them into the proletariat. Moreover, these elements, 
who hitherto remained aloof from all proletarian class 
struggles, have not come into contact with the dis- 
cipline and the capacity for organisation, which the 
proletariat had acquired at the time when the class 
struggle was under the leadership of the Socialist 
Parties. These took the trouble to enlighten and 
organise the masses ; and even within the proletariat, 
as it has been hitherto constituted, there have been 
very profound changes. As was the case with all 
workers, the reduction in number of the skilled workers 
in time of war, through death, or through injury and 
sickness, had become much greater than in times of 
peace. 

At the same time, hardly any provision was made for 
the rising generation. There was no time or strength 
to educate the young, and there was also lacking the 
very need to undertake such activity. Instead of the 
varied industries that existed in times of peace, there 
rose up the much more monotonous war industry, 
which offered only small scope for skilled labour; and 
each labourer had only to learn the use of a little 
machinery, which most unskilled apprentices could 
manipulate . just as well. In consequence, the num- 
ber of billed labourers, who have contributed so 
enormously to Germany's industrial development. 



154 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

became very greatly reduced during the war; and in. 
their stead there has sprung up unskilled labour, the 
niunbers of which have rapidly increased. The skilled 
labourers were the best organised and best educated, and 
were the clearest thinking of all the labour classes. 
The unskilled were unorganised, ignorant and indif- 
ferent. Their indifference certainly disappeared during 
the war. For this gigantic event, with its fearful con- 
sequences, roused everyone, even the most remote 
elements of the people, and brought them to the most 
feverish excitement. At the same, time, however, the 
number of skilled workers, brought up on Socialist 
doctrine, diminished, as against the numbers of those 
who, in every respect, were ignorant and imdisciplined ; 
and also as against the increase of the small middle 
class, which had been forced into the proletariat. As 
a result, the minority with superior education and 
skill, who had hitherto led the proletariat, gradually 
lost its power of leading, and in its stead there arose the 
blind passion of ignorance. This became all the more 
easy, because the war brought in its train the most 
profound economic chaos, a huge amount of unemploy- 
ment, an enormous increase in high prices, and lack of 
the necessaries of life. So the desperate masses 
demanded the most radical changes; not indeed in 
order to create a newer and higher form of society 
about which they, as a matter of fact, had net given 
a thought, but in order to escape immediately from 
their horrible misery. For the proletariat the change 
of its wretched situation is always an urgent matter. 
That is the chief reason why, since considerable 
economic and historical knowledge is a necessary 
requisite for the understanding of Marxism, Marx's 
mode of thought has never found it'easy to take root 
among the labouring classes. The masses do not in- 
etinotively prefer a doctrine which leads towards the 
road of development, but one which offers a formula 
or a plan, the carrying out of which will inevitably 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 15& 

relieve them, in all circumstances, from the suffering 
they have to endure. For a proletarian it arguea a 
certain amount of resignation on his part to aclinow- 
ledge a doctrine, which certainly does not expect of 
him a state of mere passive waiting, but on the other 
hand spurs him on to an energetic continuation of the 
class struggle; yet which nevertheless makes his 
ultimate emancipation from conditions dependent on 
a mode of development, which has first cf all to be dis- 
covered and created. However difficult it was for the 
proletarian in the latter decades before the war, his 
position was such that he could, to a certain extent, 
live in such a way, that the immediate transformation 
of society was for him not a question of life or death j 
at least not for the skilled labourer, who formed the 
nucleus of the class struggle and of the Socialist move- 
ment. Nowadays these workmen are ousted in all 
political and economic struggles by the unskilled, and 
the conditions for these latter are so desperate that 
they cannot afford to wait. Why indeed should they 
wait, when the conclusion of the war has finally put the 
political power into their hands? 

The war has not only brought the most soUd elements 
of the working-classes into the forefront of the class 
struggle ; but it has also, as the result of the collapse 
of the armies, especially in those parts of Europe which 
are economically most soUd, created the proletariat 
class in the various towns, by the side of which illiterate 
peasants, such as are to be found in Eussia, have not 
been able to acquire any real independent political 
power. No class ever voluntarily renounces the power 
that it has won for itself, whatever be the curcum- 
stanees that have brought it to the fore. It would 
be folly to demand of the Eussian and Hungarian 
proletariats such renunciation, on account of the back- 
ward state of their countries. But a Socialist Party 
led by a truly Marxist spirit would adapt the present 
problems confronting the victorious proletariat to the 



156 TBEKOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

material and psychical conditions to be found ready to 
hand ; and would not endeavour, without further reflec- 
tion, to introduce an immediate and complete sociali- 
sation in a land of undeveloped capitalist production 
like Bussia. 

Certainly it is questionable whether such a party 
•ould ever lead the masses. To the practical politicians 
it seems more important to rule at the moment, than 
to run the danger of an economic failure, with a view 
to being ultimately in the right. The practical 
politician does not like being in a position of inviting 
unpopularity at the present moment, because the in- 
evitable collapse of a policy, which exceeds the bounds 
of possibility, has been made clear. He prefers to avoid 
the collapse, and to preserve his ideal from being com- 
promised. The old antagonism between practical 
politics and theoretical politics, between Lassalle and 
Marx, rose again after the revolution in Russia in 1917. 
Marx declared in his letter to Kugelmann, of the 23rd 
February, 1865 (published by me in the " Socialist," 
1st May, 1918), that the German working men, as a 
result of the reaction of 1849-1859, had become too 
much hampered in their development not to "become 
jubilant when a deliverer, in the form of a mob orator 
like Lassalle, comes and promises to help them at one 
move to enter the promised land. ' ' Such ' ' moves ' ' and 
such " deliverers " were not to Marx's taste. But, as 
at the time of Lassalle, the time of the Second Russian 
Revolution, if for quite other reasons, proved to be 
very unfavourable to Marxist doctrines. Those among 
the labouring classes in Russia, who had been trained 
on Marxist Imes, were dead or swept away by the back- 
ward masses, who had suddenly awakened to life. It 
was pre-Marxist ways of thought that gained the upper 
hand, ways such as were represented by Blanqui, 
Weitling or Bakunin. These were the conditions under 
which the Revolution, first of all in Russia and then 
in the neighouring countries, progressed. No wonder, 



EFFECT OF CIVILISATION 157 

therefore, that it awoke afresh only primitive ways of 
thought ; and also allowed brutal and murderous forms 
of political and social war to come to light, forms which 
one had been led to believe had been overcome by the 
intellectual and moral rise of the proletariat. 



CHAPTEE VIII. 
The Communists at Work. 

EXPEOPRIATION AND OeGANISAHON. 

The- world-war made the working class take a back- 
ward step both morally and intellectually. It brutahsed 
almost every strata of the population; it set the most 
undeveloped elements of the proletariat in the forefront 
of the movement, and finally increased the necessitous 
state of the proletariat to such an extent, that it brought 
despair in the place of quiet thought and reflection. 
The war also encouraged primitive ideas in the working- 
classes, by developing the military way of thinking, 
that form of thinking which, as it is, lies very near the 
surface in the thoughts of the average unintelligent 
man, who imagines that mere power is the determining 
factor in the world history — as if one needed only the 
necessary force and recklessness to accompHsh every- 
thing that one undertakes. Marx and Engels have al- 
ways attacked and opposed thisrconception. . In Engel s*^ 
c lassica l book (" Heg "F.n gen Dnbring'p Transforma- 
tion of "tjaience ' ' ) &ere are th ree c haptera deskling 
ex clusively with "theory ot powef'^ 'tSrS^edition, pages 
162-19a). TJtus t>neory, from beginning to end, ia anti- 
Marxist. Engels did not hesitate to oppose it wher- 
ever it appeared in a revolutionary form. He was not 
of the view, so much upheld to-day, that one should 
never show up the mistakes of a movement, if it is a 
revolutionary proletarian movement, because one 
J3jight, by so doing, weaken the force of the revolution. 
Obviously enough, one should not be too strict in judg- 
ment on the faults and follies in a revolution. The most 
difficult historical situation is that of a revolution, in. 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 159 

which one stands face to face with a completely new 
situation, which it is impossible to survey. It would 
be the very cheapest form of Pharisaism for an observer, 
himself in a secure position, or regarding from afar, to 
blame too heavily the mistakes that are madtv by 
men who are. in the centre of the fight, and who have 
to bear all its burdens and dangers. But on the other 
land, it is absolutely necessary to blame mistakes 
that do not arise from conceivably false or insuffi- 
cient information, but which proceed from an inherently 
false fundamental eomception of things. They can bei 
avoided only by overcoming such a conception; and 
they threaten every future revolutionary movement, if 
one allows them to pass uncriticised, or even defends' 
them, and glorifies them in the supposed interests of 
the revolution. 

Marx and Engels did not allow themselves to be 
hindered in such necessary criticism of the revolution, 
through, their " volcanic temperament," This is 
proved by the criticism that Engels published in the 
Leipdg Volkstaat, in the autumn of 1873. The 
insurrection, which broke out after the proclamation of 
the Eepublic in Spain on the 6th July of that year, was, 
as early as the 26th January, practically defeated, with 
some few exceptions, the Carthaginians prolonging the 
insurrection up to January 8, 1874. Thus, even before 
the rising was completely quelled, Engels published a 
very sharp criticism against " this absolutely shameful 
insurrection . . . which should be a warning to 
the rest of the world." 

This criticism appeared in the series of articles on 
"The Bakvinists at Work" (Volkstaat, 31st Octo- 
ber, 2nd and 5th November), newly -printed, 1894, in 
the magazine Internationales aus dem Volkstaat, by 
Freiderich Engels (Berlin Vorwdrts edition). 

We recommend this work to the study of all who 
are busying themselves with Bolshevism. For Bol- 
shevism is, in many respects, foreshadowed in that 



160 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

work, since the situation of the Spanish Eevolution 
bears many analogies to that of the Commune of the 
present day. Engels began with a reference to the 
fat't that, in Spain, the Intemalionalists in their 
majority belonged to the Bakunisfc Alliance, and he 
continues : 

' ' When, in February, 1873, the Eepublic was pro- 
claimed, the Spanish ^lli^moists were in a very diffi- 
cult position. Spain is a land so very backward in 
industry that, in that country, it is quite impossible 
to speak of an immediate and complete emancipation 
of the working classes. Before this is possible, Spain 
must pass through several preliminary stages on the 
road to development, and clear out of the way a vast 
number of obstacles. The Eepublic gave opportunity 
for the country to pass through these preliminary 
stages in the shortest possible period, and to remove 
the hindrances as soon as possible. But this occasion 
could only be put to any use through Eictual political 
participation on the part of the Spanish working- 
classes." (Pages 17 and 18). 

That would, however, have meant to participate in 
the voting for the Cortes and the National Assembly, 
and to have taken active part in the same. But the 
Bakunists wanted the immediate and complete 
emancipation of the working-classes. As a means to 
this purpose, the parliamentary democracy, consider- 
ing the then state of affairs in Spain, was absolutely 
incapable, however necessary it was as a means to- 
wards the development and the maturing of the pro- 
letariat. Participation in " any kind of vote appeared 
to them to be crime worthy of death." 

Now what did they want to put in the place of an 
election campaign? The working-men's coimcil, as a 
means for the " immediate and complete emancipaKon 
oi the working-classes," had not yet been discovered. 
The Bakunists proclaimed a general strike, and the 
dividing up of Spain into numberless smaJl cantons; 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 161 

along with, from the very start, the splitting up of 
thp whole movement intp a series of loral movements, 
and the declaration of the revolution. The end of the 
story was not merely the collapse of the movement, 
the ruin of the Spanish Internationale, but also " th*! 
abnegation of the principles hitherto preached by the 
Bakunists " (page 32), which they had to give up, one 
after the other, as a result of the force of circuyn- 
Btances. 

Is it any different in Eussia to-day? It is true that, 
at the outbreak of the present revolution among the 
working classes of Eussia, it was Marxism and not 
anarchy that was reigning. As a Socialistic theory, 
Marxism has never received such general recognition 
as in Eussia. 

For decades the Eussian Socialists had made a 
virtue out of necessity, and espied in the backward 
character of their agrarian problems a certain 
advantage. They thought that what there was of the 
village communism, in regard to land, made it particu- 
larly easy for them to establish and buUd up modem 
Socialism. It was the great service of the Marxists 
in Eussia, led by Axelrod and Plechanoff, to fight for 
recognition of this conception, and by a long and weary 
struggle to succeed, in view of the undeveloped state 
of the Eussian proletariat and of Eussian society in 
general, in making the inevitable revolution from the 
outset take on only a bourgeois character, even if th^ 
proletariat was called upon to play a prominent part 
in it. This view was triumphant in the Eussian 
Socialist movement, so long as the Eevolution did not 
bring the proletariat into power, which had for its pro- 
gramme th« problem of immediate emancipation; and 
also so long as Socialism was professed by the int«l- 
le<*tuals and a certain high level of the working-classes. 
Consistent Marxism was thrown into a very difficult 
position when the Eevolution set in motion the really 
great mass of the Eussian people, who were conscious 



162 TEREOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

only of their needs and desires, and who did not care 
at all whether what they desired was, under the then 
circumstances, possible and socially advantageous. 
In the case of the Bolsheviks, Marxism had no power 
on the ■ situation. The mass psychology overruled 
thena, and they allowed themselves to be carried away 
by it. Doubt-less in consequence of this they have be- 
come the rulers of Eussia. It is quite another ques- 
tion what wiU and must be the end of it all. By 
making the blind will of the masses the motive force 
of the Ee volution, they threw overboard the Marxist 
system, to the victorious ascendancy of which they 

< had, in a large measure, contributed. With their 
scientific knowledge, and as the result of the popu- 
larity of Marx's name, they thought they had settled 
everything by taking a Marxist motto, the rrlotto of 
" the dictatorship of the proletariat." With these 
words they hoped to gain absolution from all sins 
against the spirit of Marxism. 

^ The Eevolution came as a result of the war. The 
soldiers were tired of it and would no longer fight. The 
Bolsheviks made themselves the most formidable 
representatives of the disinclination to continue the 
war. They insisted on the dissolution of the army by 
every means in their power, caring not a bit whether 
this, should be favourable to the German military 
autocracy or not. If this military autocracy did not 
win, and it came to a German Eevolution, the Bolshe- 
viks were certainly not responsible for that. 

The oranplete collapse of the army gave complete 
freedom to the lower classes. The peasants imme- 
diately insisted on confiscating the landed property, 
and dividing it up into private properly. It was im- 
possible to avoid these large estates being ^ven over 
to the peasantry, but the problem shoiild have been 
tackled in such a way, that the technical advantages 
obtained from these estates should not be lost. But 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WORK 163 

that would have reqmred time, and besides, the 
peasants would not wait. 

The Bolsheviks won the peasants over to their side, 
by introducing anarchy in iiie country, and by allowing 
every community to have a free hand ; so that the 
destruction of these estates went on in the most primi- 
tive fashion, with technical loss and the destruction of 
many means of production. In return, however, the 
peasants allowed the Bolsheviks a completely free 
hand in the towns in which they had already likewise 
won over the working classes ; so that these latter were 
obedient merely to the Bolsheviks' will, and took no 
regard for the actual conditions of liiings. 

The proletariat was starving. It felt itself repressed 
and exploited, so it demanded with increasing energy 
the immediate throwing off of the capitalist yoke. To 
satisfy its will there wasi no time for study or reflec- 
tion. With a few heavy blows the whole edifice 
of Russian capitalism lay in ruins. T he substitution . 
of Socialism' for capitalism embraces two question s — 

^one of property, and tae other of organisa tion. It claim& 
the abolition of private property in re^rd to mean s 
01 proauction. and the transformation of iocTal 

" property in the form of a iState and comgrmiigtro 
propert ;^ It also claims the subs t itution of a sociali se 
in place of a capitalistic orp^ainisation of the manage - 

' ment and of all siK-.h fimctifvnR in nne comp le te economic 
whole. Of these two transformations, that concerne d 

^ith property is more simple . Nnftiing ia pgamr ihan 

to expropri ate a capitalist. That is a mere Question 
"o? force."ana: not p fif.^RBarily fa> he connacted with any 
_sofiial-itheory^ Long before there was such a thing 
as industnaTcapitalism, at the time, namely, of mere 
commercial and monied capital, we ^nd similar expro- 
priation of merchants, bankers and money-lenders, 
through the feudal lords and princes, and indeed 
thrcmgh the people themselves. In the Middle 
Ages, not only were the Jews often expropriated; but 



164 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

despite the piety of the time, from time to time also 
the treasury of a church, or of a particular order would 
be confiscated. For instance, Philip IV. of France, 
at the beginning of the fourteenth century, expropri- 
ated the enormously wealthy order of the Knights 
of the Temple. Long before there was such a thing 
as modem Socialism, many good, naive peojple often 
regarded the noble robbers, who despoiled the rich in 
order to give to the poor, as benefactors of the human 
race. To carry out this form of Socialism was easy 
enough. It was in keeping with the undeveloped 
state of the Eussian proletariat that Bakunin, in 1864, 
immediately before the war and the Commune, in his 
manifesto to the Eussian youth of the time, pointed 
to the way taken by the Eussian robber-captain, Stenka 
Easin, who in 1667 formed a band of' robbers, with 
whom he lived four whole years in South Eussia, until 
the Government overpowered and killed him. 
"^ It is not so easy to organise as it is to expropriate. 
A capitalist concern is a complex organisation, which 
finds its intelligence in the capitalist himself, or in his 
representative. If it is desired to abolish capitalism, 
some form of organisation must be created, which should 
be possible of functioning as well, if not better, without 
the capitalist head. This is not so simple as was the 
procedure of Philip IV. or of Stenka Eazin; for it 
demands a certain set of conditions of a material 
as well as of a psychical order, a high development of 
capitalistic organisation, not only of production but 
also of the export and import of raw materials. More- 
over, it also demands a proletariat, which is conscious 
of its duties, not only towards its own neighbours and 
comrades, but also towards society as a whole — a prole- 
tariat, moreover, which has become accustomed to 
voluntary discipline and self-administration through 
long years of mass organisation ; and which, finally, is 
intelligent enough to distinguish the possible from the 
impossible, and the scientifically educated leader with 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 165 

character from an ignorant demigod without a con- 
science. Wherever these conditions are not present, 
capitalism cannot with any success be permanently 
dissolved by Socialism. And even in those districts, and 
in those branches of industry in which these conditions 
are already sufficiently highly developed, the Socialistic 
organisation must be carefully prepared by a profound 
examination of the actual conditions. For the forms 
which the new organisations have, for the time being, 
taken on are not necessarily the best for all branches 
of industry, for all lands and all times. They are not 
" ready-made Utopias" or eternal " ideals." Under 
certain circumstances they can differ a good deal, and 
must be adapted according to the prevailing conditions 
in the most business-like manner passible, if they are to 
have any success. 

But both factors in socialisation, that is, expropria 
tion and reorganisation, must remain in closest connec- 
tion, if chaos and an absolute stsindstill are not to follow 
on the state of production that has hitherto existed. 
Philip IV. or Stenka Eazin could confine their activi- 
ties to mere expropriation, for they had no intention 
of creating some new method of production. The 
transi ti on to Snci a-lism ia not poaaihlp by this Bimplft. 
means. The roasses were i mnatiip.nt — . T h ey would nofc 
wait; In order^to_appease the m the Bolshevik Sj^jvhen 
ifieij fiatae "into "power^ c ut the socialising procea a-jn^o 

"~6wonp^PtgC'~T h'ey'''sepir^ HlJta-iaciar^ 
olEef71altht)U|^.Jihfi~oai6-mt^ou4^4Jie--other--caaittab- 

"TEeypi^eeeded at first after Stenka Eazin 's approved 
method, afterwards endeavouring to proceed with 
organisation as well as it would go. The two things 
that were intimately connected with one another, and 
could only work in conjunction, were separated and 
torn asunder. Lenin himself acknowledged this in 
April, 1918, in his book, " The immediate problems of 
the Soviet Power." 



166 TEBEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

" Up to the present, the first consideration was to 
find measures for an immediate eKpropiiation of the 
expropriators. Now the first thing to be done is to 
organise the finance and control of all business concerns, 
in which the capitalists have already been expropriated, 
as well as in all other concerns '' (page 14). 

' ' Our work, which we have to accomplish with the 
aid of the proletariat, which consists in the organisation 
of the general financing, and control over the produc- 
tion and the distribution of material products, has been 
behind our efforts to secure the immediate expropria- 
tion of profiteers. In regard to the socialistic 
transformation in these departments (and they are very 
important and essential departments), we have been 
very backward; and we have remained backward for 
the very good reason that the financing and control 
have been far too little organised " (page 23). 

Business concerns and branches of industry were 
expropriated without any attempt being made to 
discover whether their organisation on Socialist lines 
was possible. Even in such dep.artments, where such 
organisation would have been possible, they were quit® 
content, in the first place, with expropriation; because 
this alone was possible to carry out without preparation, 
and also because the working classes would not wait. 
But the consequences very soon showed themselves. 
Economic life in Eussia is backward owing to the fact 
that its industry, in comparison with its agricultural 
life, employs but a very small section of the popular 
tion; but inside tJiis industry the most modem and 
up-to-date forms of large manufacture predominate. 
They had far surpassed the state of Parisian industry 
of 1871. For in this latter, in so far as anything can 
be said about socialiBation at all, the form of productive 
associations alone came into question. 

The Eussian factories were for the most part large 
concerns, and therefore the first thing that appeared 
necessary to be done, after the abolition of capital. 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 167 

^^£5£SA— fcO " b » -fc b «Hi! .. n aitiQ a ^sation. In productive 
associations the wages of theKboarejLjiepend on his 
work and on his associates. The scale of these wages 
is determined by the number of products that ar© 
brought to market. They themselves must look after 
the buying and selling of raw materials. In the 
nationalised factories the workmen drew their money 
no more from the capitalists, as they had done before, 
but from the State. The maximum of their wages 
depended much less on their measure of productive 
activity than on the strength of their pressure on the 
power of the State. This latter power also had to look 
after the selling, as well as after the buying of raw 
materials. A well-disciplined and higjhly-intelligent 
workjingrclass was necessary, a working-class which 
would recognise to what large extent the social 
prosperity, and therefore their own, depended on the 
productivity of their labour, in order, -under these 
conditions, to make production successful and to keep 
it so. Moreover, from such a working class real 
production coidd be expected only if the necessary 
organising measiu-es were taken which, apart from the 
workmen, as also apart from the State control and 
the consumers, would preserve the necessary influence 
on the single business concerns and the whole 
industrial branches; and also, if encouragement to 
work was created, which should supersede the 
dominating existence of capital. 

From this time onwards, however, there was failing,'\| 
not only organisation, but also the requisite intelligence 
and discipline of the working-classes. The more so, 
since the war and its results had put the most ignorant 
and most undeveloped sections of the proletariat in 
the wildest excitement. Certainly the Eussian work- 
man had derived a high sense of solidarity from his 
village commune; but the sphere of his influence was 
as limited as the village commtmity itself, for it is 
really confined to a very small circle of his own 



168 TEBEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

personal comrades The larger social unity is for hina 
a matter of indifference. The unfortunate results 
arising from these circumstances the Bolshevists 
themselves regretted. Trotsky says in his book, 
" Work, Discipline and Order will save the Socialist 
Soviet Eepublic," page 17: 

" The Eevolution, which awakened a sense of 
human personality in the most oppressed and down- 
trodden, naturally took on at the beginning of its 
awakening an apparently anarchist character. This 
awakening of the elementary instincts of personality 
often shows a grossly egoistic or, to use a philosophical 
expression, an ego-centric character. It endeavours 
to acquire for itself all that it possibly can. It thinks 
only of itself, and is not at all inclined to have regard 
for the standpoint of the class in general. Hence the 
flood of all kinds of disorganising voices, and of 
individualistic, anarchistic, and grasping tendencies, 
which we observe especially in the broader spheres of 
the lower elements in the country, as well as in the 
midst of the earlier army, and also among certain 
elements of the working-classes." 

These were quite other elements than those which 
appeared in the Paris Commune, where, men contented 
themselves with a modest wage in order to further 
Socialism. Under such circumstances, the form taken 
by production in the expropriated concerns is clear. 
The wages were raised as high as was possible, and 
hence there was only an economy of labour. In order 
to facilitate this, work by agreement was abolished. 
Then there were occasions; such as in the case of the 
Poutilof works in Petersburg, which, in the period 
when they drew 96,000,000 roubles as a subsidy from 
the State, produced a total value of 50,000,000. It 
was onlj the unlimited employment of paper money 
that made it possible to avoid bankruptcy, which 
then seemed inevitable. If there was little work done 
in the factories, obviously the workmen withdrew. 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 169 

especially from the unpleasant, the dirty, and the 
heavy labour. How this kind of labour is to be estab- 
lished and assured in a Socialist community, in so far 
as it is indispensable, was a problem which has engaged 
the attention of Socialists of all times. Furier thought 
to solve it by engaging " gutter snipes " for dirty work, 
youths who in preference wallow in mud. But this 
humorous solution was clearly ncit satisfactory. The 
only solution, in fact, which is in acoordance with 
Socialist principles, and which could promise any 
success, is that it demands of technical science the 
elimination of all injurious and disagreeable elements 
in work, which is by its nature wearisome and 
prejudicial to health. So long as this is not possible] 
there remains no other course than to make thisb 
section of labour attractive by means of particular/ 
privileges, either extraordinarily high wages or extra/ 
ordinarily short working hours. 

^The^Bols heviks disc overed a new solution. , It did^ 
not at all correspand~WTHr'^ociimuL piiuti^es, but 
with the mass psychology of excited working masses. 
In other words, they introduced compulsory labour, 
not, however, compulsory labour for those who had 
hitherto been paid labourers. Why impose on them 
compulsory labour? Under the influence of new 
conditions one factory after the other, whether on 
account of lack of raw material or of transport 
difficulties, had to close down, so that the number 
of workers who could find no work increased. Oh, no ! 
Compulso ry labour w as imposed only on those who 
ha d beeB T^eprived of "aTl privileggg'TIncrer the excuse 
that they did not work, namely, _ fee bourgeois . Instead 
of the universal formal democracyTTEe iSoviet Eepublic 
established the proletarian democracy. Only those 
who worked should have political rights; only they 
should be sufficiently fed and protected by the State. 
The drones were to be deprived of all rights. 



170 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

This was apparently a great Socialist idea, which 
had only one small error. For nearly two years already 
the Eepublic d the working men's councils had given 
the vote to- the workers alone. And yet up to this 
very day no solution to the riddle " What constitutes 
a worker? " has been given. From different 
communists we get different answers. At the outset, 
these working men's councils were none other than 
representative bodies of the paid labourers of the large 
factories. As such, they formed definite though 
limited oi^janisations, which were very important for 
the Eevolution. The " council idea " then proceeded 
to substitute a Central Council of the working-men's 
councils for the National Assembly, which had arisen 
from the general elections. Nevertheless, the founda- 
tion ol this Central Council would have been very shaky, 
if its establishment had been confined to the Working- 
men's Coimcils of the large factories. But as soon 
as they went outside this circle, and at the same time 
eixcluded the bourgeoisie from having a vote, they 
became' utterly lost. The demarcation of the middle 
class from the working-class can never be accurately 
drawn. There will always be something arbitrary in 
such endeavour, which fact makes the council idea 
peculiarly liable to become' a foundation for a piureiy 
dictatorial and arbitrary rule, but very little calculated 
to establish and build up a clear and systematic 
State constitution. , 

For instance, in the. case of the educated class 
(intelligentsia) it rests entirely with the Soviet 
authorities whether they are to be reckoned as belong- 
ing to the middle class or not. The same applies 
to their right of voting, and also in respect to their 
being liable to compulsory labour. 

Ini the Soviet Eepublic the bourgeois not only had 
to suffer the confiscation of all means of production 
and consumption, without ajiy conapensation whatever, 
and were not only deprived of all political rights; 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 171 

they were, at the same time, the victims of oppreasion, 
and they alone were liable to compulsory laboxxr ! They 
are the only people in Russia who are compelled to 
work, and at the Same time the very people who are 
deprived of the vote, because they do not worfe ! More- 
over, in Soviet Eusaia, a man is not put into the class 
jof workers or bourgeoisie according to the occupation 
that he for the moment has, but according to the 
occupation that he had before the Revolution. The 
bourgeoisie in this respect appears in the Soviet 
Republic as a special human species, whose character- 
istics ai-ie ineradicable. Just as a nigger remains a 
nigger, a Mongohan a Mongolian, whatever his appear- 
ance and however he may dress; so a bourgeois 
remains a bourgeois, even if he becomes .al beggar, or 
^ves by his work. And how he lives indeed ! 

The bourgeoisie are compelled to work, but they 
have not the right to choose the work that they 
understand, and which best corresponds to their 
abilities. On the contrary, they are forced to carry 
on the most filthy and most objectionable kind of 
labour. In return they receive not increaeed rations, 
but the very lowest, which scarce suf&ce to appease 
their hunger. Their food rations equal only a quarter 
of those of the soldiers, and of the wbrkihg-men who 
are employed in the factories run by the Soviet 
Republic. "Where these latter receive one pound of 
bread, the former get only a quarter of a pound; and 
where again the latter get sixteen pounds of potatoes, 
the others have only four. F roicn all this we percei ve 
nrj.^. flp sifrn ^f an y attempt to plaoe_'the proletariat on a 
hjfiher level, to_ work o u t a ' ' newla ad-higjifiiilorm at 
l^e' /' ~liufe merely tKe" t hirsF f ca'^n^ance c^Jb.^^ 
pJgrMtEe proletariat in "its most pnmjtiv6 ~"i^mr^ 
It'*' thinE ■ tfj"" gain nappmess by beii^ able to 
trample down those men who, by their destiny, have 
been in more favourable circumstances, who are 



172 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

better clothed, better housed and better educated 
than they themselves. 

In setting free this " will " as the motive force of 
the Bevolution, the Bolshevists have let things . go 
much further, in certain cases, than even they them- 
selves have wished. Thus, for instance, the idea that 
the bourgepis of bygone days have now become merely 
beasts of burden, deprived of all rights, caused the 
workers who formerly were in the employ of such 
bourgeoisie to, issue the following manifesto of the 
Working Men's Councils of MurzUovka: 

/., " The Soviet gives herewith full power to Comrade 

{ Gfregory Sareieff, according to his choice and orders, 
\and for use in the artillery division, which is 

jSjuartered in Murzilovka, in the district of Briantz, 

■vto requisition sixty women and girls of the bourgeois 

)and financier class, and to hand them over to the 

^barracks." 16th September, 1918 (published by Dr. 

I Nath WintschrMalejefi, " What are the Bolsheviks 
spoing?" Lausanne, 1919, page 10). 

We should be doing an injustice to place the respon- 
sibility for this manifesto on the Bolsheviks, for it was 
certainly just, as contrary to their wishes, as were the 
September massacres to the men of the Convention. 
But the thought that, in one single local Soviet organi- 
sation, hatred and contempt towards the bourgeois 
could reach such a.etage is horrible in the extreme; 
for these men are deprived not only of all poUtieal 
rights, but even of the mos.t elementary considerations 
of human dignity. 



The Growth of the Proletariat. 

It is only natural that not even the, Bolsheviks 
could entirely yield to a mass psychology that took 
on such forms. After they had expropriated ths hour- 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 173 

geois class, ajid declared them ' ' free as the air, ' ' and 
had made the proletariat into a " sacred entity," they 
attempted to inculcate some necessary improvements 
in this " sacred entity," which really should have 
been the pre-conditions of all soeiaUsation and 
expropriation. 

" We have known for some time past," said 
Trotsky, " that we lack the necessary organisation, 
the necessary discipline, and the necessary historical 
education. "We knew all this, but it did not prevent 
us in any way from endeavouring, with open eyes, to 
acquire power for ourselves. We were convinced 
that we could in time learn and arrange everything." 
(" Work, Discipline, etc.," page 16.) 

But would Trotsky undertake to get on a locomotive 
and set it going, in the conviction that he would, 
during the journey, "learn and arrange everything "? 
There is no doubt that he would be quite capable of 
doing this, but would he have the necessary time? 
Would not the train be very likely soon to become 
derailed or explode? One must have acquired some- 
thing of the qualities necessary to drive an engine, 
before one attempts to set it going. In like manner 
the proletariat should have aoquired those qualities, 
which are indispensable for organisation and 
production, if it wishes to imdertake this task. For 
such organisation endures no vacuum, no condition 
of void, no standing still; and least of all a condition 
such as that created by the war, which has deprived 
us of all means of equipment, so that we have to live 
from hand to mouth, and are threatened with death 
from starvation, as a result of the cessation of produc- 
tion. Lenin himself already regards it as necessary to 
put a check on the process of expropriation. 

"If we should now endeavour to continue any 
further expropriation of capital at the rate we did 
formerly, we should certainly suffer defeat. It is 
perfectly clear and obvious to every thinking man, that 



174 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

the task of organising the proletarian finance has 
remained subordinate to our work of the immediate 
expropriation of the 63cp»opriators. " ("The 
Immediate Duties of the Soviet Power," page 14.) 

But Lenin is in no spirit of renunciation. On the 
contrary, he still declares that, despite aU, the Soviets 
would win in " the campaign against -capital "; for the 
process of the development of the Russian proletariat 
is proceeding in giant strides. He. says : 

" As a condition of the increase of the productivity 
of laboiur, there appears an increase in the culture and 
education of the masses of the population. This 
increase is proceeding at a remarkable rate, thanks to 
the ' impetus ' to life and initiative, which has begun 
to show itself deep in the souls of the people." 
(puge 33.) 

The rise in higher education of the masses of the 
people can take a double form. It may proceed in an 
orderly and systematic way through the schools. In 
this respect there is an enormous amount stiU to 
accomplish in Eussia. An adequate system of popular 
education demands enormous means and a flourishing 
state of production, which provides a great surplus for 
such services. But the state of production in Eussia 
brings such wretched results that the school system 
has had to suffer most grievously. Certainly the 
Bolsheviks have been striving all they, can to spread 
knowledge of art and science' among the masses ; but 
all their endeavours have been frightfully hampered 
by the changed economic conditions in which they 
find themselves. From: this it is clear that a speedy 
rise in education, which would make possible a rapid* 
and satisfactory increase in production, caimot be 
expected. On the contrary, this increase in pro- 
duction is a pre-condition of the rise in education. 
Grown men, however, for the most part, do not learn 
any more in the schools that the State or the com- 
munity sets up, but much more in the school of life. 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 175 

The best means of education are provided for them in 
a democraoy, in which absolute freedorp of discussion 
and publicity are essential. But this imposes on 
every party the obligation to strive for the emancipa- 
tion of the souls of the people; and to put every 
member of the community in a positioii to examine 
the argutments of all sides, so that, by such means, each 
may arrive at some independent judgment. 

Finally, class struggle takes over from democracy its 
best features; for in democracy eaeh party addresses 
itself to the whole social" community. Each party 
certainly defends definite class interests ; but it is com- 
pelled to show every side of these interests, which are 
intimately connected with thei general interest of the 
whole social community. In this way modern State 
democracy is superior to the narrowness of village 
church policy, as also to the cliquish nature of pro- 
fessional politics. In democracy the horizon of the 
masses becomes enormously extended by participation 
in polities. All these possibilities of education of iiti& 
people become simply shattered if, as the Soviet 
Republic has done, democracy is set aside in favour of 
an autocracy of the working-men's council, which 
deprives every " bourgeois " of hie rights, and abolishes 
the freedom of the press. The particular interests of 
the wage-earners in this way become detached 
from gieneral social interests, and the working man 
himself is, at the same time, denied an independent 
examination of the arguments that arise in the 
struggle of the various classes and parties. For this 
examination is already settled for him by a patronising 
authority, which anxiously tries to keep from him 
every thought and every feeling, which might cause 
doubts to arise in his heart as to the divine nature of 
the Soviet system. Naturally enough, this is exactly 
what should happen in the interests of truth. The 
poor ignorant people should be prevented from being 
deceived and 'poisoned by a bourgeois Press, with all 



176 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

its enormous and powerful machinery. But where in 
present-day Eussia is this powerful machinery to be 
found, which grants to the bourgeois newspapers a 
superiority over the Bolshevik papers? Apart from 
all this, the ^bitterness of the Bolshevik enslaving of 
the press is employed not merely against the bourgeois 
papers alone, but against the whole of the press that 
does not swear allegiance to the existing system of 
government. 

The justification of this system simply proceeds on 
the naive assumption that there really exists an abso- 
lute truth, and that the Communists alone are in 
possession of that truth. It also proceeds on another 
assumption, namely, that all journalists are, by their 
very nature, liars; whereas only the Communists are 
the fanatics of truth. Everywhere there are to be found 
liars as well as fanatics, who accept as true everything 
that they see. But the lie flourishes best in those 
places where it has no control to fear, and where, 
moreover, the press of a certain tendency alone has the 
right to speak. In this way it simply has carte 
blanche to he, and this encourages those elements 
that tend to deception. Therefore it is turned to 
a-occunt the more desperate the position of those in 
power, and the more they fear the truth. The truth 
in regard to information is in no way strengthened by 
the abolition of the freedom of the press. On the 
contrary, it is most adversely affected thereby. As 
to the truth of conceptions and ideas, we must say 
with Pilate : " .What is truth ? " There is no such thing 
as absolute truth. There is merely a process of know- 
ledge, and this process is in every way impaired, and 
with it also men's possibilities of acquiring knowledge, 
if one party uses its power to monopolise its own con- 
ceptions as the one blessed truth, and seeks to suppress 
every other opinion. It is not to be doubted that the 
idealists among the Bolsheviks have acted in perfect 
good faith, in believing that they were in complete 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOKK 177 

possession of the truth, and that only sheer perverse- 
ness could make others thmk differently from them. 
Bui we must equally a'ttribute good faith to the men 
of the Holy Inquisition of Spain. The rise in culture 
and education among the masses of the people 
certainly received and impetus under its regime. 

There is certainly a difference between the 
Inquisitors and the leaders of the Soviet Republic . 
The former did not in any way desire the material and 
Bpiritual improvement of the masses on this earthly 
sphere. They wished pierely to ensure their souls 
for the future life. The Soviet people believed they 
could, by means of the methods of the Inquisition, 
raise the masses of the people in every way. They do 
not at all see how very m.uch they are degrading them. 
Besides, a high standard of popular education, a high 
" morale " among the masses is a pre-condition of 
Socialism, a morale which shows itself not merely in 
strong social instincts and feelings of solidarity, of 
sympathy and of self-sacrifice, but also in the extension 
of these feelings beyond the narrow circles of one's 
comrades to the generality of mankind. We found 
such a morale strongly developed among the 
proletarians of the Paris Commune. It is utterly 
failing in the masses of the people who mostly con- 
stitute the Bolshevik proletariat. 

But this " morale" must 5e created at all costs, so 
says Trotsky. " This communist morale, my comrades, 
we are in duty bound to preach, to support, to develop 
and to establish. That is the finest and highest task of 
our party, in all departments of its activity." ("Work, 
Discipline," etc., page 21). 

Yes, but does Trotsky really believe that you can 
create morale overnight? That can develop but 
slowly. On the other hand, the encouragement to 
production suffers no delay. If the morale of the 
communists has not formed itself before the begin- 
ning of socialisation, it will be too late to develop it 



178 TEREOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

after expropriation has taken place. And how is it to 
be developed ? It shall be preached. As if ever in 
this world anything had come from moral sermons. 
Whenever Marxists base their hopes on moral sermons, 
they merely show into how deep a blind alley they 
have fallen. But indeed this new morale ia not to be 
merely preached, but supported. But again, how? 
" Morale " is the product of our lives and activities. 
From, these it derives its nourishment and its form. The 
higher morale which the struggling proletariat develops 
depends on two factors. Being the poorest and 
weakest members of society, the proletariat can only 
assert itself by the most intimate co-operation. 
Sympathy and self-sacrifice of the individual are 
regarded in its ranks as the highest quality, in opposi- 
tion to the capitalist class, in which the individual 
makes his wealth at the expense of the masses, without 
any consideration as to how he gains it. But even 
the strong feelings of solidarity can have a directly 
anti-social effect, if they are confined to a narrow 
circle, which seeks to gain its advantage at the cost 
of the rest of society, like the nobility, or the bureau- 
cracy, or an officers' corps. What, however, does raise 
the solidarity of the modem proletariat to the height 
of social morale is its extension to the whole of 
humanity. The extension of such solidarity springs 
from' the consciousness that the proletariat cannot 
emancipate itself without emancipating the whole of 
the human race. Long ago the youthful Engels hoped 
to derive from a knowledge of thia fact the greatest 
aids to an improvement of the proletarian morale. He 
declares in his "Position of the Working Classes in 
England," (2nd edition, page 299): — 

! ' In proportion as the proletariat assimilates 
socialist and ciMpmunist elements, the revolution 
abates in bloodshed and rage. In its very principles 
Commimism stands over and above the division of the 
bourgeois and the proletariat. It recognises this 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 179 

division in its. historical significance for the present 
day, but does not regard it as justified for the future. 
Communism wishes to remove this division. So long 
as this division is maintained, -it recognises the bitter- 
ness of the proletarian against his oppressor as a neces- 
sary evil, as the most forceful lever to be employed in 
the labour agitation ifcat is just taking place; but it 
seeks to rise above this bitterness, because it repre- 
sents the cause of himianity, and not merely the cause 
of tEe working-class alone. Nevertheless, no com- 
munist ever wishes to wreala vengeance on the 
individual, nor does he really believe that the 
individual bourgeois can act differently in the existing 
circumstances than he actuaJLy does. The more, there- 
fore, the English working man adopts Socialist ideas, 
the more will his present bitterness, which if it remains 
as it does can achieve nothing, become superfluous; 
and the more will all action against the bourgeois lose 
in brutality and cruelty. If it were in any way possible 
to make the whole proletariat communist before the 
struggle began, the struggle itself would proceed on 
most peaceful lines. But that is no longer possible^ 
It is already too late. (Engels expected in 1845, the 
imminent outbreak of the Eevolution which, however, 
came in 1848, but on the Continent and not in England, 
and the Eevolution itself was not proletarian. — ^Editor.) 
I believe meanwhile that until the outbreak of the 
quite open and direct war of the poor against the rich, 
which has become inevitable in England, takes place, 
at least sufficient clearness over the social question will 
have spread among the proletariat ; and that, with the 
help of coming events, the communist party will be in 
a position to overcome in time the brutal elements of 
the Eevolution, and to yield to a Ninth Thermidor." 
(9th Thermidor was the day on which Eobespierre 
was overthrown, and the Paris Eegiment of Terror 
collapsed.) Such a similar collapse Engels wished to 
prevent; and for this purpose he uj^ed that all the 



180 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

communists should set to work, by eliminating frona 
the proletarian class-struggle its coarseness and 
brutality against the bourgeois, and by placing in the 
forefront the general interests of humanity. It is 
obvious that Engels understood communism M" aii 
utterly different sense from the Bolsheviks of the 
present day. What Engels wanted, those Eussian 
Socialists who are in opposition to the Bolsheviks are 
now fighting for. Bolshevism triumphed over its 
social opponents, by making the ferocity and brutality 
of the coming labour agitation " the motive force of 
the Eevolutioo." This Bolshevism did, by degrading 
the social movement, by turning the cause of 
humanity into a mere cause of the working-men, and 
by announcing that to the wage earners alone belonged 
power (alongside of the poorest peasajits in the coun- 
try) ; further, by condemning all men to be deprived of 
their rights, if they did not blow the same trumpet as 
they did, and reducing them to the deepest misery; and 
further, by abolishing the different classes and virtually 
creating a new class of helots out of the existing 
bourgeois. H«nce, by transforming what should have 
been the social struggle for liberty, and for the raising 
of the whole of humanity on a higher plane, into an 
outbreak of bitterness and revenge, which led to the 
worst abuses and tortures, Bolshevism has demoralised 
the proletariat, instead of raising it to a higher level of 
morale. It has further increased the demoralisation, 
by separating the " expropriating of the expropriators " 
from the intimate connection with the creation of a 
new social organisation, with which alone it can form 
a social element. This procedure soon extended in 
application from the means of production to the means 
of consumption. Prom this it was an easy step to 
brigandage, such as has been idealised in Stenka Eazin. 
"-*' The masses had without any difficulty understood 
the negative programme of Bolshevism, which was that 
one need not fight. It did not recognise any more 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 181 

obligations. One had only to take, to seize, and to 
appropriate what one could get ; or as Lenin so wonder- 
fully puts it, one should steal what has been stolen." 
(D. Gavronski, " The Balance of Eussian Bol- 
shevism," Berlin, 1919, page 39.) 

It is in keeping with this conception that the robber 
captain has already received his memorial in the Soviet 
Eepublic. In this manner Bolshevism " supported " 
and preached the new communist morale, without 
which socialistic construction is impossible. It meeint 
nothing other than the increasing demoralisation of 
fiurther sections of the Eussian proletariat. This was 
a feature over which the idealists among the Bolsheviks 
themselves were horrified; but they could only see the 
appearance without recognising its cause, for that 
would have meant upsetting their whole system of 
government. In desperation they looked roimd for a 
means that should give the communist morale to the 
masses. They could discover nothing, these Marxists,, 
these bold revolutionaries and innovators, except the 
miserable expedient with which the old society 
endeavoured to absolve itself from the results of its 
own sins, namely, the tribunal, prison and execution, 
in other words. Terrorism. Lenin writes in his book 
(already several times quoted) on the ' ' Immediate 
work of the Soviet Eepublio " (page 47) t 

" The tribunal is the instrument in education to 
discipline. There is not enough recognition of the 
very simple and obvious fact that, if all the misery 
that has befallen Eussia, hunger, and unemployment 
have made their appearance, this misfortune cannot 
be overcome by mere force and energy, but by a 
general all-embracing organisation and discipline; that. 
everyone, therefore, is responsible for misery, hunger,, 
and unemployment who overrides the discipline desnr 
mined by labour in any particular business concerned 
or in any particular affair; and that it is one's duty to 



182 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

find the culprits, bring them before the tribunal, and 
punish them mercilessly." 

Thus, with mercilesis punishment, the Eussian 
proletariat is to have pummelled into it the communisit 
morale it lacks, in order to make it ripe for Socialism. 
But never w,as morale raised by merciless pimishment. 
On the contrary, all that remained of it has always 
gone imder. Merciless pimishment was a necessary 
evil of the old order of things, when people did not 
know how to act differently, since the way towards a 
better morale and a better condition of life was barred 
to them. A Socialist regime, which could find no other 
way to awaken the proletariat to a higher morale than 
by means of merciless court proceedings proves its own 
state of bankruptcy. 



The Dictatorship. 

It seems as if Lenin himself does not expect any 
particular incentive to morale from his own tribimals ; 
for immediately after his demand for such tribunals 
he makes another claim for ' ' dictatorial and unlimited 
powers for the individual leaders of all concerns " 
(page 49). " Every great industry, which represents 
the origin and foundation of Socialism, demands the 
unconditional and the strictest unity of purpose. How 
can the strictest imity of will and purpose be assured ? 
By the subordination of the will of thousanda to the 
will of an individual. This subordination, which 
embodies an ideal understanding and sense of 
discipline on the part of those occupied in combined 
labour, bears some resemblance to the subtle direction 
of an orchestra conductor. It can claim dictatorial 
powers in their severest form, if no ideal sense of 
discijpHne and understanding exists" (page 51). 

Hitherto we have always assumed that understand- 
ing and discipline on the part of the working-classes 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 183 

were to be the necessary conditions for the develop- 
ment and growth of the proletariat, without which real 
Socialism could not be possible. Lenin himself says 
at the beginning of this book from which we have just 
quoted : 

' ' Such revolution can only be realised with success, 
if it has the co-operation of the majority of the popula- 
tion, especially of the majority of the working- 
classes." After he has shown that Socialism cannot 
be the work of a minority, nor even of the majority of 
the population, but only "■especially" and not 
exclusively of the working-classes; and after h© has, 
by these admissions, justified democracy against his 
own will, he continues: — " Only when the proletariat 
and the poorest sections of the peasantry have acquired 
for themselves sufficient self -consciousness, strength of 
ideas, self-sacrifice and determination, can the triumph 
•of the Socialist Kevolution be assured." Neventhe- 
less, its triumph is to be assiu-ed, it would seem, 
through the dictatorship of the tribunals and of the 
heads of factories. 

' ' The Eevolution has just destroyed the oldest, the 
strongest, and the heaviest chains, by which the 
masses were held in bandage under threat of the knout. 
Such was true of yesterday. To-day, however, this 
same revolution indeed in the interests of Socialism 
(page 62), demands the absolute subordination of the 
masses to the single will of the leaders of labour." 
/"The freedom which they gained yesterday for them- 
selves is to-day to be taken from t!hem, since the 
masses apparently have not acquired sufficient " self- 
consciousness, strength of ideas, self-sacrifice and 
determination." But on page 7 the impracticability 
of Socialism as the result of the lack of these qualities 
has been shown, whereas on page 52, in the interests 
of Socialism, "the absolute subordination" of the 
[immature masses to dictatorial leaders is demanded. 
vBy this means their position will sink Below the level 



184 TEREOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

of that which they had on the old capitalist system. 
For in that system they were subordinated to capital, 
but, nevertheless, not absolutely subordinate. Lenin 
•certainly 'comforts himself and the public by asserting 
that, in distinction from the old capitalist system of 
management, this dictatorship will become possible as 
the result of the co-operation of the masses of the 
workers, and of those who were formerly exploited; 
and, further, through the organisations, which will be 
«o constructed that through them the masses will be 
roused, and will, by their, active efforts, ultimately 
achieve something of historical importance. .The 
■Soviet organisations belong to this kind of organisation 
(page 61). In what way the exclusion and suppres- 
sion of any kind of criticism is to help forward 
1;he awakening of the masses and their encourage- 
ment to creative activity has already been shown. 
The Soviet organisation alters nothing in this 
respect. How can this iron form of dictatorship 
of individuals, " with the absolute subordination of the 
masses," be realised through the organisation of 
the masses into individual activity? Whoever is to 
be elected by the masses or deposed by them, or who- 
ever is to be re-elected will always remain dependent 
on them, for he cannot caxry anything through which 
does not meet with their approval. He can certainly 
attempt to break the obstinacy of individual members 
of the organisation which elects him, if they should be 
in opposition to the majority; but he would very soon 
be at the end of his tether if he should wish to impose 
on the majority, against their will, his own ideas and 
•orders. For this reason a personal dictatorship and 
democracy are incompatible. Such is also true for the 
Soviet democracy. Lenin does indeed declare that 
these remarks are liable to criticism, but vehemence 
is substituted for strength in his arguments, for he 
can give no other answer than: — 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 185 

" If we are not anarchists we accept the fact that 
the State as such is necessary, that is, we accept the 
need for compulsion in the period of transition from 
Capitalism to Socialism " (page 50). 

With this we are in complete agreement. Even 
democracy itself does not exclude a certain kind of 
compulsion; but the only kind of compulsion it 
concedes is that of the majority over the minority. The 
apulSieJinecessary for the transition from Capital- 
ism to SocieSism is the compulsion of the majority of 
V the w orkers over the minority of the capitalists ; but 
this is not the case in the second stage of the Eevolu- 
tion, of which Lenin himself speaks, and in which the 
proletariat has already broken its chains. Here it is 
a question of the compulsion exercised by single 
individuals over the masses of the workers. That this^ 
form of compulsion is incompatible with democracy 
Lenin does not attempt to show. He seeks rather to- 
make it compatible, by a sort of conjuror's trick, by 
attempting to show that, since compulsion must be- 
exercised by the great masses upon individual 
capitalists in order to bring about Socialism, and since 
such Socialism is perfectly well compatible withi 
democracy, every form of compulsion which might, 
be applied with a view to introducing Socialism, 
is compatible with democracy, even if it should repre- 
sent the absolute power of single individuals over the: 
masses. He says : — 

" Hence there is no fundamental opposition between 
the Soviet (i.e., Socialist) democracy and the 
delegation of the dictatorial powers to certain 
individuals. 

That may be ; but it would only show that the Soviet 
democracy is a very peculiar structure, which one could 
employ to uphold any form of arbitary domination, 
provided one merely gave it the name of Socialism. It 
an absolute subordination of the workers in a business 
concern to their chief is to be brought about, he ought 



186 TBEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

not to be elected by them, but should be put in com- 
mand by some power superior to them. In such a case 
the business council in the concern should have nothing 
to say. Moreover, the Central Executive Committee, 
which appoints these dictators, would itself have 
acquired dictatorial power; and so the Soviets would 
be reduced to mere shadows, and the masses 
represented by them would lose all real power. 
A working-class which lacked " self -consciousness, 
strength of ideas, self-saxjrifice and determinaition " is 
incapable itself of choosing its own dictator, through 
whom it is to be raised to a higher level, and to 
whom it must bend its will, if he should demand of 
them deeds which required " self -consciousness, 
strength of ideas, self-sacrifice and determination." It 
is as far from doing this as was Munchausen of 
extricating himself from the bog by means of his own 
hair. And where are these dictators with the neces- 
sary moral force, as well as the intellectual qualities 
and superiority, to be found? Every form of arbitrary 
rule carries with it the seed of corruption of the 
authority itself, be this a single individual or a small 
coterie. Only exceptionai characters can remain 
exempt from pernicious consequences. Are we to 
assume that the Eussian dictators are through and 
through all characters like this? Lenin promises that 
they are to be very carefully sifted. 

" We wish to pursue our path by seeking, with all 
caution and patience, to examine the right organisa- 
tions, and to take accoimt of the men with clear 
intelligence and practical sense — men who combine 
enthusiasm for Socialism with the gift of being able, 
without imdue bluster (and iminfluenced by the noise 
and bewilderment) to hold together a large nimiber 
c(f men, and make them combine in determined, 
unified, and concerted labour within the framework of 
the Soviet organisations. Only such men, after the 
tenfold examination through which they go by passing 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 187 

from the most simple to the most difficult tasks, are 
to be placed in respcnsible positions as heads of 
administration. We have not yet learned to do this. 
We shaU learn" (pages 41 and 42). 

He does not say who is to be imderstood under this 
" we." Obviously not the ignorant, undisciplined, 
bewildered masses; more likely the higher authority, 
the Central Executive Committee. But even this body 
has not yet learnt the art of selecting aright leaders of 
massed labour. It promises to leam this difficult art. 
No time limit is given. Only this is certain, that at 
the present moment the selection of these leaders is 
proceeding in a highly unsatisfactory manner. The 
necessary capacity of the men at the head is lacking, 
just as much as the necessary maturity of the masses. 

After they have been expropriating and are now 
proceeding to organisation, they find that they have 
first to set about learning — even learning how to choose 
aright the higher administrators of State economy. 



Corruption. 

And what elements are insinuating themselves into 
the new regime 1 "No single profound and powerful 
mass movement has ever taken place in history with- 
out dubious means, without adventurers and swindlers 
who bleed inexperienced novices, without boasters and 
mob orators, without senseless vacillation and 
stupidity, without needless fuss, without attempts on 
the part of the individual leaders to attempt twenty 
different things without puj-suing one to its end " 
(Lenin, "The immediate work, etc.," page 40). 

There is no doubt that every great mass movement 
has 'to suffer from such pernicious influences. We in 
Germany have also been made to feel this ; but the 
Eussian Soviet tegime has given proof besides of 



188 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

certain characteristics peculiar to it. In the first 
place, the noTices were never so " inexperienced" as 
they are in Eussia. That was inevitable. Under the 
absolutist regime all the elements who were striving 
upwards were denied all chance of insight, and still 
more all chance of participation in the administration 
of the State and of the community, as well as in all 
forms of higher organisation and administrative 
activity. 

The interest of the revolutionaries, particularly of 
the most impatient and most violent elements among 
them, was concentrated on the struggle against the 
police and secret conspiracy. One has no right to 
reproach them for their inexperience, when they sud- 
denly catne to powet. But this inexperience repre- 
sents an important feature, which proves how unripe 
Eussia was for Socialism at the time of the outbreak of 
the Eevolution. Socialism can still less be carried out 
by ignorant and undisciplined masses, the more 
inexperienced the novices are who have to show the 
way. It is a further proof that the schooling and 
education of the masses, as well as of their leaders, in 
democracy is a necessary condition of Socialism. It 
is impossible in one bound to leap from Absolutism into 
a Socialist society. Again, the difference between the 
Soviet regime and the earlier great massed movements 
is shown in the fact that the Soviet has abolished the 
best means for exposing the adventurers, the 
swindlers, the boasters and the brawlers, namely, the 
freedom of the Press. These undesirable elements 
were thus exempt from all criticism by people who had 
expert knowledge. They had to do only with ignorant 
workmen and soldiers, as well as with inexperienced 
innovators, and they flourished exceedingly; Certainly 
the leaders of the Bolsheviks have undertaken to learn 
how to separate the wheat from the chaff, and to dis- 
tinguish the true Socialists from the swindlers and the 
rogues. But long before this has been " learnt " pro- 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 189 

duction has failed, as the result of the backward state 
of the Eussian working-classes, and even threatens to 
come to a complete standstill. Their only hope of 
arresting this catastrophe lies in a dictatorship of the 
leaders, but they must give these leaders dictatorship, 
without being in the position to make adequate choice. 
Hence this kind of dictatorship, which from the outset is 
open to much criticism, can only work to disadvantage. 
Just as they first of all indulged in expropriation, and 
only then began to organise; so now they appoint 
dictators, and only afterwards attempt to learn the 
method of choosing them rightly. Such absurdities 
were inevitable as soon as they began to introduce 
Socialism arbitrarily, and without any relation to 
actual conditions. But the Soviet regime is not only 
endangered through the incursion of ' ' adventurers and 
swindlers," whom it cannot judge and examine 
accurately. It suffers from a danger, which is no less 
serious, from the fact that it alienates those members 
who have the highest character and who, intellectually, 
are among the most prominent. Without the colla- 
boration of the educated and intellectual elements, 
Socialism at the present stage of production is 
impossible: So long as Socialism was in the stage of 
propaganda, so long as it was merely a question of 
bringing the proletariat to a consciousness of its place 
in society and of its tasks and obligations for the 
future arising therefrom, Socialism had need of 
the educated elements — whether these were men of 
universal education, drawn from among the middle 
classes, or self-educated men, who had sprung from 
the proletariat. But it needed them only for the carry- 
ing out and popularising of its theories. Here it was 
not a question of quantity, but solely of quality. 

But it is quite different at the present time, when 
we are in the period in which Socialism in a practical 
form is to be introduced. Just as a capitaHst system 
of production and the capitalist state could not exist 



190 TEREOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

without the help of numerous rehable and scientific 
men, social production and the State system, which is 
dominated by the working classes, requires such help 
equally urgently. Without such assistance, or in 
opposition to it, no Socialism is possible. For practical 
participation in the establishment of Socialism, as well 
as in the development and propagation of Socialist 
theories, a passionate devotion to the great cause oi the 
emancipation of the human race is not essential. What 
is most necessary is, that a large section of them at least 
should be convinced of the possibility and advantage of 
Socialist production, so that no sacrifice of intelligence 
is necessary if one wishes to co-operate. If in the 
matter of manual labour an improved production, is 
impossible with any kind of compulsory labour, this is 
all the more the case in fhe sphere of intellectual work. 

The removal of doubt on the part of the educated as 
to the practical introduction of Socialism, and the will- 
ingness of such elements to co-operate in its construc- 
tion and development, as soon as the necessary power 
arises, belong to the necessary conditions of Socialist 
production, to the conditions to which society will have 
progressed, if it is to be ripe for Socialism. The 
importance of these conditions will be all the more 
obvious the more other necessary con'ditions of 
Socialism are to hand; so that a recognition of the 
practicability of Socialism will lead the unbiassed 
educated classes to a conviction of its sound reason- 
ableness. 

This importance of the educated classes the Bol- 
sheviks did not recognise at first. For since at the 
beginning they merely served to increase the blind 
passion of the soldiers, the peasants and the town 
labourers, the masses of the educated were from the 
very beginning hostile to the Bolsheviks, and even tEe 
Socialists among them; because they recognised that 
Eussia was not yet ripe for the kind of immediate 
socialisation which the Bolsheviks had undertaken. 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 191 

Tliey did not trouble to think about the treatment 
tvhioh was meted out to the " iatelligentsia. " A man of 
this class, for instance, would be expelled from the 
factory which the workers alone wished to manage. He 
was. deprived of all political rights, since the authority 
of the Workmen's Council granted to manual labourers 
alone the right to vote. He was expropriated, so far 
as he had any possessions, and was deprived of every 
means of living his refined form of life. He was even 
condemned later on to compulsory labour and to death 
by starvation. 

The Bolsheviks thought at first to get along without 
the " intelligentsia," without the experts. Tsarism 
was of the opinion that a general was capable of filling 
any and every position in the State without any special 
qualification or education. The Soviet Eepublio took 
over from Tsarism, along with many other ideas, this 
one also; only in the place of the general they put the 
proletariat. The theoreticians among the Bolsheviks 
called this procedure " the development of Socialism 
from science to action." One could better describe 
it as " the development of Socialism from science to 
dilettantism." 

As is generally the case with the Soviet Eepublic, 
it allows itself to be guided by mere instinct, and not 
by real insight into the actual circumstances. Thus 
it happened that they discovered, after the child had 
fallen into the well, what was necessary, and so they 
tried to cover up the well. They sought to attract 
the educated to work apart from any compulsory 
laboiu-, as had been the case some time before, and, 
indeed, to do work for which they were suited, and, 
which they understood. Whereupon the educated classes 
who entered the service of the Govenjment ceased to 
count as bourgeois, to be treated and ill-treated as 
such. They rose in the circle of the " active and 
working" population by performing "productive" 
and " useful " labour. They were protected from 



192 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

expropriation and received adequate salary. Since it 
was not conviction, but only fear of ill-treatment 
that drove most of these educated into the service 
of the Government, naturally enough their work was 
in reality neither very productive nor very useful. 
Trotsky complains about this, for instance, in his essay 
on " "Work, Discipline, etc.," quoted above ; he says : — 

" The first epoch of the fight against the sabotage 
(of the intellectuals) consisted in mercilessly destroying 
the organisations of the saboteurs. That was 
necessary, and therefore right. Now in the period 
where the power of the Soviets has become assured, 
this struggle against the saboteurs must take the form 
of transforming the saboteurs of yesterday into 
servants, into administrators, and technical managers, 
wherever the new regime demands it." 

Trotsky, therefore, implies that the "necessary and 
therefore right ' ' way to make these intellectuals 
servants and leaders of socialisation is, first of all, 
mercilessly to trample them under "foot. The result of 
this he himself gives us: — 

" "We have destroyed the old forms of sabotage, 
and swept away the old officials with an iron broom. 
The substitutes for these old officials proved themselves 
to be by no means first-class material in any branch 
whatsoever of administration. On the one hand, the 
posts that have become vacant were filled by com- 
rades of each party, who had done all the " spade 
work," a,nd who had been schooled in the revolution. 
They formed the best elements, the fighters, the 
honourable men, the men who were not self-seekers. 
On the other hand, there appeared on the scene 
fortune -seekers, social failures who under the old 
regime had been, so to speak, without occupation. 
When, therefore, it was necessary to get tens of 
thousands of new qualified labour at one stroke, it is 
not to be wondered at if many intruders succeeded in 
penetrating into the new regime. We must also 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 193 

admit that many of the Socialist comrades, who are 
now at work in different offices and institutions, have 
by no means shown themselves to be always capable 
of organising creative and energetic labour. We can 
follow the movements of such comrades in the minis- 
terial offices, especially of those in the ranks of the 
October Bolsheviks, who work four or five hours a 
day, and not very intensively at that; whereas our 
whole position now demands the most strenuous labour, 
not out of fear, but from a sense of duty." 

That was the necessary, though by no means the 
right consequence of a policy which sought to win the 
educated classes, not through conviction, but merely 
through kicks from behind as well as from the front. 

Another means was devised to increase the supply 
of active labour. The Paris Commune of 1871 reduced 
the pay of State officials, and decided on the sum of 
6,000 francs as a maximum salary. The Soviet 
Republic endeavoured to do likewise ; but this would not 
work, so fchey had to revert to the old system. Lenin 
remarks in this connection : — 

" We must needs return to the old bourgeois 
methods, and establish very high payment for all 
' service rendered ' by the best of the bourgeois 
experts. It is clear that such a measure is a com- 
promise, and somewhat of a departure from the 
principles of the Paris Commune and of every prole- 
tarian power. . . . It is clear that such a measure 
means not only the standstill — ^in certain departments 
and to a certain degree — of the offensive against 
capital, but also a retrograde step in our socialising 
power as a Soviet." (" The Immediate Work of the 
Soviet Power," page 19.) 

But Lenin implies that it cannot be otherwise, and 
he is perfectly right. The necessity for high salaries 
can arise from two causes. The bigger the concern, 
the greater the number of its workers. So much more 
important under equal circumstances, therefore, is the 



194 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

toass of the gross value which it delivers. If the work- 
man produces value equivalent to five shillings a day, 
the concern with a hundred workmen will produce to 
the value of 500 shillings a day, and one with a 
thousand workmen will produce 5,000 shillings a day. 
The bigger the concern, th© more difficult it is to 
organise and guide it, and all the rarer is the necessary 
efficiency for its organisation. But all the greater 
will be the means which the owner or owners of th« 
concern will have at their disposal, in order to engage 
the services of such select equipment. In proportion, 
therefore, as these large industries increase, the 
salaries of their heads increase also, and finally reach 
vast dimensions. With this circumstance the State 
administration has to reckon. If it does not raise pro- 
portionately the salaries of its higher officials, it 
must be prepared to find that private industry will 
attract them away — so far as they are at all capable, 
and not mere holders of sinecures. In this way the 
State administration becomesi impoverished, and that 
is one of the reaisons why State economy is unable to 
cope with competition of private enterprise. 

It is questionable whether the Commune, once it had 
become established, and whether industry on a large 
scale, once it had been developed on capitalistic lines 
imder the Commune, instead of becoming socialised, 
which was possible, could have maintained this system 
of fixed salaries at 6,000 frs. The decree issued on April 
2nd shows the small bourgeois character of the Paris 
industry at that tiikne. Moreover it proves the disin- 
terestedness of the members of the Commune. We 
have already referred to the well-known example of 
the Financial Minister, Jourde. Competition, how- 
ever, arising from a flourishing and powerfiil private 
industry in Soviet Eussia makes it impossible to force 
up the wages of the most skilled " specialists "; for 
either such an industry is expropriated and ruined, or it 
soon deprives the private owner of all value. High 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 19^' 

wages can have only one object. They axe calculated to 
overcome the objection to serve the Soviet Eepublic, 
which objection the most capable among the educated 
secretly cherish in their hearts, and also to awaken 
their interest for the new regime. 

Since the way of conviction does not work, and since 
the lash of hunger does not obtain any startling results, 
there remains but one way open to buy the people, and 
that is, to provide for them at least such conditions as 
they had under the capitalist system. We now see 
what are the elements which are to become leaders of 
Socialist production in the Soviet Eepublic. On the 
one side a few old conspirators, honourable fighters of 
blameless intentions, yet in matters of business merely 
inexperienced novices ; and on the other side, numerous 
educated men who, against their own convictions, 
either as mere seekers try to adapt themselves to the 
new power, as they would adapt themselves to any 
other power, if occasion arose; or who are driven 
through fear and hunger and punishment; or, finally, 
such men as allowed themselves to be bought by 
high wages. They are, as Trotsky admits, by no 
means first-class elements. Moreover, in so far as 
they know anything at all, they do not belong to the 
best, the worthiest of their kind. People among them, 
who at the same time possessed strong character as 
well as business knowledge, were as rare as white 
crows. In the hands of such elements dictatorial 
power has now been placed in order to save Socialism ; 
a power which the workers have to accept without 
opposition. Such power tends to corrupt even the 
best. In this respect it is often entrusted to people 
who are corrupt from the very start. 

In the midst of the general misery and the general 
expropriation they gather together in their hands the 
beginnings of a new capitalism. Of course the pro- 
duction of commodities proceeds, and must proceed; 
since agricultural activity, regarded as private enter- 



196 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

prise, as a matter of fact represents the produotion 
of commodities, and influences life as a whole. For 
this reason the peasant community has less and leas of 
surplus stocks to sell.. The Soviet Eepublic grants 
full power in a village to the poor peasants, who 
possess so little land that they can produce no surplus 
in foodstuffs. Prom the well-to-do peassints all surplus 
commodities are to be taken without any compensa- 
tion, and placed at the service of the State granaries. 
This practice, in so far as it is ever carried out, can take 
place only once, for, in the following year, the well-to- 
do peasant will take very good care that he does not 
produce more than he himself needs. In this way the 
returns of agirculture will be limited. Whatever of 
surplus stock the peasant produces, in spite of this, he 
conceals, and merely sells it secretly to the profiteers. 

At the same time industry comes to a standstill. As 
a consequence, the State expenditure can only be 
covered by a new paper money. Hence, as at the time 
of the French Eevolution, and as again at the 'present 
day, although in a less degree in Germany, there 
flourish speculators, profiteers, and smugglers. For- 
merly they were guillotined. Nowadays it is the 
fashion to shoot them. But the failure is the same. 
The only * result is that, at the present day, just 
as much as in 1793, the uncertain nature of the capital 
thus acquired by swindlers increases, as well as the 
amount of the bribes that the new dictators demand, 
and which they get if, by chance, an incautious person 
should fall into their net. Even that in its turn 
becomes a fresh basis for the collecting together of new 
property. 

Whoever is anxious for further information over this 
bribery system of the new Eussian bureaucracy should 
turn to Gavronsky's " Balance of the Eussian Eevolu- 
tion," which, from page 58 and several pages onwards, 
is full of accounts of bribery and corruption. 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 197 

How shall one get the better of these new " dic- 
tators," before whom the working masses are to bow 
without opposition? As in its attempts to " moralise " 
the masses, the Soviet Government knows no better 
means of " moralising " its leaders than by the threat 
of tribunals. If the dictatorship of the proletariat 
is to be over-ridden by tihe dictatorship of its organisers, 
these in their turn will be over-ruled by the dictator- 
ship of the tribunals. 

A network of revolutionary tribunals and extra- 
ordinary commissions has been formed ' ' to oppose the 
couoter-revolution, speculation, and abuse." They have 
the arbitrary power to condemn anyone who shall be 
denounced to them, and at their discrimination to 
shoot those of whom they do not approve; that is to 
say, all those speculators and profiteers whom they 
catch, as well as their accomplices among the Soviet 
officials. They do not stop merely at that, but 
involve every honourable man who dares to criticise 
their fearful misrule. Under the collective name of 
' ' counter-revolution ' ' every form of opposition is 
included, in whatever circles it arises and from what- 
ever motives it springs, whatever the means employed 
and whatever the ends aimed for. But unfortunately 
this summary procedure has no result. 

As often as not the sincere fighters among the 
Bolsheviks become indignant, when they realise that 
these extraordinary commissions, which are the last 
hope for the cleansing of the Eevolution, are them- 
selves likewise corrupt. Gawronsky quotes (page 61) 
the following heart-cry of the weekly journal of the 
special commission: — 

' ' From all sides there reach us news that not 
only worthless elements, but direct criminals, are 
endeavouring to slip into the commissions, and 
especially into commissions in the various local 
districts." Gawronsky also mentions people (page 62) 
who have shown that this attempt at intrusion is not 



198 TBEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

only made, but very often made with success. So runs 
an article out of " The Will to Labour," the central 
organ of Revolutionary Communism, October 10th, 
1918. 

" Fresh in our memory there are still cases in which 
the local Soviets have been Uterally terrorised by the 
special and extraordinary Soviets. Naturally a local 
selection was made. In the Soviets the better 
elements remained, whereas in the extraordinary com- 
missions were ito be found bands of men who were 
ready for any kind of brigandage. Hence there ia 
nothing left of the programme for the renovation of 
humanity by means of Socialism on Bolshevik 
methods, except two or three sincere strugglers in the 
midst of an ever growing morass of ignorance, 
corruption, and desperation, which extends further 
and further, and finally threatens to engulf and drown 
them." 

The Change m Bolshevism. 

'^ Many revolutionaries of the West point triumphantly 
to the fact that Bolshevism is still in power, and 
apparently, even at the time when these lines are 
being written (May, 1919), is_ still outwardly intact; 
yet the critics of Bolshevism at the very begin- 
ning of its rule prophesied a speedy, collapse. This 
collapse would have actually taken place long ago, if 
-the Bolsheviks had been true to their programme. 
They have merely kept themselves going by discarding 
one after another some part of their programme, so 
^hat finally they have achieved the very contrary to 
that which they set out to obtain. For insta nce, in 
Q^der^ to come into power they threw overboard, al l 
the^ d emocratic p rinciTale i^ In order tn Vepp them- 
RelvesTnpowfir^^ffi^vjTg^vp. ba.rl to Ip.t thp.ir Rfv».i'g.Hat, 
pmci£E3"g5Th6 way_of the democratic. Tifij^Juwe 
inainte.lneaT>hemselves as individuals; but- they have 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 199 

Bao rifioed their principles, and have proved themselvea 

to Be thn m^ighgoing AppoTH-,nnig.t.a 

Bolshevism has, up to the present, itriumphed in 
Eussia, but SociaUsm has already suffered a defeat. 
We have only to look at the form of society which has 
developed under the Bolshevik regime, and which was 
bound so to develop, as soon as the Bolshevik method 
was applied. 

Let us now briefly recapitulate what has been the 
development. We find in present-day Bolshevik 
Eussia a peasantrv established on the basis "S E^ 
TiTTJiwIfpfl'^irivgtp pr^p^^ty M"d ^f ^'"M°qti IlCS^lHJlxJ^^ 
production. Theaa. feasants livq their own Jives, jgith- '^ 
out ''a jiy^"''ggTiin, fiRan ciation with town industrie s. 
Since these industries cannot produce any surplus 
goods for the uncultivated land, the voluntary and 
perfectly legal transport of agricultural products into 
the towns becomes more and more handicapped. In 
compensation for this, recourse has been made to 
requisition, to plundering without payment, on the 
one hand ; and on the other, to illegal smuggling, which 
succeeds in depleting the towns of the last remnants of 
industrial products, which have been accumulating for 
some time past. 

After the destruction of the large estates Bolshevism 
had nothing more to offer the peasants. Ig dqed, the 
peasants' love for the Bolshe vik was soon changed to 
Ltiked f ur bh e- Luwn wu rka^, wno did not work "and. 

wEo"~COuld not deliver goods for agricultural p ^^ y . 

poses; to _hatred also again Rt. t.Vip. niHrifr powers, who 
~Bent soldiers int o tneviiiagesin order to commandeer 

the commodities'; to ccmtempt, moreover^fortEe town 
'~'poffgg Brs -aJid ""§ST uggl ers,' -c y liTrRfteirTo foTsl'Irm'gi' e 
~ peasauLa, by a ll soFE s of deceptive mean s of exchange , 
.JE grjttrp]xrrgt ^^g3S£3s^yaadr~~ 

t^eaifleaTEis" purely bour geois s tate of affairs in the 
country, the re has arisen in the town s a foim jof^ 
"Society which ""insists on bemg "Tocialistio ; only" it 



200 TEEEOEISM AKD COMMUNISM 

endeavoured to abolish class differences. It began 
by humiliating and destroying the upper classes, and 
hence it really threatens to end in a new kind of class- 
society. It comprises in fact three classes. Th e 
lowest cons!B^"oF^he former bourgeois, capitalists, th e 

"s mall middle class, and the so-called intellectuals,"~in 
BO far as t .hey show any opposition. Deprived of all 
political rights, and robbed of all means of subsistence, 
they are from time to time forced to do compulsory 
labour of the most objectionable kind, for which in 
return they receive rations in food, which barely repre- 
senL the most wretched form of hunger rations, or, 
more truly said, starvation rations. The infernal 
state of such slavery can only be compared with the 
most horrible excesses that capitalism has ever 
shown. The creation of this state of affairs is the 
original and most characteristic act of the Bolsheviks. 
It represents their first step towards the emancipation 
of the human race. 

Above t his lowest c lassjthere stan ds the middle dag s. 
represen T.iTifr f.ha paid wn'rlrfiEg.'^T Eis class has politi cal 
"piMvijfigp.s. It alone, according to tie actual words 
of the constitution, has a right to vote in the town; 
it has, moreover, complete freedom in regard to the 
Press, and the right of forming its members into 
associated bodies. ^£h e members of this class are 
allowe d to c hoose their own occ upatloBB, aild are 
Buffidently weir paid for tiie work which they them - 
86lves-oEa 3ae7~ Or rather such was tne case : for it soon 
■became more and more obvious that, as a result 
of i3i6 low level of the great mass of the workers in 
Eussia, industry threatened more and more, in con- 
sequence of these anrangements, to cease functioning 
altogether. In ordpr tn ^ f ^ve industry , therefore, a 
new class of r.ffipia.lci /harj tn . hft-jforrnftiT" aTrff~pi1T"iTi 
authority oveulib&JS gorkers. This new nlaaH prrai ^naJl y 

"appropriated to itap.l f flT] a^.tna.! andlTTriTial p.nTitm1~ aTid 
transformed 'fKe" fr«edom of tho workers into a mere 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 201 

j Musory freedom . Naturally all this did not happen 
without opposition on the part of the workers them- 
selves; and this opposition became all the stronger, 
since, in consequence of the general decaj, both in 
industry as well as in the means of transport and on 
account of the increasing isolation of the open land 
from the to'vvns, the food problem became more and 
more hopeless, even for the workmen, in spite of their 
increased wages. So enthusiasm for the Bolsheviks 
disappeared from one set of workers after the other. 
But the opposition that these latter could offer re- 
mained unorganised, dissipated, and could form no comr 
pact phalanx in opposition to the more highly organised 
bureaucracy. They could not compete with them. 

Out of the abs olute authority o f the Workmen's 
C bunoii there clev"e1;np^ the a b solute authority of a 
new class of govemorsTwhioh was formed, in p"ar t,__;^ 
jepfessatatives who were fnrmer 'j in fh-^ WfyrKn^LTa' 
^QungHrptir'DXOli'Ttf'TIIgHrwEo were appointe 
and alscTin p aft'orroemBei's"^ "oi bureau - 

~cracy, wmcn was t arust upon tkem. This new class 
__Gfgdv6Mors \vas iOTme.djffli|lg£jthe_Je'a3ership of the 
old Uomrnuhisi' Idealists and fighters' ' "'""""— """"""""^^ 
■ The a bsolutis m of th e^id bureaucracy has come again 
to l ite m a new but, as "we ha sfi-saea^-W-Bo mgang: 
ifnproved lorm; and also alo ngside of this absolutisriL 
"^•yB^fig'^oimTeythiB 'see3ntf"a new ca pitalism.. whi tA- 
is reflpotisTble "fOT^flireog^Mimal practiceei, and which 
-g ~T'gallty~~Sl^dg"bn a 1mucE~lowiel^ Iever'lE'^'W 
1nc[iistrial capitalism of former da_Y-3. "^'"Tffr'is'-Tiri'r'tfae'~^ 
ancient feudal land estate which exists no more. 
For its abolition conditions in Kussia were ripe. 
But they were not ripe for the abolition of 
capitalism. This latter system is now undergoing 
resuscitation, nevertheless in forms which, for the 
proletariat, are more oppressing and more harmful 
than those of yore. Private capitalism has now taken 
on, in place of the higher industrial forms, the most 



202 TBEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

wretched and corrupt form of emuggling, of 
profiteering, and of money speculation. ,^iusiaaal 
capitalism, from being a private Hystj^m, han nniW 
become a atat-e c apitalism . Formerly the bureaucratfi 
of the Btate and those~of private capital were often 
very critical, if not directly hostile, towards one 
another. In consequence the working-man found 
advantage sometimes with the one, and sometimes 
with the other. To-day, howe ver, both State and 
caj)italigti_.bureau cracy have me^ed mto one system . 
That is the final result of the great Socialist upheaval, 
which the Bolsheviks have introduced. It represents 
the most oppressive of all forms of despotism that 
Eussia has ever had. The substitution of democracy 
by the arbitrary rule of the Workmen's Council, which 
was to serve for the " expropriation of the 
expropriators, ' ' has now given place to the arbitrary 
rule of a new form of |3iireaucracy. Thus it has been 
mad© possible for this latter to render democracy for 
the workmen a complete dead letter; since the working- 
class community has, at the same time, been driven 
into greater economic dependence than it ever had to 
endure before. 

Moreover, this loss of liberty is not compensated for 
by increase of prosperity. Certainly the new economic 
dictatorship functions in a better way than the 
economic anarchy, which preceded this dictatorship, 
and which would have led to a sudden end. This end 
has been merely delayed by the dictatorship; for, 
economically considered, this new bureaucreicy is in- 
capable of functioning. 

How very unsatisfactory the functioning of the new 
organisation has been is proved, among other things, 
by the following outcry of the Commissioner for Trans- 
port, M. Krassin, which he published recently in the 
" Pravda " (Truth). His manifesto ran as follows: 

(1) The existing system of railway administration in 
eombination with the other objective difficulties create^ 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 203 

by the Five Years' War, has brought the transport 
service to complete ruin, which threatens to bring about 
an absolute cessation of all transport whatsoever. 

(2; Its collapse is not attributable merely to faulty 
methods of administration and forms of organisation, 
and not merely to the diminished capacity of the per- 
sonnel, but rather to frequent changes in forms of 
administration and organisation. 

(3) The task which lies before us consists in 
restoring the transport system to such an extent that at 
least the needs and requirements of the hunger-rations 
and of industry may be satisfied. This task can be faced 
only by the most heroic combination and application 
of all the strength the railway system can muster. 

(4) This work must be undertaken immediately and 
not a single hour must be delayed; otherwise we are 
threatened with the destruction of all that has been 
achieved by the Eevolution. 

(5) In place of coUectiv© administration, which 
in reality has been wholly irresponsible, the principles 
of personal administration and of an increased sense of 
responsibility must be established. Everybody from 
the office boy to the member of the Governing Board 
musty carry out, exactly and without any deviation, 
all his full orders. All reforms must be stopped, and, 
wherever it is possible, the old appointments should 
be maintained; and the old technical apparatus, both 
at tbe centre and in all its ramifications, must be 
restored and upheld. 

(6) The introduction of piece-work is essential. 

Of^ g.11 t.hfl Rfvvi<^t Governm ent officials , Kraggin has 
shown most talent for organ ipatinn in a scientific a^d 
reducated man Ti£. r, hrvm rtf pvpfin>,r'"fc The railway 
workers form, as it were, the 61ite of the Eussian work- 
ing-class. Already under Tsarist regime it had 
developed into a good organisation, which always 
showed great intelligence. Yet in spite of all this, such 
are the conditions at the present day! 



204 



TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 



This manifesto shows clearly enough that the con- 
sequences of the war are not alone responsible for this 
necessitous condition, as has often been maintained. 
These consequences of the war have merely aggravated 
the stress. T-hig_th>< jrriT riaturitY of the existing rela- 
iipns which f^^^^^^T^f^ tff 'l 'P F^^''"y nil iih i? i 1 i J' °° been 
~ ' ■■ In order to save the 



ap>viaT7S?r Tiy t.he_ Bevolution . 

BevoIutiQi i_it-^8ee mB tu l ) e --abfliS^ar^iperative to 

discard the re fora aa^-JiQ.-geBtefeHiteB'TM'-FftmtiifiTiH, a^^ 

fo'rgplagg'tEe oldapgaratuaTT -i" "^'ibfr urnrdRi ti> niH^^^'^y 

th^rftevotaLMuIlte^ 

"oj jge' lleyolution. Naturally enough this decree will 

fiucceeTin cEangmig the men who are to carry it out as 

little as any other decrees have succeeded in the past. 

Like the old capitalism, this new " communism" has 
itself produced its own "gravediggers." But the old 
capitalism did not merely produce these gravediggers ; 
it provided these latter with strength and productive 
energy to infuse fresh life into what was already 
moribund. 

Communism, unde r present conditions in Bus sia, 
can""onIviaioMmrto""fhe proauctive for ces tnat itjin ds 
in"MistenpeV""TEg~"^"gfST6^^ not be able t o 

develop s ome "Kcn iftr'Ynii^" of lifp, h \^t, tbp^y totTI" be 



Jorced to^ egin all over ^ga^" yfjth V^arVii ^rian forms of 
l3£ wEiieh are coming into existence . Even provisio n- 
ally such a kind of regime f^m ^ld n.nt jVr^^<^^i"vff by hi^-r"c; 
some powerful p Tcni n ''! of Tinlrnnn tn mpprart it, nnr h 
a g a blindly obedient and diHnip )inflrl nr my. Such the 
Bol sheviks have created- a nd Avpn-irtJJiig-_flR|iPjTBipa!'- 
SOTflffieir princip les had to suffer defeat, in order tha t 
tEey~theiMelv^'s m ignt be saved . They started off 
wTEE'TEe^mlefitlon^of destroying ready-made State 
machinery, with all its military and bureaucratic 
apparatus. After they have settled this, however, they 
find themselves compelled, in the interests of self- 
preservation, to erect anew the self-eame apparatus. 
They came into power as pioneers of the dissolution 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 205 

of the army by means of Soldiers' Councils, which 
were to appoint their own oiScers at will, and which 
should obey those whom it pleased them to obey. 
The Soldiers' Councils, alongside of the "Workmen's 
Councils, formed the Alpha and Omega of Bolshevik 
policy. By this method they were to become possessed 
of all power. But after this was don© things tiunied 
out very differently. As soon as the Bolsheviks met 
with open opposition they needed an army to fight — 
one which would be obedient to every command; not 
an army which was dissolving, or in which the bat- 
talions decided on operations according to their own 
liking. At the beginning, enthusiasm seemed success- 
fully to compensate for sheer blind obedience; but 
what was to be done when the enthusiasm of the 
workers began to dwindle, when volunteers became 
rarer and rarer, and when single divisions of troops 
began to get out of hand? In industry a democratic 
system of management and control requires a certain 
mature development of material, as well as spiritual,, 
conditions. Democracy by its very essence must bfi 
excluded from an araoy tE aT js to be developed up 
4ie-i9^ffedrQKhLiuOffengtEr~^ "'Ihalwai^ Vvas" al<ra!ys~fae 



"^^ ^'QTj9£m oeracy:'°even civirwiir. IT iF'^w^r'OTTKr 
"Sy length of time. The Bolsheviks of necessity were 
responsible for civil war and, as a result also of neces- 
sity, for the abolition of the Soldiers' Councils. The 
Bolshevik dictatorship has reduced these Workmen's 
Councils to mere shadows, by opposing aU sorts of 
difficulties to the new elections, and by excluding 
every possible form of opposition. But it has taken 
from these Soldiers' Councils all their most important 
functions, and even their right of election of their own 
officers. As in former days these latter are new appointed 
by the Government; and since the volunteers are not 
sufficient, they have had recourse to compulsory 
recruiting, as in the times before Bolshevism existed. 
This forms another object of conflict between the 



206 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

population and the Government. Numerous peasant 
revolts have their origin in this, and it also makes 
imperative an increase in the army. Desertions in 
whole numbers belong to the order of the day, and 
they are punished by mass executions. 

The HumaniU of May 29th, 1919, pubKshed a very 
friendly account of Bolshevism, based on the observa- 
tions of an eye-witness who had been in Eussia. The 
article under the title of " Les Principes Oommunistes 
et leur Application " closed with the following words: 
" The Eed Arlny is the work of the Entente. The 
Bolshevik regime has repeatedly proclaimed its anti- 
militarism. The peace-loving people has as much 
horror of war to-day as it had yesterday, and at all 
times in the past. It is making very strong 
opposition to recruiting — in the Eed Army there are as 
many cases of desertion as there were formerly in the 
Tsarist Army. It often happens that a regiment 
does not accomplish what has been prescribed for it, 
because all the men concerned have fled." 

This behavi our on the part_ i^ the Eod Army is a 

^"^^^!litI!!!j^'-'^.^"".^~'^°^°^°^ fij'?tbll''"'''°'" 

for^HjEevik princi ples . Even if we merely confined 
•ourselvesToMcts, without giving them an apologetic 
foundation, it would seem that in military matters 
ihe old Tsarist conditions have returned, only in some 
worse form; for the new form of militarism without 
doubt is developing far greater energy than the old, 
in spite of its procbamation of anti-military discipline. 
Thus the conditions are repeating themselves whidb 
prepared the way, at the time of the great French 
Eevolution, for the transformation of the Eepublic into 
a Napoleonic Empire. But it is certain tiiat Lenin 
is not destined to end as a Eussian Napoleon. The 
Corgican Bonaparte won his way to the hearts of the 
French people, because he led the banners of France 
triumphant throughout the whole of Europe. This 
satisfied some people that it was the principles of the 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 2.07 

Ee volution which were conquering Europe. Others, 
perhaps, were still more satisfied, because the armies 
of Franco were plundering the whole of Europe, and 
their booty was enriching France. But Eussia is at 
present on the defensive. The same difficulties of 
transport, which would cheek an army of invasion, 
prevent Eussia from allowing its own army to press 
triumphantly beyond its own borders. Lenin also 
would very much like to carry the banners of his 
Eevolution triumphantly throughout Europe, but there 
IS no prospect of that. The revolutionary militarism 
of the Bolsheviks will not enrich Eussia. It can only 
become a new source of impoverishment. At the 
present moment Eussian industry, in so far as it has 
been set going again, is working for the army, and not 
for any productive ends. Eussian Communism has, in 
very fact, become in this respect a sort of " barrack 
Socialism." 

The economic, and with it also the moral failure of 
Bolshevik nlethods is inevitable. It can only be 
veiled over if it should end in a military collapse. No 
world revolution, no help from without could hinder 
the economic failure of Bolshevik methods. The task 
of European Socialism, as against Communism, is 
quite different, namely, to take care that the moral 
catastrophe resulting from a particular method of 
Socialism shall not lead to the catastrophe of Socialism 
in general; and, further, to endeavour to make a sharp 
distinction between these methods and the Marxist 
method, and bring this distinction to the knowledge 
of the masses. Any Eadical-SociaHst Press must UI 
understand the interests of social revolution, if it 
really imagines it serves those interests by proclaim- 
ing to the masses the identity of Bolshevism and 
Socialism, making them believe that the present form 
of the Soviet Eepublic, just because it is sailing under 
the flag of the omnipotence of the working-classes and 



•208 TEEEORISM AND COMMUNISM 

of Socialism, is in truth the realisation of Socialism 
itself. 



The Terror. 

The development we have just sketched did not, of 
course, arise in accordance with the intentions of the 
Bolsheviks. On the contrary, it was really something 
quite different from what they wanted, and they sought 
by all means in their power to arrest its develop- 
ment. But in the end they had to resort to the 
same recipe from which the Bolshevik regime from the 
very beginning had worked, i.e., to the arbitrary force 
of a few dictators, whom it was impossible to affect 
by the sUghtest criticism. The Eegiment of Terror 
thus became the inevitable result of Communist 
methods. It is the desperate attempt to avoid the 
consequences of its own methods. 

Among the phenomena for which Bolshevism has 
been responsible. Terrorism, which begins with the 
abolition of every form of freedom of the Press, and 
ends in a system of wholesale execution, is certainly 
the most striking and the most repellant of all. It is 
that which gave rise to the greatest hatred against the 
Bolsheviks. Yet this is really no more than their tragic 
fate, not their fault — ^in so far as it is permissible to 
■speak of fault or blame in so enormous an historical 
upheaval as we fire now experiencing. In any case, 
at bottom any fault or blame can only be a personal 
one. Whoever sets about to discuss a question of 
culpability must set about to examine the defiance of 
certain moral laws on the part of individual persons; 
since the " wiU " taken in its strictest sense can only 
be the will of individual persons. A mass, a class, 
a nation cannot in reality will. It lacks the necessai^ 
"faculties for such. Therefore it cannot sin. A mass 
of people or an organisation can act universally. Never- 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 209 

theless, the motives of each person actively ooncemed 
may be very different. But it is the motives which 
i&vin. the determining factor in the question of appor- 
tioning culpability. 

The motives of the Bolsheviks were certainly of the 
best. Right from the beginning of their supremacy they 
showed themselves to be filled with human ideals, 
which had their origin in the conditions of the pro- 
letariat as a class. Their first decree was concerned 
with the abolition of the death penalty; and yet if 
we would consider the question of their culpability, 
we should find that this came to hght at the very time 
when this decre« was promulgated, namely, vi^hen they 
decided, in order to gain power, to sacrifice the prin- 
ciples of democracy and of historical materialism, for 
which they during many long years had fought with 
unswerving determination. Their culpability comes to 
light at the time when they, like the Bakunists of 
Spain in the year 1873, proclaimed the '"' immediat-e 
and complete emancipation of the working-classes," in 
spite of the backward state of Eussia; and with this 
end in view, since the democracy had not fulfilled their 
expectations, established their own dictatorship in the 
name of " The dictatorship of the proletariat." It is 
here where the culpability can be looked for. From 
the moment they etarted on this path they could not 
avoid terrorism. The idea of a peaceful and yet real 
dictatorship without violence is an illusion. 

The instruments of terrorism were the revolutionary 
tribunals and the extraordinary commissions, about 
which we have already spoken. Both have carried on 
fearful work, quite apart from the so-called military 
punitive expeditions, the victims of which are incal- 
culable. The number of victims of the extraordinary 
commissions will never be easy to ascertain. In -any 
case they number their thousands. The lowest estimate 
puts the number at 6,000; others give the total aa 
double that number, others treble ; and ever and above 



210 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

these are niimberless cases of people who have been 
immured aUve or ill-treated and tortured to death. 

r-~iThose who defend Bolshevism do so by pointing out 
that their opponents, the "White Guards of the Finns* 
the Baltic barons, the counter-revolutionary Tsarist 
generals and admirals have not done any better. But 
is it a justification of theft to show that others steal? 
In any case, these others do not go against their own 

^principles, if th^y deliberately sacrifice human life iri 
order to maintain their power; whereas the Bolsheviks 
most certainly do. For they thus become unfaithful to 
the principles of the sanctity of human life, which they 
themselves openly proclaimed, and by means of which 
they have themselves becom© raised to power and 
justified in their actions. Do we not indeed aU equally 
oppose these barons and generals just because they held 
humaji life so cheap and regarded it- as a mere means 
for their own ends ? It will b© urged, perhaps, that it is 
the object in view that makes the difference ; that the 
higher object in view should sanctify means, which, in 
the case of mere seekers after power, become infamous 
and wicked because of their evil ends. But the end 
^Tfwa Tint jnatify every means, but on lv BiioTr-j^nP'"^?- }J' 
agreement with that means. A . naean s which is in 
opposiS^=tg"1itfg^^ea d canBSt"'Ee~sanctifie3 IE ^th"at find^ . 
xDne should just as little strive to defend one's principles 
by surrendering them, as to defend one's life by 
sacrificing what gives to that life content and purpose. 
Good intentions may excuse those who have recourse to 
wrong means; but these means nevertheless remain 
reprehensible, the more so the greater th© damage that 
may be caused by them. 

But not even the aim of the Bolsheviks is free from 
objection. Its immediate endeavour is to preserve th© 
militarist bureaucratic apparatus of power, which it has 
created; but most certainly this should be done by 
opposition to the corruption that has made itself 
manifest within that apparatus. 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 211 

In the Pravda of April Ist, 1919, Prof. Dukelski 
insisted that Bolshevism and the government institu- 
tions should be cleansed of all the rogues and adven- 
turers who had thrown in their lot with Communism, 
and who were simply exploiting it for their own 
criminal ends. Whereupon Lenin replied : 

" The writer of this letter demands that we should 
cleanse our Party of the adventurers and rogues — a 
perfectly justifiable demand which we ourselves have 
for some time past been making and have carried out. 
The rogues and adventurers we shoot down, and we 
shall continue to shoot them down. Yet, in order to 
carry out more expeditiously and more thoroughly this 
cleansing process, we need the help of sincere and 
unbiassed intelligence. ' ' 

Shooting — ^that is the Alpha and Omega of Com- 
munist government wisdom. Yet does not Lenin 
himself call upon the "intelligentsia" to help him 
in the struggle against the rogues and the adventurers ? 
Certainly he does ; only he withholds from them the 
one and only means that can help, namely, the free- 
dom of the Press. The control exercised by the Press, ' 
in every respect free and unimpeded, alone can keep 
in check those rogues and adventurers who inevitably 
fasten on to any Government which is unlimited in 
its powers and uncontrolled. Indeed, often through 
the very lack of the freedom of the Press these para- 
sites thrive the more. 

Yet the Eussian Press is at the present day entirely 
in the hands of those government institutions in which 
the rogues and adventurers have found their place. 
And what guarantee has Lenin, under the present 
circumstances, that these very rogues and adventurers 
shall not somehow work ■feheir way into the revolu- 
tionary tribunals and the extraordinary commissions, 
and will not cause the sincere and unbiassed " intelli- 
gentsia" to be shot down with their aid? It is just 
iho extraordinary commissions instituted to fight 



212- TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

corruption which have tLie most absolute and supreme 
power. They are entirely free from every form of 
control, i.e., they work for the most part under 
conditions that are actually favourable to corruption. 

The Eevolutionary Tribunal of 1793, even at that 
time, possessed an unheard-of degree of a-rbitrary 
power. The guarantees in favour of the rights of 
those who were indicted were at a minimum. Never- 
theless, the Tribunal at that time did at least function 
in. public, so that a certain control of its activity was 
possible. But the Extraordinary Commissions of the 
Soviet Eepublio deliberate in secret, without any sort of 
guarantee that the accused shall have their due rights. 
For it is not absolutely imperative that the accused 
himself should be heard, let alone his witnesses. A 
mere denunciation, a mere suspicion suffices to remove 
him. 

This evil took on such enormous dimensions that 
it had to be abolished. It was therefore determined 
that these Commissions should no longer proceed to 
execution without examination and judgment. But 
despotism is so much of the very essence of dictator- 
ship that it cannot be abolished without abolishing 
dictatorship as well. ' Hence this particular decree 
becomes itself annulled, by reason of an exception 
which admitg summary execution in the case of 
"obviously counter-revolutionary conspiracy." Thus 
naturally the door is wide open for every kind of 
arbitrary execution! If, however, this decision is 
observed within the proper bounds, it merely succeeds 
in protecting the robbers and the rogues; but not 
the sincere and unbiassed " intelligentsia," through 
whose appearance the Government institutions are to 
be cleansed. For what is such a cleansing process 
if it is not a counter-revolution? The slightest ex- 
pression of discontent is threatened with the same 
severity as is any form of roguery. And the threat 
is not rendered abortive by any counter-measure. 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 213 

since it relates to matters in which the sincere com- 
munist as well as the rogues have equal interest. 
For in their criticism of the Soviet regime they both 
work hand in hand. Hence any modification is out 
of the question. Thus, quite recently, the " All 
Eussian Extraordinary Commission for Opposing the 
Counter-Eevolution ' ' made the following proclama- 
tion: — 

"A series of revolts, which have broken out 
recently, proves that the laurels acquired by Krassnoff, 
as well as the SociaHst revolutionaries of the Left 
Wing and the Mensheviks of the Left Wing, have not 
caused them to cease their activity. It is their exclu- 
sive aim to undermine our army (Briansk, Samara, and 
Smolensk), to destroy our industry (Petrograd and 
Tula), as- well as our means of transport and food 
supply through railway strikes. The ' All Eussian 
Extraordinary Commission ' declares herewith that it 
will make no difference whatever between the Whits 
Guards among Krassnoff 's troops and the White 
Guards belonging to the party of the Mensheviks and 
of the social revolutionaries of the Left Wing. The 
chastising hand of the Extraordinary Commission will 
work with equal severity in the one case as well as in 
the other. The Left Socialist Eevolutionaries and the 
Mensheviks who have been arrested by us will be held 
as hostages, and their fate will depend entirely upon 
the attitude of both parties." — ^President of the All- 
Eussian Extraordinary Commission, E. Jershinski- 
(taken from the Isvestia, of the AU-Eussian Central 
Executive Committee, Number 69, March 1st, 1919). 

Hence, because in the army there are signs of dissolu-^ 
tion visible, and because discontent is growing among 
the industrial workers and the railway employees, the 
leading elements of the non-Bolshevik Socialists are 
to be arrested, so that they may be summarily shot 
at the slightest sign of any further proletarian opposi- 
tion. The quelHng of a discontented proletariat — 



214 TBEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

that is the sublime object with which it is attempted 
to sanctify the fatuous means of wholesale executions 
in Eussia. It cannot possibly turn economic failure 
into a success. It can only lead to the possibility 
that the fall of Bolshevism will not be accepted by 
the masses of Eussia in the same way as the fall, 
of the Second Paris Commune was received by the 
whole of the Socialist proletariat at that time; but 
rather as the fall of Eobespierre of the 9th Thermidor, 
1794, was received by the whole of France, namely, 
as salvation from some heavy load, and by no means 
as a defeat felt with' intense pain and sorrow. 



The Outlook for the Soviet Ebpubmc. 

Lenin's government is threatened by another 9th 
Thermidor, but it may come about in some other way. 
History does ja.o t repeat itself . A_gover nment that 
sets an o big ot in view, which under' the -circumstance s 
is unattainable, may go to pieces Jn[^TOJ[ifferent ways. 
-HjgiLl in the end b e overtfir own^jTit^ tands by~It3 
programme~aSd"Iall3 wiihjb^^nt it can only main- 

"tsin iLsell if it "Inakes^ s6me3^^EStSag.iting©Is! 
its "prog fSmme7""in3r Anally aba ndons it, altoget her. 
Whatever happens, one way jiSsFas much as the otiier, 
will lead to failiure, so far as the thing itself is con- 
cerned. For those persons implicated, however, it 
makes an enormous difference whether they retain 
the State power in their own hands, or whether they 
are to be delivered up as fallen idols to the rage and 
fury of their enemy. 

Eobespierre fell on the 9th Thermidor, but not all 
the Jacobins shared his fate. By means of clever 
adaptation to circumstances many of them rose to a 
high position. Napoleon himself originally belonged 
to the Terrorists, and indeed was a friend of 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 2lS 

Eobespierre's brother. Their sister says later on, 
" Bonaparte was a Eepublican. I will even go so far 
as to say that he was on the side of the ' Mountain. ' 
His admiration for my elder brother, his friendship 
for my younger brother, and perhaps also the sympathy 
h© showed in my misfortune, were responsible foJ? 
my receiving from the ConsxJate a donation of 3,600 
frs." (Quoted by J. H. Eose, " Napoleon I.," 1916, 
volume 1, page 50.) 

"Rnt, not only iTiflividna.1a WTioTp. paH.ip.g can an 

transform thern sfilvpa «« t,n ftvf.TnV.g^^Q t.lipyYi^^lYas frg"^ 
an unte nable . positionr. not o nly with, a. wTiqIo sTfin , 
but even jwith enhan ce d Tjower and respect. It is 
noFTmpossible that the collapse of the communist 
experiment in Eussia may not equally transform thd 
Bolsheviks, and save them as a governing party. 
They are already on the way. As thorough-going,' 
practical politicians, the Bolsheviks! have developed the 
art of adaptation to circumstances in the course of 
their rule to a remarkable degree. Originally they 
were whole-hearted protagonists of a Nati onal 
ATsgembly, e lected on the Streasfth of a universal-ajid . 
" equar"l Stgt"" fiuT they s et this __a^de^. ^ifi soon— as . Jt 
^ood in ~tE5S way. 'i^hey w er e thorough-going 
op p o nent3 "~5f'tB6'^dea'iib pe naltvr vef lihey established 
a biog.dsI^^r'"°''^ ^6n "dem ocracy was being" ab'ajmo^^ 
in the State they "became nery upaolders ot democrajs v 
within the proletariat, but they are repressing this 
(ip.mnovufj nTmeand_more by means ol "their personal 
~?^Qi3iinf'^^^yf~'''''T^nc^ i^i^'^ii^SiSlMiA-p iflcfi.-work system . 
ajftd..ac&,JLQaurpinitrftdiiiiffiwg .it. A^.nt,fcift,.ba°3J)JiiTig- of 
i^eix regime^ev dec]gjadJ»t»^ft4ae» itha ii i i o b jfic t..te«g^^ 
the bureaucr^c^aBE^3iailaiSy.,-Md.iieh . g ftpr e afintiPd .t he 
means of pe.wecirtBfcJili&»ay.,^>at6.; ~:b,nt .i «h« >y ■ h a y .eJLaiiccfe. 
duced Jai jtg place a_ neffi..f»nn nf hiir,e.a.niP.ratic-ja>l&>, 
They cam e'Tnt<r powCTl>V diftSft lvinP' tho d ipcipl iBa.J)f 

tiie army , and finally the army ita fllt Thfiy. hfv^. 

created a new army, severely disciplined. They 



216 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

strove to reduce all clasaes to the same level, inst ead 
c3"wlutlli Lliuv LaTe-ealtetl"lEtb bemg a new clasgL dis- 
linotion. 'Ibey have created a class which stands 
on a lower level than the proletariat, which latter they 
have raised to a privileged class ; and over and above 
this they have caused still another class to appear, 
which is in receipt of large incomes and enjoys high 
privileges. They hoped in the villages to cripple the 
peasants who had property, by meting out political 
rights exclusively to the poorest among the peasantry. 
Now they have granted these propertied peasants some 
measure of representation. They began with a 
merciless. expropriation of capital, and at the present 
moment are preparing to hand over to American capi- 
talists the mineral treasures of half Eussia, in order 
to gain their assistance, and in every way to come to 
some terms with foreign capital. The French war 
correspondent, Ludovic Naudeau, gave a report recently 
in the Temps of a conversation he had had with 
Lenin, in which the latter, among other remarks, gave 
lihe following account of his friendly attitude towards 
capital : — 

" "We are very willing to propose that we should 
acknowledge and pay the interest on our foreign 
loans; and since we lack other means of payment, that 
this should take the form of the delivery of wheat, 
petroleum, and all kinds of raw material, of which 
we without doubt 'have superfluous stocks, as 
soon as work in Eussia can be undertaken to its fullest 
extent. We have also decided, on the strength of 
Our contracts, which, of course, must first receive 
diplomatic sanction, to grant concessions to subjects 
of the Entente Powers for the exploiting of forests 
and mines, naturally subject to the condition that the 
essential basis of government of the Russian Soviet 
Eepublic be acknowledged. "We know that English,' 
Japanese, and American capitalists are keenly striving 
for such concessions." 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 217. 

Interviews are not documents upon which one can 
swear, but the views of the Soviet Eepublic, about 
which we are here speaking, are proved by other 
responsible reporters on Eussia. They give evidence of 
a strong sense of the actual realities of life; but show- 
that they have already renounced their Communist 
programme, since its realisation will be delayed for 
some long time to come, if they are prepared to farm 
out to foreign capitalists a part of Russia for eighty 
years. Communism, as a means towards the 
immediate emancipation of the Eussian proletariat, 
has now collapsed. It is now only a question whether 
Lenin's government will announce in a veiled manner 
the bankruptcy of Bolshevik methods, and seek 
thereby to maintain its position; or whether a 
counter-revolutionary power will overthrow this govern- 
ment and proclaim its bankruptcy in a very brutal 
way. We should ourselves prefer the first way, 
namely, that Bolshevism should once more consciously 
establish itself on the basis of Marxist evolution, which 
holds that natural phases of development cannot be 
precipitated. It would be the least painful, and it 
would also be the most beneficial way for the Inter- 
national proletariat. But, unfortxmately, the course of 
world-history does not always run according to our 
wishes. The hereditary sin of Bolshevism has been 
its suppression of democracy through a form of govern- 
ment, namely, the dictatorship, which has no meaning 
unless it represents the unlimited and despotic power, 
either of one single person, or of a small organisation 
intimately boTind. together. With a dictatorship it is 
as with war. This should be borne in mind by those 
in Germany who are under the influence of the 
Eussian method, and who are now coquettmg with the 
idea of a dictatorship, without thinking it out to its 
logical conclusion. It is easy to begin a dictatorship 
as it is to begin war, if one has the State power under 
control. But when once such steps have been taken, 



218 TEEKOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

it is as difficult at will to stop the one as the other. 
One has to choose between two alternatives, either to 
triumph or to end in catastrophe. Eussia has an 
imperative need of foreign capital. But this help will 
not b© forthcoming to the Soviet Eepublic, unless, it 
upholds the National Assembly and the freedom of the 
Press. This is not to imply that the capitalists were 
ever democratic idealists. Without hesitation they 
gave millions in support of Tsarism ; but they have no 
strong confidence in regard to the business capacity 
of the present revolutionary government. They are 
in doubt as to its constitution, when it suffers no 
criticism to appear in the Press, and obviously has not 
the majority of the popizlation behind it. WiU the 
Soviet Government find a way to preserve the freedom 
of the Press and to convoke a Constituent Assembly? 
A certain number of Bolsheviks have declared that 
they fear the one just as little as the other. But 
why, then, do they not uphold them? Why do they 
despise a means which, if they use it well, must help 
towards an enormous increase of their moral strength, 
and of other people's confidence in them? In the 
aforementioned preface to Bucharin's " Programme 
of the Communists" there is written: — 
-, " The conditions which Kautsky and company 
would impose upon a revolution appear to be that 
the revolution certainly has the right to dictate its 
will to the bourgeoisie, but that at the same time it 
is pledged to grant the bourgeoisie every facility, 
whether through fi-eedom of the Press or through the 
Constituent Assembly, to air its complaints. This 
masterly suggestion of a learned expert, who does not 
seem to bother whether he has right on his side, but 
only whether he can lodge his accusation on the par- 
ticular man for whom he is looking, might quite well 
be put into practice, abstractly regarded, without its 
doing any harm to the Revolution. But the 
Revolution consists in being a civil war, and those 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 219 

classes who have to fight with cannons and machine- 
guns readily forego such Homeric form of controversy. 
The Eevolution never discussed with its enemies. It 
destroys them, and the counter-revolution does the 
same thing, and both are quite capable of shouldering 
the reproof that they have disregarded the orders, of 
the German Reichstag." 

This justification of slaughter, also in regard to the 
counter-revolution, is all the more sublime, when it is 
compared with what the author says a few pages before 
concerning the revolution: — 

" The Socialist Eevolution is a long process, which 
begins with the dethronement of the capitalist class; 
but it can only end with the transformation of the 
capitalist system into one for the community of Labour. 
This process ivill take a geiieration, at least, ijj. each 
country. This period is exactly the period of the 
proletarian dictatorship; the period, that is to say, in 
which the proletariat, with one hand, must continue 
to crush the capitalist class, while the other hand 
alone is free to aid in other Socialistic reconstruction " 
(page 18). 

That is to say, the revolution is synonymous with 
civil war, with a war in which no pardon is given, in 
which the one side attempts to crush the other with- 
out any lasting eifect, since this pleasant process 
must continue " for a generation at least." This 
devastating civil war, carried on by means of machine- 
gims and gas-bombs, which must work more dire 
destruction on land than ever happened before in the 
Thirty Years' War; which decimates the population, 
increases their brutality until it becomes the voidest 
barbarism, and which completely stops all soiu-ces 
of production — ^this, indeed, is to be the way to the 
working out of the higher form of life for which 
Socialism stands ! This masterly conception of the 
Socialist Eevolution is certainly not that of a " learned 
expert," but of a professional revolutionary for whom 



220 TERROEISM AND COMMUNISM 

insiureotion is synonymous with revolution, and who 
really loses his health and life if such revolution assumes 
the form of democracy, and not that of » civil war. 
But one thing is certainly correct. There are only 
two possibilities — either democracy or civil war. Who- 
ever abolishes the one must be prepared for the other. 
He can only escape from a dictatorship where he has 
to deal with an absolutely hopeless and apathetic 
population, which by its very nature represents the lack 
of human material on which to build the structure of 
a Socialist society. 

__^&_ we have only the t -»" altrf^iTia-t.i-gAg — rlp.Tnrv.rap.y 
or civ il war — ^I myself draw the conclu fjifyp that 
wbe rever Hopig-ligm Hfy^s not appear to be possible 
on a democratic basis, and where the majority of th e 
populat ion rejects it. its time has not yet fully come . 

' Bolshevis m, on the other hand, argues that Sooial Sn 
can only be ifltrpduc^d by btiilig forcea on a majority 
by~a minority. and such can h~ppp.n onlythfmi'iJ'h 
dictatorship and civil war . T ^ fact alone that Bolshe v- 
ism fepila itspilf to ^ in a niinonty among the peop le 
makes it clear why it so obstinately rejects democracy, 

In spite of its assurance that democrs^ cannot 
" harm the revolution." If it thought it had the 
majority behind it, it would not need to reject 
democracy, even if it did regard fighting with cannons 
and machine-guns as the one and only possible form 
of revolutionary struggle. Moreover, this struggle 
would be made easier for Bolshevism, as it was for 
the revolutionary Parisians in 1793, if a revolutionary 
Convention was behind it all. But such a Convention 
would not stand behind it. When the Bolsheviks came 
into power they found themselves at the height of their 
influence over the workmen, the soldiers, and a large 
section of the peasants; and yet they themselves at 
that time did not dare to appeal for a universal elec- 
tion. Instead of dissolving the Constituent Assembly 
and introducing a new election, they simply smashed 



THE COMMUNISTS. AT WOEK 221 

it. Ever since, the opposition against the Bolsheviks 
has been increasing from day to day. The growing 
nervousness betrayed by its disciples over every 
kind of Press which is not official, as well as the 
exclusion of Socialist critics from the Soviets, shows 
the transition to the Regiment of Terror. In such a 
situation, to demolish the dictatorship in order 
gradually to return to democracy is scarcely possible. 
All such attempts hitherto have quickly come to an 
end. The Bolsheviks are prepared, in order to main- 
tain their position, to make all sorts of possible con- 
cessions to bureaucracy, to militarism, and to capital- 
ism, whereas any concession to democracy seems to 
them to be sheer suicide. And yet that alone ofiers 
any possibility of bringing the civil war to an end, 
and of leading Eussia again along paths of 
economic progress and prosperous development 
towards some higher form of existence. "Withou t 
d emocracy Eussia will go to pieces: but throug h 
" democracY the proletariat must gn tr> . pipcpq .'I'ha 
final result is q mtp pTOdip.^^aKlp. Tt, np ed not be a 9th 
Ij"iermicfor. but I fear it will not be far removed fro m 
CEat^ '' ' 



The Outlook for the World Eevolution. 

The Bolsheviks themselves seem to have no great 
confidence in their ultimate victory. Yet they have 
anchored all their hopes on one thing. For if Eussia 
ceases to be a chosen people of the revolution then 
the World-Revolution must be the Messiah that 
shall redeem the Eussian people. But what is this 
world-revolution? It may be regarded in two quite 
different ways. One may regard it as representing 
such a growth of the Socialist idea in the world, 
alongside of the strengthening of the proletariat, 



222 TBEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

accompanied by an increased bitterness of the class- 
struggle, that Socialism will become a great powfer, 
capable of stirring the whole world, and affecting the 
life of more and more States as it develops. On the 
other hand, one might understand under this head a 
revolutionising of the world in the Bolshevik sense, 
i.e., the conquest of political power by the proletariat 
in all the great States; otherwise, the Soviet Eepublic 
can no longer save the Eevolution. It would mean, 
further, the establishment everywhere of Soviet 
Eepublics, and the depriving of all non-communist 
elements of their rights. It would mean the dictator- 
ship of the Communist Party, and, as a consequence, 
the letting loose of a civil war throughout the whole 
world for at least a generation to come. 

A strenuous propaganda is dt work to bring about 
this result. To produce a world-revolution, in the 
Bolshevik sense is beyond their power. But they 
might certainly be able, should they succeed, in 
exerting a very considerable influence on West Europe, 
and so endanger the world-revolution in the other 
sense of the word. For the chief task of the preachers 
of the world-revolution, in the Eussian sense, is the 
letting loose of a fratricidal war among the proletarian 
masses of the world. 

Being from its very beginning a child of party 
dissension, and having come to power as the result of 
its struggle with other Socialist parties of its own 
country, Bolshevism endeavours to establish itself in 
Eussia by means of a civil war, which makes it into 
a war between brother and brother; and, as a final 
means towards its supremacy, it adds the attempt to 
split up all other Socialist parties which have still 
remained in unity — so long as they do not prove to 
have a Bolshevist majority. Such is the meaning of 
the Third International. By this means they hope 
to introduce the world-revolution. Yet this is not 
the consequence of a mere whim or of sheer 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 223 

malice, but proceeds from the very essence of 
Bolshevism itself, which is incompatible with the 
higher form of existence, for which pioneer work has 
ah-eady been done in Western Europe. 

In Western Europe, democracy is not a thing of 
yesterday, as is the ease with Eussia. It has won 
its way through a series of revolutions, and is the 
result of a struggle extending over hundreds of years. 
It has been absorbed by the masses in their very flesh 
and blood. As a consequence, it is absolutely 
impossible to deprive all society of aU political rights. 
In France the peasants represent a power which one 
dare not flout, and which very jealously watches over 
its own private property. Moreover, the bourgeoisie 
in Prance, and still more in England, is a class 
accustomed to struggle. The proletariat in Eussia is 
certainly weaker than that in West Europe; but 
infinitely weaker in the Eussian Empire is the bour- 
geoisie itself. There, as everywhere in those countries 
where a strong military autocracy has been in power, 
the bourgeoisie is just as much in cowardly fear of 
the State power, as it is inspired with blind confidence 
in its protection. Hence the miserable state of 
present-day Liberalism. The collapse of State power, the 
failure of the military " wall of protection," the trans- 
ference of all powers of a State into the hands of the 
proletariat, so frightened the bourgeoisie, which has 
never accustomed itself to undertake any energetic 
political fight, that it absolutely collapsed, and left the 
ground uncontested in the hands of its opponents. 

In West Europe the lower classes, as the result of 
their class-struggle extending over hundreds of years, 
have educated not only themselves, but also the upper 
classes. These latter have gained respect for the 
proletariat; but they have become, moreover, masters 
of the art of meeting any attack at the right moment 
by making concessions, thus avoiding catastrophes. 
In the Anglo-Saxon countries, however, the 



224 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

bourgeoisie has had, for a long time since, to fend for 
itself without any strong standing army. It has learnt, 
both in relation with the State-power as also with the 
proletariat, to depend on its own strength alone ; hence 
it does not easily turn tail when any danger is 
threatened. And it is these countries that have been 
victorious in the war. 

The war has not crushed and dissolved the armies 
of these countries as it has those of the Central Powers 
and Eussia. In East Europe, at the time of the 
dissolution of the army, it was the soldiers, from what- 
ever class of the population they may have been drawn, 
who always represented an element of revolt. But 
this enormous power, which hastens a revolution, may 
also have the effect of bringing weak revolutionary 
factors to power prematurely, thus causing them 
to be faced with problems which they are not com- 
petent to solve. It is this power which is lacking in 
the victorious countries. For there Socialism -will 
only acquire for itself State power, when it is strong 
enough, within the framework of democracy, to gain 
the balance over the other parties. In such countries 
it has not the sUghtest cause to abjure democracy; 
for it is just in such countries that the highest and 
best strata of the proletariat could never be found 
ready to accept the substitution of democracy by a 
dictatorship, which after all simply means the dictator- 
ship of a single person. It is certain that at the 
present day in France Bolshevik sympathisers among 
the Socialists are very strong; but they arose solely in 
consequence of the very justifiable opposition' to all 
attempts of their own capitalist government to crush 
Socialist governments abroad. 

There are also many who think that Bolshevik 
methods are suitable for Eussia ; but they have no inten- 
tion of recommending the same methods to be applied 
in France. Nevertheless, even there the Blanquiste 
traditions of revolt, and the Proudhonist traditions of 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOEK 225 

anti-parliamentarianism have not quite died out. These 
two hostile elements have gained fi"esh life by some 
strange fusion in syndicalism. They might offer some 
basisfor Bolshevism. But it is quite out.of the question 
that they should ever gain hold of the proletariat 
of Francei or indeed of England and America. Its 
growth there would only end in its splitting up, just 
at the time- when it would have great 'arid decisive 
struggles to -fight — struggles in which it could only 
possibly- become victorious by showing the utmost 
cohesion and co-operation. The Bolshevik propaganda 
for a world-revolution, as we have already said, cannot 
therefore further the world-revolution, which is already 
in preparation. The utmost it can do is to endanger 
it. 

Communism, as a result of its diversiv© tendencies, 
has already endangered the revolution in Germany. 
German Social democracy before th© war was a strong 
Socialist party in the country. United on the basis of 
a common and single aspect of society shared by all 
its members, it was -on the point of embracing the 
majority of the population, as soon as it had 
succeeded in winning over the Catholic workers, who 
followed the: banner of the Centrum. If it had 
possessed the majority, the struggle for democracy, 
that is: to say the struggle for the voting reform in 
Prussia, would have become a struggle for political 
power. 'If this had- been gained the party would at 
once have reaped the finest fruits of its iactivity', con- 
sidering the wealth which German capitalism had 
developed and amassed, and which made it possible to 
ameliorate rapidly the general condition of the masses. 
The world- war has made a complete end to this wealth. 
Peace hasi now found Germany in the most desperate 
Bituati6n. It precludes any attempt at creating/better 
conditions for the masses, whatever the means of pro- 
duction may be. But this world-war, as a result of the 
collapse and the dissolution of the army, has also caused 



220 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

social democracy, not through its own strength but 
through the bankruptcy of its opponents, to come to the 
f pre, at a time when itself has become weakened through 
the cleavage which the war has brought about. If social 
democracy wishes to become the dominating party, its 
immediate reunion has become an imperative 
necessity. One would have thought that the demands 
of the present moment would have been carried out 
all the more expeditiously, since the cause of the 
cleavage within the Socialist party, namely, the 
attitude towards the war, has now disappeared. 

But, unfortunately, since the rise of the Soviet 
Eepublic, a new, wedge has been driven through the 
Socialist ranks of Germany by Bolshevik propa- 
ganda, which has demanded that our Party should 
relinquish the essential claims of democracy, and set 
up the dictatorship of the workmen's council as a 
form of State. In order to be under no false 
impression, the Bolsheviks ceased to call themselves 
social democrats. They therefore called, themselves 
Communists, apparently in order to ally themselves 
with the true form of Marxism laid down in the Com- 
munist Manifesto. They fca-got, however, that Marx 
and Engels, towards the end of 1847, published the 
Communist Manifesto, and a few months later issued 
the Neue Bheinische Zeitung as the organ of 
democracy, so little in their eyes was the antagonism 
between democracy and communism. The opposition 
between dictatorship and democracy has created in 
Germany, alongside of the two Socialist parties which 
existed before the revolution, yet another, namely, 
that of the Communists. It has given rise to uncer- 
tainty and division in the politics of each of these two 
parties, and among the Independents has produced 
strong Bolshevik tendencies. Further, it has resulted 
in a reaction among a section of the Socialists of the 
Eight against these very tendencies, which, however, 
overshot the mark, and caused leanings towards the 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WORK 227 

!&curg€(©is party, with which the Socialists of the Eight, 
alreaiiy as the result of the war policy, had a- good 
deal in common. 

The revolution of November 9th broke this coalition 
with the hiourgeoisie^ and brought about an under- 
ateiiding with the Ipdependents. Uirfortunately this 
was oidy temporary. Jn GemMQy it is just aa 
little possible as in Wdst Eiurope to inlbroduee a real, 
permanent, and active form of dictatorship, which 
should embrace the whole Empire. The population 
hapS progressed far too much for this^ JiQ. attempts 
of separate and proletarian seoti<His to assume the 
dictatorship can hJa.ve only temporary success. They 
are bound to lead to one result, namely, the increase 
of the political and economic dissolution of the Empire, 
and to prepare the way for a counterrevolutionary 
njjiitary dictatorship. But this latter also can never 
become a permanent and tmiversal power. It is 
impossible in {Germany to continue to govern against 
the interests of the workers. 

The excesses of the Noske Guards in Berlin, the 
terrible fury in Mimich, are no proof of the dictatorial 
power of the government. They show rather the 
helplessness of tiie government in its attitude towards 
those spirits, which it has oonjmred up, which are 
certainly capable of committing with impunity horrible 
deeds of revenge, but which are nevertheless incapable 
themselves of guiding the State. 

This striving for dictatorship, whether from the Left 
or the Eight, cannot lead to a real dictatorship, but 
only to anareiiy and complete ruin, which will lead us, 
hot to any higher forms of life but to cannibalism, when 
all production will be at an end, and all food commodities 
will have been consumed. And even before it can get 
so far, it may happen that all attempts to introduce a 
dictatorship will only lead, as the one result of its 
activity, to an increase of the cruelty and brutality with 
wiiieh' poKtioal and economic struggles are being 



^8 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

fought out, as well as to an increase in the niunber 
of victims. This will render any positive construction 
quite impossible. This is just as true of Noske's 
regiment as of the Soviet dictatorship. 

At the present moment propag^anda is being made 
for a certain form of dictatorship, which is to be only 
temporary, and which, in any case, is not to have 
recourse to violence. This is the worst of all possible 
illusions. In a country in which all classes have 
already awakened t6 the importance of pcditlcal life, 
no party can exercise a dictatorship without some 
recourse to despotism. However peaceful their views 
may be, however great their determination to use 
the dictatorship merely as a means of acquiring the 
strength necessary for positive work, it will soon 
happen, after they have once started their regime, that 
nothing will remain over of their dictatorial methods 
but despotism itself. 

Democracy alone offers the one means of avoiding 
despotism, and of coming to some calm and positive 
construction. But at the present moment democracy 
has been overpowered theoretically by the Left, and 
practically by the Eight Wing of the Socialist Party. 
The National Assembly itself is far from being a 
democracy; for no democracy is possible without the 
representation of the people by means of a imiversal 
and equal vote. The one and only institution at the 
present moment that might to some extent keep the 
Empire together can come, not through Workmen's 
Councils, nor through a dictatorial government, but 
only through a National Assembly, consisting of repre- 
sentatives from all parts of the Empire. Certainly 
the present constitution is highly unsatisfactory > but 
who has elected the majority in it? It is the active 
population, the very people who are to elect the 
Workmen's Councils, so soon as these latter have been 
erected into a system. The votes of the Independent 
Social Democrats in the constitution form not one* 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WORK 229 

tenth of the National Assembly. The working-classes 
represent nine-tenths of the whole nation. 

The Workmen's Councils present a very different 
picture from the National Assembly, only so long as 
they embrace the wage-earners of the great industries. 
As such, they can become important for progressive 
policy, and they are indispensable for all attempts at 
fiocialisation. But, as such alone, they are incapable 
of being an adequate substitution for the National 
Assembly. For the more this system of councils is 
extended over the whole province of large industry, 
and the more it embraces the whole of the working 
population, so much the more must the central council 
in its constitution approximate to the National 
Assembly, without investing its majority with that 
authority which the majority of the National Assembly 
possesses, as the result of its openly claiming to be 
the majority of the nation. 

Nothing can be more erroneous than the assertion, 
which has also figured lately in the discussions of the 
recent Congress of the Third International in Moscow, 
that parliamentarianism and democracy in their very 
essentials are bourgeois institutions. They are forms 
which may be utterly different in content, according 
to the kind of people they represent. If in any 
parliament the bourgeois elements are to be in the 
majority, then parliamentarianism will be bourgeois 
in character; and if these parties prove to be of no 
use their parliamentarianism is also useless. But aa 
soon as a Socialist majority appears in Parliament, the 
whole situation is radically changed. Now it has 
been said that such a Socialist majority is out of the 
question, even with the most liberal and complete 
secret ballot, because the capitalists dominate the Press 
and buy off the workers. But if the capitalists are 
really in a position to buy off the workers in this 
manner, especially after a revolution like the present, 
they should be juet ft3 papabl$ of influencing those 



230 TEEEOEISM AND COMMUNISM 

who have the right of voting for these Workmen's 
Councils. The further assertion that, for the 
Socialists, even by the complete secret ballot, and 
even witii a majority of wage-earners in the popula- 
tion, it is impossible to gain a majority in any 
parliament, on account of the financial power which 
the capitalists exercise over the proletariat, is 
equivalent to calling the proletariat nothing but a 
feeble and cowardly band of illiterates, and simply 
announces the bankruptcy of the proletarian cause. 
For if the proletariat were of siloh poor and wretched 
constitution, then no institution, in the world can help 
it, however elaborately it might be decked out to 
ensure victory in spite of its moral and intellectual 
impotence. 

If the Grerman National Assembly of the present day 
has a specifically bourgeois character, it is the 
Bolshevik propaganda which has contributed not a 
little to that. It has caused among the working-classes, 
and also among the independents, a certain mistrust 
of the National Assembly, and has further impaired the 
latter 's interests in the eleotions^ And the other working- 
class elements, namely, the Catholics, who were on 
the point of disassociating themselves from the bour- 
geois cliques, were likewise weaikened, and given over 
to bourgeois guidance 

It is quite certain that Germany cannot recover her 
health under the present National Assembly. The 
process of convalescence will not be furthered, but 
on the otiier band hindered, if the struggle against the 
existing Assembly is transformed into a fight against 
democraey, against universal suffrage, and against the 
constitution of the National Assembly as such. For 
in this way a hindrance will be caused, which will 
prevent the struggle from concentrating on the one 
point where reform can proceed, namely, the elecffcion 
of a National Assembly, in which thte reprssentoMves 
of the prole1»ri{|'t shall form the majority, and be 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WORK 231 

prepared to set about as energetically as they oaii the 
socialising of the country, in so far as it iS possible. 
They must also be determined unhesitatingly to carry 
on- the democratisation of Germany, which has only, 
just begun. This, and not a dictatorship, must be 
the programme of any purely Socialist G-ovemment 
that may com© into power. In this way it would 
also gain the allegiance of the Catholic workers, and 
indeed of all bourgeois circles, if they could see in 
such a programme the means to help rescue the 
Republic from the civil war, which has arisen as a 
result of the dictat<Mrial tendencies among those parties 
struggling for pre-eminence. If the Communists 
assert that democracy is none other than the method 
of bourgeois domina«tion, the answer to that would be, 
that the alternative to democracy, namely, the 
dictatorship itself, could lead to nothing elsei but a 
revolution, and to methods of violence characteristic 
of by^gone days. Democracy, with its universal 
eq-uaJl suffrage, does not represent the domination 
of the bourgeoisie; for the boulrgeoisie in its period 
of revolution did not introduce equal suffrage, but 
only suffrage according to census, which was intro- 
duced into France, England, Belgium and elsewhere. 
It was only after long and bitter struggle that the 
proletariat succeeded in acquiring universal and equal 
suffrttge-^a perfectly well-known fact, which, however, 
all Communists abd their friends seem to have com- 
pletely forgotten. Democracy, with its universal equal 
suffirage, is the method to transform the class-struggle 
out of a hand-to-hand fight into a battle of iuteelli- 
gence, in which one particular class can triumph only 
if it is intellectually and morally on a level with its 
opponent. Democracy is the one and only method 
tlirough which the higher form of life can be realised, 
and which Socialism declares is the right Ol civilised 
men. Dirtatorship leads only to tha* form of 
Sooialismi which, has been called Asiatic.;- but uiiiustly, 



232 TEREGEISM AND COMMUNISM 

for Asia baa given birth to a Confucius and a Buddha. 
It would be more exact to call it Tartar Socialism. 

Quite apart from the terrible oonsequences of the 
world- war, which naturally bear the greater responsi- 
bility, it is due in a great measure to the subversive 
and destructive activity of the Commimists, to their 
dissipation of the strength of the proletariat by fruit- 
less adventures, that the working-classes of Germany 
have gained little from their own victory, and have 
not understood how to make democracy an adequate 
instrument for their own emancipation. 

Democracy offers far better prospects for Socialism 
in West Europe and America. These regions, especially 
the Anglo- Saxon countries, have issued from the 
world-war less weakened economically than the others. 
Every form of progress, and every gain of power oq the 
part of the proletariat, must immediately bring with 
it an improvement in the conditions of life. 

But at the same time the struggle of the proletariat 
against the bourgeois world must assume more intensive 
forms than ever it did before the war. 

The period of patriotic exuberance, which war 
and, after it, victory, had given rise to, is rapidly 
passing. The change has already begun, and will pro- 
ceed at an increasing rate, when once peace has been 
signed. For, however great the burdens placed by the 
Peace Treaty on the conquered, the sacrifices entailed 
by the victorious peoples will be felt none the less, 
since everywhere now the chief interest will be turned 
from external problems to problems of home policy. 
pThe opposition of the proletariat will, in such case, 
ilwaya assume more and more energetic forms, 
according as its seH-conscioueness increases. The 
German, and still m'Ore the Eussian, Revolution has 
in this respect acted as an incentive. Whatever one 
may think of the Bolshevik methods, the fact that a 
proletarian government in a great State has nqt only, 
come into power, but been able to maintain itself 



THE COMMUNISTS AT WOKK 23^ 

for nearly two years under the most difficult condi- 
tions conceivable, naturally increases the feeling of 
power among the proletariat of all countries. For the 
world-revolution therefore, in this respect, the Bol- 
sheviks have rendered an enormous service, far more 
than they have through their emissaries and propagan- 
dists, who have been responsible for more harm to the 
proletarian cause than for any revolutionary achieve- 
ment, .«^ 

The proletariat of the whole world has now been set 
in motion, and its international pressure will be strong 
enough to cause all economic progress of the future tot 
develop on Socialist, and no longer on capitalist UnesJ 

In this respect, therefore, the world-war has made 
this epoch significant; for it hp a maiant. t.Via onA of 
pApifaliat. and t.ba hfifrinning of Socialist devolop - 
ment; Clearly, we shall not be able to leap at one 
bound out of a ca;pitalist into a Socialist world. 
Socialism is not a piece of mechanism, which one can 
put together on a pre-conoeived plan, and which, once 
it has been set in motion, can go on working in a 
regular manner. On the contrary, it is in reality a 
process of social co-operation, which has its own special 
laws just liko any other form of social activity ; which 
however, within these laws can assume the most 
varied forms, and is also capable of fuller development, 
the outcome of which it is impossible for us at the 
present moment to see. 

We of the present day have no " ready-made Utopias 
to introduce by popular decision." What is now 
happening is the liberating of those elementajhat 
mark the beginning of Socialist development, (if we 
care to call that the world-revolution, because this is 
happening throughout the world, then we are certainly 
confronted with a world-revolution. It will not pro- 
ceed on the lines of a dictatorship, nor by means of 
cannons and guns, nor through the destruction of one's 
political and social adversaries, but only through 



id4 *fERilOElSM AHD COMMUNMM 

democraey aod hurnani-fcy. In this way alone can we 
hope to amve at those higher forms erf hfe, the working 
out of which belongs to the future task of the 
pi<ol€tariat. 



Cornell University Library 
HX 36.K21 



Terrorism and communism :a contribution 



3 1924 002 196 727 








'm 



